I.
THE STRUCTURE AND GOVERNANCE OF PGW
Ownership of PGW The Philadelphia Gas Works is the largest municipally-owned gas utility in the country, with more than 500,000 customers.
It is wholly owned by the City and, by law, is to be operated for the sole and exclusive benefit of the City.
PGW's Board of Directors (PFMC) PGW has been in existence since 1835.
From the end of the 19th century until 1972, it was managed by an outside company, United Gas Improvement Company (UGI).
In 1972, Mayor Frank Rizzo ended the contract with UGI and created the Philadelphia Facilities Management Corporation (PFMC), a non-profit corporation established for the specific purpose of operating the Gas Works.
PFMC is PGW's Board of Directors.
In governing the Gas Works, PFMC must abide by the terms of the Management Agreement Act, an ordinance passed by City Council in December, 1972.
The Management Agreement Act includes provisions that regulate PGW's gas purchases, accounting methods, budgeting requirements, and numerous other areas of operation.
PGW is also subject to the oversight of the Philadelphia Gas Commission and, as of July, 2000, to regulation by the Pennsylvania Utilities Commission (PUC), discussed below.
PFMC Board members are appointed by the Mayor, and their appointments are not subject to approval by the Gas Commission or City Council.
The Board meets monthly and sometimes more often.
At present, the members of PFMC are David Hyman, Esquire; Joyce Wilkerson, Esquire; Charles McPherson; Joseph Rauscher; Rev. Thomas J. Ritter; Janice Davis; and Harold Sorgenti.
The Board members during the events described in this report were: Rotan E. Lee, Esquire, Chairman of PFMC from December, 1994 until his resignation in April, 1997.
Philadelphia School Board president, 1989 to 1994.
Andre L. Dennis, Esquire, appointed to the Board in December, 1994; vice chairman of PFMC as of May, 1995.
Partner, Stradley, Ronon, Stevens 
Ben Hayllar, Board member of PFMC from December, 1994, until October, 1999, when he was named president and CEO of PGW. President and CEO of PGW from October, 1999 until March, 2000; acting CFO of PGW from January, 1999 until March, 2000; interim acting President and
1
CEO of PGW from November, 1998 through September, 1999; City Finance Director from October, 1993 through September, 1999.
Kathryn Engebretson, PFMC member from 1994 until her resignation in September, 1998.
University of Pennsylvania Office of Vice President for Finance; City Treasurer, 1992 to 1994.
Helen Pudlin, Esquire, PFMC member from December, 1994 until her resignation in July, 1998.
General counsel for PNC Bank.
Reverend William B. Moore, Board member from December, 1994 until 2000.
Pastor of Tenth Memorial Baptist Church, and former head of the Black Clergy of Philadelphia and Vicinity.
William J. Marrazzo, board member from January, 1995 until 2000.
President and CEO of WHYY since 1997; Commissioner of the Water Department from 1979 to 1988; president and CEO of Roy F. Weston, Inc. from 1991 to 1997.
J. Gregory Driscoll, chairman of PFMC from February, 1998 to March, 2000; managing director in Legg Mason's Corporate Finance Group; Chief Operating Officer of C.R. Leffler Company in Richland, Pennsylvania, 1997 to 1999; senior vice-president for marketing for Sun Company, 1994-1997.
Driscoll joined the Board in January, 1998 as Acting Chair and was elected (by the other Board members) to serve as chair in February, 1998.
Pursuant to the Management Agreement Act, the City agrees to indemnify Board members against any and all claims made against them in their capacities as Directors for conduct while acting within the scope of their employment.
PGW's Senior Management The Management Agreement Act provides that PFMC shall provide a Chief Executive Officer, Chief Operating Officer, Chief Financial Officer, and such other personnel as deemed appropriate.
However, PGW has not had stable senior management for a decade.
When James Hawes was hired as CEO in 1996, there had not been a CEO since 1989.
As Hayllar explained in his testimony: In 1994, somewhere in the summer of 1994, the then City Solicitor, Joe Dworetzky, and myself independently came to the conclusion that the Gas Works was financially about to break its various covenants and, in
2
fact, go into default on its debt.
*** At that point, the Board had ceased to function.
They couldn't get a quorum.
The Gas Commission was fundamentally running PGW from its Commission seat.
There was no Chief Executive Officer.
There was no Chief Financial Officer and there was no Chief Operating Officer.
In fact, there hadn't been one for five years.
Attempting to remedy this situation, effective December, 1994, Mayor Edward Rendell appointed an entirely new Board of Directors, asking only one former Board member, Engebretson, to remain.
Additionally, in December, 1994, the City contracted with Phoenix Management Services, Inc., a nationally known "turnaround" company, to run PGW until a new management team could be hired.
In July, 1995, the Board hired Cole, Warren, 
In December, 1995, at Rendell's request, City Council amended the Management Agreement Act to significantly increase the amount of money available to pay the salaries of the CEO, COO, and CFO, in an effort to attract highly qualified candidates.
As described in detail in Chapter III, CWL conducted its search, and in January, 1996, the Board hired Hawes as CEO, Gregory Martin as COO, and Ramon Sharbutt as CFO.
Each signed a three-year contract, effective 1/10/96, with a possible two-year extension, provided that their performance was satisfactory to the Board.
This management team also proved unstable.
Hawes resigned in October, 1998, Sharbutt was fired in January, 1999, and Martin was fired in November, 1999.
In September, 1999, the Gas Commission approved Hayllar as the new CEO, and PFMC signed a shortterm contract with him, expiring in July, 2000.
Hayllar also functioned as acting CFO after the Board fired Sharbutt.
In March, 2000, a newly constituted PFMC named Kumar Kishinchand, the Philadelphia Water Commissioner, as interim president and CEO, replacing Hayllar.
Additionally, PFMC named Thomas Knudsen, a consultant to the Gas Commission's Public Advocate, as interim CFO. PGW also has numerous vice presidents in charge of various functions, among them, e.g., Operations, Gas Management, Information Technology, Marketing, Customer Affairs, Public Policy and
3
Human tion Board Board
Resources.
Whether the Board involves itself in the selecof these vice presidents depends upon the policies of the and the policies of the CEO.
In the last few years, the has not voted on any such personnel decisions.
In 1998 and 1999, PGW lost most of its senior executives.
The Official Statement for bonds issued in June, 1998 lists the following corporate officers: James Hawes, III, Chief Executive Officer Gregory D. Martin, Chief Operating Officer Ramon N. Sharbutt, Chief Financial Officer Sydney Avent, Senior Vice President-Deregulation Deborah Perry Estrin, Senior Vice President-Human Resources Lawrence Hoffman, Chief Accounting Officer and Controller Badruddin Karachiwala, Vice President-Gas Management David Lee, Vice President-Information Technology M. Ellen Moffett, Acting General Counsel Edward J. Reynolds, Acting Senior Vice President-Marketing Dennis E. Stinson, Vice President-Operations; and Peter Yaffe, Vice President-Public Policy Of these, all but two have resigned or been fired.
Hawes resigned in October, 1998, in the midst of a barrage of critical Daily News articles and a City Council inquiry into PGW's spending.
The PFMC Board fired Martin in November, 1999 because of his "role as the Chief Operating Officer responsible for PGW's information technology project ... [which] has performed substantially below ... requirements and ... very significantly exceeded the authorized expenditure level" and because of "your improper use of your office for personal gain, as demonstrated by the purchase and installation in your home of certain security and light systems at ratepayer expense."
The Board fired Sharbutt in January, 1999 "[a]s a result of certain irregularities involving your expense practices in violation of PGW policy."
Avent resigned effective December, 1998.
Estrin was fired in December, 1998 for (among other reasons) using her PGW corporate credit card for personal purchases and failing to repay PGW "until she got caught," in Hayllar's words.
Hoffman was fired in January, 1999 as a result of PGW's "repeated failure to complete ... corporate financial statements [and] bank account reconciliations ... on a timely basis" and "inadequate financial and accounting controls," all matters for which he was responsible.
Karachiwala resigned in November, 1999.
Lee resigned in October, 1999, shortly after Martin was placed on administrative leave as a result of the Board's investigation of information technology cost overruns and performance failures.
Moffett resigned in August, 1999.
Reynolds resigned effective September, 1998.
Only Stinson and Yaffe remain.
4
The Rest of PGW PGW's Annual Reports show that, in FY 1989, PGW had 2,475 employees.
In September, 1999, PGW had about 1,873 employees; however, Hayllar testified that "A comparable utility like us probably has something closer to 1700 to 1750 people, so I think we still have more people, unfortunately, than is required to run a utility of this size."
Because PGW historically was run by an outside company (UGI), and is now governed by PFMC (the Board), it has never viewed itself -- or been viewed by others -- as a City department or division subject to City regulations.
Thus, its employees have their own union and their own pay scale, they are not subject to the City's civil service regulations or Administrative Board rules, they have their own pension fund, and they are not subject to the City's residency requirement (although, in 1998, PGW adopted its own residency policy in response to criticism from City Council).
Similarly, PGW has its own policies and procedures governing purchasing, and is not subject to the purchasing requirements facing other City departments.
To paraphrase Hayllar in his testimony before the grand jury, the Management Agreement Act preserves the reality (which has evolved over time) that PGW is an independent operation; PFMC and the Management Agreement Act "insulate" PGW from the regulations and structure governing other City departments.
The Gas Commission The Management Agreement Act provides that "The Gas Commission shall have the responsibility for the overseeing of the operation of the Gas Works by [PFMC].
All power not specifically granted to [PFMC] shall reside in the Gas Commission."
In Hayllar's words, the Gas Commission is, in effect, a second Board of Directors, which can -- and does -- inquire into any matter occurring at PGW or PFMC.
The Management Agreement Act also provides that the Gas Commission must approve any CEO, COO, and CFO selected by PFMC.
Additionally, the Commission approves 1 PGW's operating budget each year.
The Management Agreement Act also specifically authorizes the Gas Commission to "fix and regulate" the gas rates; however, this authority was transferred to the PUC, effective 7/1/00.
The PUC has also assumed responsibility from the Gas Commission for handling customer complaints.
Thus, as of July, 2000, the Gas Commission's role is now limited to reviewing PGW's operating budget and overseeing the operation of PGW by PFMC.
PGW operates on a fiscal year that runs from 9/1 to 8/31, encompassing the entire heating season in a single year.
1
5
The Management Agreement provides that the Gas Commission shall consist of the City Controller, two members appointed by City Council and two members appointed by the Mayor.
At present, the Gas Commission members are: City Councilwoman Marian Tasco, who is the Chair of the Gas Commission; City Councilwoman Joan Krajewski (who replaced former Councilwoman Happy Fernandez); Royal E. Brown, and City Controller Jonathan Saidel (who has designated his assistant, John Foulkes, Esquire, as his alternate).
There is one vacancy.
Immediate past members include Ronald A. White, Esquire; the Honorable John Braxton; Barbara Adams, Esquire; and Thurman Bullock (an alternate to the Controller).
The Gas Commission members serve four-year terms.
The Executive Director is Christopher Kimmerle.
The Gas Commission has a paid staff of eight and annual expenses of more than $1.2 million.
PGW pays the expenses of the Gas Commission, including the salaries and benefits of Gas Commission staff members, who are PGW employees, not City employees, and who receive PGW employee benefits, which are more generous than City employee benefits.
Deregulation In 1999, the Pennsylvania General Assembly enacted legislation providing for deregulation of the gas industry and transferring regulatory authority over PGW from the Gas Commission to the PUC, effective 7/1/00.
However, ratepayers will not be able to choose their gas company until late 2003.
Audits of PGW The Management Agreement Act provides that the Controller, the Director of Finance, and the Gas Commission are to have full and free access to PGW's financial records, and "may" audit them.
(Under the previous management agreement between the City and UGI, the Controller was required to audit PGW.)
The annual audit of PGW is performed, however, not by the Controller's Office, but by an outside accounting firm paid for by PGW.
Since 1989, the auditor has been Deloitte 
Foulkes, of the Controller's Office, explained in his testimony before the grand jury that each year, PGW chooses a Big Five accounting firm as its external auditor, that firm expresses its opinion on PGW's financial statements, and the City includes PGW's audited financial statements in its Comprehensive Annual Financial Report (CAFR).
Since 1998, the Controller has selected the external auditor and has continued with Deloitte.
As noted by Foulkes, "nothing in the Management Agreement would prevent PGW from naming the Controller's Office as the CPA firm to conduct its annual audit, and reimbursing the City for the cost
6
in the same way that ment."
Foulkes also outside independent the Pension Fund and
PGW does now for the work of the Law Departtestified, however, that "Reliance on auditors is not unusual, and we do it with some other City entities."
7
PGW's Financial Contribution to the City Pursuant to the Management Agreement Act, PGW pays the City $18 million per year, the same amount it has paid every year since 1980.
Recently, however, there have been discussions about whether, given PGW's dire financial condition, it can or should make the $18 million payment this year.
PGW also supplies discounted gas to the City and School District, which PGW estimates to be worth $950,000.
Additionally, PGW offers discounted rates and other assistance to senior citizens and low-income customers.
Uncollectible Debt A substantial number of PGW customers simply default on their payments.
Although, in its Five Year Plan, PGW notes that it "can recover 100% of its uncollectible expenses through its rates charged to full-paying customers," it states that it "owes it to the customers who pay their bills in full and on time to rigorously collect what is owed."
Nonetheless, in 1998, PGW wrote off $51 million in uncollectible debt -- up from approximately $37 million written off each year in 1995, 1996, and 1997.
For FY 2001, PGW is forecasting $63 million in bad debt.
Thus, rather than more vigorously pursuing those customers who default, PGW simply passes their debts off onto its paying 2 customers.
PGW's proposed rate increase and other requested assistance In bad financial condition, PGW is seeking huge rate increases and other assistance.
In June, 2000, PGW filed a request with the Gas Commission for a $52 million increase in its base rate, and a $41 million increase in the costs to be recovered through its gas cost rate.
Additionally, PGW has filed a proposal to close the senior citizen discount to new participants.
PGW has also filed these proposed rate hikes with the PUC.
Additionally, possibly moving toward the day when the City makes payments (subsidies) to PGW, rather than vice-versa, City Counsel is considering lending PGW $45 million.
The bill proposing this two-year loan notes that, even if PGW obtains a rate increase from the PUC, the rate increase "would not take effect in time to infuse PGW with sufficient cash to enable [it] to buy natural gas for the coming winter and meet payroll obligations."
(Bill No. 000590, introduced 9/21/00.)
PGW's Five Year Financial 
2
8
II.
THE GENESIS OF THIS INVESTIGATION
In 1998, the Philadelphia Daily News ran a series of articles about financial irregularities at PGW, detailing how PGW executives paid themselves relocation expense reimbursements far in excess of the amounts permitted by their contracts, and how PGW awarded additional compensation to several executives to ease their tax burden and then reversed the bookkeeping entry reflecting these payments.
The articles also exposed the fact that PGW executives had used their corporate credit cards for lavish personal spending; that the CEO had given thousands of dollars of PGW's money to his alma mater; and that PGW had paid at least one consultant extraordinary sums without any contract in place, among other financial irregularities.
At the same time that the Daily News was publishing these revelations, someone was sending anonymous letters to Mayor Rendell concerning these abuses.
In the course of our investigation, we became aware that the anonymous letters may have been sent to Rendell, not by some public-spirited PGW employee who was concerned that PGW was not well managed, but by a citizen motivated by personal animosity toward certain PGW senior executives.
In view of these allegations of possible criminality, this matter was submitted to the County Investigating Grand Jury on 10/20/98.
That grand jury heard evidence and returned a presentment against Sharbutt, to be kept under seal until the conclusion of this investigation.
When the grand jury's term expired before this investigation had been completed, the investigation was submitted to the presently empaneled County Investigating Grand Jury.
9
III.
PFMC'S SEARCH FOR NEW EXECUTIVE MANAGEMENT: How Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt Were Hired
Introduction In 1995, PFMC committed to conducting a national search for a new Chief Executive Officer, Chief Operating Officer, and Chief Financial Officer.
PGW hired a professional search firm, at a cost of almost $137,000, to conduct the search.
Concurrently, City Council amended the Management Agreement Act to significantly increase the proposed salaries for these executive positions, so as to attract highly qualified candidates.
Working with the search firm over a period of months, a PFMC committee reviewed dozens of resumes and interviewed multiple candidates, before presenting its final choices to the full Board for a vote.
Despite these search efforts, however, PFMC ultimately chose three men whose legacy at PGW is so notorious that it could have done no worse by pulling names from a hat.
This chapter discusses how Hawes, Martin, and Sharbutt were hired: what the Board knew about them when it offered them the positions at PGW, and what could have been known, had a proper search been conducted.
We hope our findings will influence PGW's next executive search.
The mistakes made here should never be repeated in any future executive search.
The search process Having committed to a professionally conducted executive search, in July, 1995, PGW hired Cole, Warren 
PGW's contract with CWL provided for payment of CWL's fees, costs and expenses not to 3 exceed $124,687.
Subsequently, PGW paid CWL an additional $12,000, to compensate it for meeting with 12 "stakeholders" outside of the search committee to solicit their views of the qualifications that the candidates for the various positions ought to possess.
These "stakeholders" included the Gas Commission members, three PFMC members, the PGW union president, the Public Advocate, the City Solicitor, and Mayor Rendell.
When he appeared before the grand jury, Ronald Cole of CWL explained that soliciting the views of these "stakeholders" "was Rotan Lee's idea, and correctly so, to From FY 96 through FY 98, PGW paid CWL a total of $243,954, part of which was to develop an executive incentive compensation program.
During the same time period, PGW paid Gans 
3
10
try to get as much input as possible to smooth any water later on if somebody got a little angry that this is not the kind of person they wanted in the job."
Meanwhile, PFMC had organized a search committee consisting of three Board members: co-chairs Kathryn Engebretson and Andre Dennis, and Ben Hayllar.
The committee worked through the late summer and fall of 1995, and eventually selected candidates for each position to present to the full Board.
Engebretson recalled that the committee presented Hawes and one other person to the Board as candidates for the CEO position, and presented only Martin and Sharbutt as candidates for the COO and CFO positions.
The search committee and the Board were unanimous in their decision to hire Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt.
Once the Board had made its selection, the City Solicitor, Joseph Dworetzky, drafted the contracts.
The contracts were for an initial three-year term, with a two-year extension if the candidate's performance was acceptable to the Board.
The contracts included compensation that far eclipsed what the head of any City agency or department earned: Hawes -- Salary of $285,000 per year, with incentive compensation up to $75,000 per year.
Martin -- Salary of $212,000 per year, with incentive compensation up to $45,000 per year.
Sharbutt -- Salary of $175,000 per year, with incentive compensation up to $30,000 per year.
Each of the three contracts also provided for possible merit increases in salary beginning in the third year of the contract.
Additionally, the contacts provided that Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt would each be given the "use of a personal company automobile of choice (leased), provided such automobile shall be of domestic manufacture," with no limitation on the lease amount.
While these contracts were being drafted, CWL had background checks performed.
Rotan Lee testified that "deep background checks" were done on Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt: [F]inding the work was very a utility as a process.
They these persons right people to make this Gas Company important ... because it's tough to run government.
So this was a very rigorous did deep background checks, and all of had stellar backgrounds.
Contrary to Lee's mistaken belief that "deep background checks" were done, however, we found that at best only perfunctory background checks were performed, and that, as to Sharbutt
11
in particular, he had nothing remotely like a stellar background.
CWL did not conduct the background checks, but instead subcontracted that job to Reliable Research LLC. CWL's records reflect that, at least as to Hawes and Martin, it obtained their written consent to the release of various records and information.
CWL then faxed these consent forms to Reliable Research, requesting "a pre-employment investigation ... to include criminal, motor vehicle, and education verification checks."
Reliable and Martin, a been verified searched for Research in turn faxed back, at least as to Hawes multi-page report noting, e.g., what degrees had and with whom, and what jurisdictions had been criminal records and the results.
Having received this information, CWL sent a letter to Andre Dennis stating, as to Hawes, that it had received a written report from Reliable Research, LLC, which had verified the candidate's social security number, criminal history, credit analysis, motor vehicle history, and educational records, and that all degrees had been verified and there was no adverse information regarding a criminal history, driving record or credit rating.
CWL sent a similar letter to Dennis concerning Martin.
Attached to each letter, CWL included summaries of its telephone interviews with the references supplied by Hawes and Martin.
CWL did not send the actual background reports prepared by Reliable Research, or any other elaboration on the information in these two-sentence letters -- nor, apparently, did PFMC request this.
In our review of CWL's files, we could not find any form from Sharbutt consenting to a background investigation, nor could we find any report from Reliable Research about him.
Thus, we cannot verify that a background investigation on Sharbutt was performed.
We did find a letter from CWL to Dennis similar to those noted above for Hawes and Martin, which suggests that some background investigation was performed.
Additionally, as it had with Hawes and Martin, CWL provided summaries of interviews with Sharbutt's references.
We performed our own background investigation of Sharbutt, and found evidence that would have precluded any responsible Board from offering him the position of Chief Financial Officer.
We discuss below the findings of our background investigation.
We also discuss our findings and observations about the salaries offered to all three.
12
Hawes PFMC agreed to pay Hawes a yearly salary of $285,000, with incentive compensation up to $75,000 per year and possible merit increases in his salary beginning in the third year of his contract.
We find that the salary offered to Hawes was unnecessarily inflated.
Before coming to PGW, Hawes had worked for US West, a telecommunications company, from 1984 to 1995.
He had held a variety of positions there, ultimately serving as vice president and CEO of Operations in Nebraska from October, 1990, until his resignation in June, 1995.
Our review of Hawes' personnel records at US West revealed that, before coming to PGW, he was earning a yearly base salary of $150,000, with stock options and possible bonuses.
After announcing his resignation from US West in June, 4 5 1995, Hawes sent his resume to CWL.
In his cover letter to CWL, he stated that he was interested in finding a position with a salary "in the $150-250K range with competitive perquisites."
He also stated that, while he was primarily interested in remaining When Hawes resigned from US West, his resignation was front-page news in Omaha.
In that article, Hawes gave three different reasons for resigning: Had he remained with the company, he would have had to move west to advance farther up the corporate ladder; his father was sick in Georgia and he wanted to care for him; and his children (ages 4 and 5) were starting school and public education was very important to him, so he wanted to remain in Omaha.
"Hawes to Leave U S West Post; Cites Family Considerations," Omaha World Herald, 6/14/95, p. 1.
We subpoenaed Hawes' records from US West.
These records include a Severance Agreement, Release and Waiver, dated 6/9/95.
Pursuant to this Agreement, Hawes was given $225,000 as a negotiated severance payment; the right to exercise stock options under a pre-existing stock option plan; a pro-rata portion of his bonus and a pro-rata portion of the cash value of any amount that would have been payable under an executive long-term incentive plan; certain health benefits; $6,000 in lieu of an allowance for financial counseling; and career guidance services through an outside consulting firm selected by US West.
Thus, Hawes' name was "on file" with CWL when CWL signed the contract with PGW in July, 1995, and CWL included Hawes in its 9/7/95 Candidate Progress Report on its executive search for a Chief Operating Officer.
However, CWL did not include Hawes in its 9/7/95 Candidate Progress Report on the executive search for a Chief Executive Officer, the position for which he ultimately was hired.
5 4
13
in Omaha or relocating to the Southeast, he would consider other opportunities.
Although Hawes told CWL that he wanted to make $150,000 to $250,000, PFMC hired him (when he had been out of work for six months) at $285,000, with a possible $75,000 bonus.
Apparently, there was very little bargaining; the position specifications for CEO, finalized in August, 1995, provided that the salary "will be in the range of $250,000 - $280,000 plus possible ... incentive compensation ..., executive perquisites, and benefits."
Clearly, the Board had decided in advance to pay unnecessarily high salaries, and so did not bargain with particular candidates who most likely would have come for significantly less.
Thus, the Board ultimately agreed to pay Hawes a salary in excess of what Hawes was looking for and in excess of its own salary specifications.
Martin We also find that, as with Hawes, PFMC could have hired a Chief Operating Officer at a substantially lesser salary than it offered Martin.
Prior to coming to PGW, Martin had been employed by Equitable Gas in Pittsburgh for seven years.
His employment records at Equitable show that he was hired there in 1989 as Manager of Gas Supply, promoted in 1993 to Vice President of Gas Management, and (with intervening merit raises increasing his yearly salary to $85,860 as of September, 1995) promoted again in December of 1995 to Vice President of Marketing and Gas Management, at a salary of $120,000 per year.
CWL's summary of its 10/4/95 interview with Martin states "His most notable advancement came just two weeks ago when he was named interim President of Equitable Gas Company, after the sudden resignation of the incumbent President."
Martin testified that Equitable Gas had about 700 employees.
Thus, just four months before PFMC offered Martin $212,000 a year to be COO at a utility with 2,000 employees, Martin was Vice President of Gas Management, earning $85,860 per year, at a company of 700 employees.
Including incentive compensation, PFMC effectively offered Martin triple the salary he was earning.
Again, we question whether there was any hard bargaining here -- and again we note that, if there was any, it may have been done solely by Martin, who testified that he was not looking for a new job when CWL approached him, and that CWL approached him twice about the COO position at PGW and he twice told them that he was not interested, before he ultimately agreed to come to Philadelphia to discuss the position.
14
Sharbutt It is nothing short of shocking to us that PFMC hired Sharbutt.
Had there been any reasonable inquiry into his background, PFMC never would have selected him as Chief Financial Officer, a position in which he had access to and responsibility for all of PGW's assets.
The derelictions of Reliable Research and/or CWL in conducting the background investigation, and PFMC's willingness to accept such a superficial investigation, had significant negative consequences for PGW. CWL presented Sharbutt to the PFMC search committee as one of several candidates whom it recommended for the position of CFO. Sharbutt had worked at Pacific Enterprises in California for 13 years in a variety of positions, including CFO, treasurer and controller.
After the PFMC Board members unanimously decided to hire Sharbutt, and while PFMC and Sharbutt were negotiating his contract, CWL conducted a background investigation on Sharbutt.
On 1/4/96, CWL sent Dennis (co-chair of the PFMC search committee) a letter -- similar to the one that it had sent concerning Hawes and Martin -- stating in its entirety: Attached are the personal reference summaries on Ramon N. Sharbutt.
As expected, no derogatory information was reported with regard to his competence or character.
A written report from Reliable Research, L.L.C. has verified [Sharbutt's] date of birth, social security number, criminal history, motor vehicle history, credit analysis and educational records.
His degree has been verified and there is no adverse information regarding his driving record or credit rating.
If you need additional information please call our offices.
Attached to this letter, telephone interviews with the butt.
CWL did not attach any Sharbutt's criminal history, sis, or educational records, CWL provided brief summaries of its five references supplied by Sharfurther information concerning motor vehicle history, credit analyand apparently none was requested.
We conducted our own background investigation of Sharbutt.
Virtually everything that we discovered about Sharbutt in our background investigation, Reliable Research and/or CWL could have learned on their own for the price of a few postage stamps, simply by mailing Sharbutt's signed releases to various institutions.
15
Sharbutt's Academic Credentials and Professional Certifications Sharbutt forwarded his resume to CWL under cover of letter dated 5/1/95.
That resume was false and fraudulent.
The resume lists under "EDUCATION": ALABAMA ('72) BS Accounting/Economics/MBA Studies, LASALLE ('92) MBA to Thesis HARVARD BUSINESS SCHOOL ('91), STANFORD ('94), MICHIGAN ('86) Advanced Executive Management Programs, CFM, CMA, Financial Executives Institute, Societies -- of Public Accountants, Rate 
Speaker/lecturer on financial, governmental, regulatory, industry services issues.
Subsequently, CWL retyped Sharbutt's resume in its own standard format and on its own paper, as it did for all the candidates whom it formally presented to PGW in its various "Candidate Progress Reports."
CWL's version of Sharbutt's resume in its Progress Report dated 8/24/95 shows his academic credentials as: LaSalle University Philadelphia, Pennsylvania M.B.A. to Thesis, 1992 University of Alabama Tuscaloosa, Alabama B.S., Accounting/Economics; 1972 MBA Studies Harvard Business School ('91), Stanford ('94) and Michigan ('85) Advanced Executive Management Programs, Certified Financial Manager and Certified Management Accountant A third version of Sharbutt's resume, in the CWL's version but without that company's name on was later presented to the Gas Commission.
That tical to the one above, but shows that LaSalle is LaSalle University New Orleans, Louisiana Graduate Studies, 1992 Copies of all three resumes are appended to this Report as Exhibits A - C.
The information in these resumes is inaccurate and misleading.
We found the facts to be significantly different, as follows.
same format as the stationery, version is idenin Louisiana:
16
Undergraduate Education After obtaining a GED, Sharbutt enrolled at John C. Calhoun State Technical Junior College (now called Calhoun Community College) in Decatur, Alabama.
Sharbutt attended Calhoun from 1966-1967, earning mostly C's.
Contrary to CWL's version of his resume, Sharbutt never attended the University of Alabama at Tuscaloosa; however, he did attend the University of Alabama at Huntsville -- for two semesters only -- in 1968.
Sharbutt's transcript from that school shows that he took four courses there, earning three C's, and an F in a course titled "Criminal Behavior."
He never received any degree from the University of Alabama.
Sharbutt then enrolled in Florence State University, graduating in January, 1973, with a B.S. in Accounting and a minor in Economics.
In 1974, Florence State was succeeded by the University of North Alabama; thus, Sharbutt's transcript is on University of North Alabama stationery.
However, the University of North Alabama is not affiliated with the University of Alabama.
Sharbutt's transcript from Florence State shows that he was a poor student.
His grades there include: Fundamentals of Math Money and Banking General Physical Science Introduction to Literature Principles of Organizations Men's and Women's Golf Men's and Women's Bowling F D D D D A A
He received B's and C's in his other courses, including Elementary Office Machines, Elementary Typing, Business Correspondence, accounting courses, and Badminton.
His transcript also shows that, in 1975, he took a single graduate course in Marketing at the University of North Alabama, and earned a B. Graduate Studies The resume that Sharbutt sent to CWL indicates that he completed an "MBA to thesis" at "LaSalle."
While Sharbutt did not specify in his resume where LaSalle is, we determined -- as did CWL eventually -- that the "LaSalle" at which Sharbutt registered was not LaSalle University in Philadelphia (which has no record of him ever attending), but LaSalle University in Mandeville, Louisiana (which confirmed that he had registered there).
17
LaSalle University in Mandeville, Louisiana, is not listed in, e.g., Barron's Guide to Graduate Business Schools or The Princeton Review's Best 80 Business Schools; however, it is described in Bear's Guide to Earning Degrees Nontraditionally in a chapter titled "Degree Mills."
LaSalle is also described in detail by the federal government in a formal document filed by the U.S. Attorney's Office in federal court in Louisiana.
In that document, which was signed by LaSalle University's founder and director, Thomas Kirk, in connection with Kirk's guilty plea to mail fraud and tax evasion, the government states that LaSalle University was created by Kirk in 1989 as the World Christian Church, d/b/a (doing business as) LaSalle University.
LaSalle advertised in magazines and newspapers as a degree-granting correspondence university offering Bachelors, Masters and Doctorate degrees in engineering, computer science, and law (J.D.), among numerous other areas of study.
These advertisements also stated that LaSalle awarded credit for "work/life experience," and provided a 1-800 number for further 6 information.
That Sharbutt intended to simply purchase an MBA/Ph.D.
through the mail is clearly evidenced by his own words in a letter that he wrote to LaSalle a few months after he was hired at PGW.
In the letter, which we obtained when we subpoenaed his records from LaSalle, Sharbutt stated: I originally registered for the MBA/PhD Program with the specific request to take advantage of your accelerated program which allowed completion in a four month period without a thesis or dissertation based on my extensive experience level in business.
After completing all of the steps and submitting my "Professional Project" I was told that I would have to complete the Thesis and Dissertation.
I was never able to complete such a project and have from the beginning been very unhappy with the change in the requirement from the original time and method implied when I paid the first years fees in advance.
....
Had Sharbutt submitted an M.B.A./Ph.D "thesis," he would not likely have found it subjected to any exacting review.
As noted by the federal government in court records: United States v. Thomas J. Kirk, II, No. 96-274, "Factual Basis" filed in connection with Kirk's guilty plea.
Kirk used the "church" structure to evade taxes on the millions that he made operating his "university."
6
18
Certain graders have admitted they were unable to evaluate on the basis of content, but simply provided a grade based on the volume and weight of the submission.
...
At no time did LaSalle ever have more than ten (10) graders in spite of a student enrollment in excess of 6000 students.
We also subpoenaed from LaSalle, among other records, documentation indicating what courses Sharbutt had completed there.
In response, we received only a single "Final Grade Card," showing a grade of "Pass" for "Prof. Individual Analysis" on 12/6/93.
We also received records showing that Sharbutt had been granted exemptions from numerous other courses, based on his "undergraduate courses" and "work experience."
Significantly, Sharbutt's attempt to obtain an M.B.A./Ph.D.
from this diploma mill was a calculated decision that he pursued even after he had been hired at PGW, when he wrote the letter quoted above.
Other Graduate Studies and Professional Certifications As noted above, the resume that Sharbutt sent to CWL included under Education: HARVARD BUSINESS SCHOOL ('91), STANFORD ('94), MICHIGAN ('86) Advanced Executive Management Programs, CFM, CMA, Financial Executives Institute, Societies -- of Public Accountants, Rate 
Speaker/lecturer on financial, governmental, regulatory, industry services issues.
CWL retyped this as: Harvard Business School ('91), Stanford ('94) and Michigan ('85) Advanced Executive Management Programs, Certified Financial Manager and Certified Management Accountant Consistent with this resume, the "Summary of Candidate Interview," prepared by CWL and submitted to PFMC Vice Chair Dennis on 9/21/95, states that "[Sharbutt] has also completed the Advanced Executive Management Programs at Michigan, Stanford, and Harvard which awarded him designations as Certified Financial Manager (CFM), and Certified Management Accountant."
We learned, however, that "CFM" and "CMA" (the professionally recognized abbreviations for "Certified in Financial Management" and "Certified Management Accountant"), are awarded only by the Institute of Certified Management Accountants and only to
19
applicants who, among other prerequisites, have passed a fourpart test.
The Managing Director of the Institute of Certified Management Accountants informed us that Sharbutt does not hold either the CMA or the CFM certificate.
The Managing Director noted that "Sharbutt does appear to be a member of our parent organization, the Institute of Management Accountants. ...
[However], the mere fact of membership i
Sharbutt admitted in his grand jury testimony that he is neither a Certified Management Accountant nor a Certified Financial Manager.
Asked why he listed "CMA" on his resume, he replied that he had taken a course to prepare for the test, and that is all that he meant to imply.
As to the CFM designation that he listed on his resume, Sharbutt explained, "I took a course at Harvard, and they gave me this CFM designation.
It's Corporate Financial Manager."
We found that in 1991, Sharbutt had attended a two-week course at Harvard for executives, called Corporate Financial Management.
However, the course in no way results in the designation of CFM.
Harvard did not give Sharbutt a CFM; rather, Sharbutt awarded himself a CFM by just abbreviating the course name.
Clearly, no one at CWL or PFMC sought to have these certifications verified.
Nonetheless, PGW was pleased to put forth these certifications publicly, for example, in its biographical information on Sharbutt in the "Official Statement of the City of Philadelphia, Pennsylvania respecting its $287,185,000 Gas Works Revenue Bonds," June 3, 1998.
We also investigated Sharbutt's claims to have attended Stanford University.
When we asked Sharbutt what he meant by "Stanford ('94)" on his resume, he stated that he took a course, sponsored by the Stanford Alumni Association, at a facility near Lake Tahoe.
Finally, we investigated Sharbutt's claim, on his resume, that he attended "Michigan" (whether University of Michigan, or Michigan State University, his resume does not specify).
When we asked Sharbutt what he meant by "Michigan ('86)", Sharbutt replied that he had taken courses, sponsored by a company called Depreciation Programs Incorporated, that were held at Western Michigan University and at the University of Michigan.
Sharbutt said that he never received any grades for these courses, although he was given certificates.
We were able to verify only that, in 1989 and 1990, Sharbutt took one-week courses sponsored by Depreciation Programs, Inc.
He was never enrolled at the University of Michigan, Michigan State, or Western Michigan University.
Sharbutt's Military Service
20
Sharbutt's resume states "Veteran - Military Intelligence," without designating in which branch of the military he served, his rank, assignment, or tour of duty.
We obtained his military records and learned that he enlisted in the Army and was assigned as a Private to Army bands.
He was then sent to a Signal Support battalion in Germany, where he was assigned to work as a mailroom clerk, a switchboard operator, and a clerk typist.
After one year in the military, Sharbutt was discharged "because of Unsuitability."
Certificates signed by his Commanding Officer, sergeant, and other personnel state, e.g., that Sharbutt "will always be a liability"; "He is of no value to the service and in my opinion should be eliminated"; "He failed on numerous occasions to get out of bed or to make formations ...."
The words "Military Intelligence" are nowhere in Sharbutt's Army record.
Once again, we find Sharbutt's resume to be false.
Sharbutt's credit history In CWL's 1/4/96 letter to PFMC Board member Dennis, CWL asserted that "A written report from Reliable Research, L.L.C. has verified [Sharbutt's] ... credit analysis....
[T]here is no adverse information regarding his ... credit rating."
However, there was information about his credit history that should have caused concern.
Our own review of Sharbutt's credit history showed that, in December, 1995 (a few weeks before he signed his contract with PFMC), Sharbutt had 22 credit cards or lines of credit, on which he owed $101,390.
Although he had substantial credit card debt, Sharbutt nonetheless had "good" credit, because he almost always made at least the minimum payment on his dozens of cards, and he rarely was late; thus, he was a credit card company's dream customer -- carrying high balances and incurring significant interest charges, but always paying at least the minimum owed each month.
However, making only minimum payments meant that Sharbutt would continue to accrue substantial interest charges.
In fact, Sharbutt was assessed $11,206 in interest in 1996, $10,092 in 1997, and $14,423 in 1998, for a total of $35,722 in interest charges on his credit debt during his years at PGW.
Moreover, making only minimum payments meant that it could take Sharbutt decades to get out of debt.
the In of and he Sharbutt's significant credit card debt continued through years that he was CFO at PGW, despite his high salary there.
December, 1996, he owed $58,571 on 21 credit cards and lines credit; in December, 1997, he owed $76,159 on 20 credit cards lines of credit; and in December, 1998 (just two weeks before was fired from PGW), he owed $132,220 on 27 credit cards and
21
lines of credit.
These amounts were Sharbutt's liabilities exclusive of his mortgage payments on two houses in California (one of which he sold in 1995, and the other in 1996) and his Philadelphia residence (which he purchased in 1996), and also exclusive of $523 per week support payments that he was making to his wife, starting in late 1996, pursuant to an Agreement for Order of Support filed in Family Court in Philadelphia.
Sharbutt not only had significant debt, he also had little, if any, equity in his properties.
When he sold his primary residence in Valencia, California, he received only $1,629 at settlement.
When he sold his second house in Big Bear Lake, California, he had to pay $6,280 above the selling price.
Sharbutt purchased his Philadelphia residence for $224,000 in 1996 and sold it for $200,000 in 1999.
At settlement, he had to pay approximately $17,557.
Sharbutt could have paid off his credit card debt, but chose not to.
In the 10 bank accounts and investment funds that Sharbutt maintained during some or all of the three years that he was at PGW and of which we are aware, Sharbutt had the following balances: in December, 1995, he had $84,270; in December, 1996, he had $167,272; in December, 1997, $183,910, and in December, 8 1998, $434,187.
We asked Sharbutt why he did not consolidate his debts, and why he carried such high debt when he had sufficient funds to pay it all off.
Sharbutt replied that it was "Just the way I do things" and "personal choice."
But the way Sharbutt did things -- incurring ever-increasing debt without any serious effort to reduce that debt -- is not the way prudent Chief Financial Officers do things.
Had the Board known of Sharbutt's credit history, it certainly would have questioned whether he could manage PGW's finances.
Moreover, had the Board been aware of Sharbutt's substantial personal debt, it may have reasoned that he might be tempted to dishonesty (e.g., embezzlement), and/or that he might act irresponsibly with corporate credit cards.
Sharbutt's Criminal History In its 1/4/96 letter, CWL informed Dennis that "A written report from Reliable Research, L.L.C. has verified [Sharbutt's] ... criminal history...."
The letter, as phrased, could suggest Almost all of these credit cards/lines of credit were in Sharbutt's name alone.
A few were in the joint names of Sharbutt and his wife.
There is no evidence that this increase in Sharbutt's wealth was stolen from PGW, except as noted in this Report.
8 7
7
22
that Sharbutt told Reliable that he had a criminal history and Reliable verified that in fact he did.
Similar language was used in CWL's letters concerning Hawes and Martin -- neither of whom had any criminal record.
We think that CWL simply used an awkward choice of words, but one which should have generated questions.
Our own investigation showed that Sharbutt was arrested in Los Angeles in 1987 and charged with corporal injury to a spouse or cohabitant.
When the charges were presented to the District Attorney's Office, it declined prosecution.
While the charges were essentially "dropped," we question whether Reliable Research 9 advised CWL of the fact of the arrest.
Moreover, we note our concern that apparently no one on the search committee asked CWL what it meant when it said that it had "verified [Sharbutt's] criminal history."
Sharbutt's prior employment at Pacific Enterprises From 1982 to 1995, Sharbutt worked for Southern California Gas Company, a subsidiary of Pacific Enterprises (hereinafter "PE").
He resigned from that company in September, 1995, and interviewed with the PFMC search committee in October, 1995.
While it is unclear whether Sharbutt informed PFMC that he had resigned or whether PFMC even asked, had the Board made any inquiry about him to his former employer before offering him the CFO position, it might have learned that his prior employer was investigating him for fraud.
As we discuss in the next chapter, Sharbutt's prior employer, PE, filed suit against Sharbutt in California in March, 1996, accusing him of fraud in connection with expense reports that he submitted from 1991 to 1994.
In the suit, PE alleged that the fraud became evident as the result of an internal investigation into an unrelated matter in August, 1995.
Thus, had PFMC made inquiries before hiring Sharbutt in December, 1995, it might have learned of PE's allegations against Sharbutt.
Before it hired him, the Board was aware that Sharbutt had "problems" at PE. Possibly anticipating a more thorough background investigation than was performed, and demonstrating that the best defense is a good offense, Sharbutt blunted the impact The background reports that Reliable Research sent CWL for Hawes and Martin show that it searched the criminal records in only a few jurisdictions (Omaha and Boston for Hawes, and Allegheny county (Pittsburgh) for Martin), and only for arrests within the last seven years.
Because we could not find any Reliable Research report on Sharbutt, we do not know in what jurisdictions Reliable searched, or how far back.
9
23
of any inquiry to PE by volunteering (and minimizing) the fact that there were problems, during the interview process at PGW.
As Hayllar recalled, Sharbutt "made it clear that he was unhappy at Pacific Enterprises, that new management had taken over this huge Southern California utility company and that he was on the outs with his boss.
He was very up front about all of that."
But no one at CWL or PFMC ever called Sharbutt's former boss to try to determine why new management was "on the outs" with Sharbutt.
Apparently the Board (or at least those members to whom this explanation was given) accepted at face value Sharbutt's explanation that the friction between him and his former employer was the fault of the employer.
Conclusion As CFO, Sharbutt had oversight of a utility with annual operating revenues of approximately $500 million.
He was authorized to initiate wire transfers of millions of dollars.
He had "signature approval" authority for payment of invoices up to $250,000.
He was responsible for the financial statements provided to PGW's external auditors, which in turn become a component of bond offerings.
And, of course, he was given a corporate credit card.
Given this, Reliable Research and/or CWL, and the PFMC Board, exercised an unconscionable lack of care in obtaining and scrutinizing the background investigation on Sharbutt.
In their testimony before us, Board members repeatedly noted that they relied upon CWL, and Ronald Cole of CWL clearly relied upon Reliable Research.
And Reliable Research -- which was not what its name implies -- seems to have gone out of business; we were unsuccessful in our attempts to locate any member of that company.
But neither the Board nor Cole knew precisely what inquiries Reliable had made (e.g., what Reliable meant by "his credit analysis has been verified").
The failure to conduct a proper background investigation of Sharbutt is significant because, as discussed in the following chapters, after being hired as CFO at PGW, he forged documents and misappropriated funds.
In the end, for the $137,000 of ratepayer money spent on this executive search, PGW hired three men, two whom it fired and one who resigned amid a public scandal -- and none of whom properly managed PGW.
For their money, the ratepayers got next to nothing.
24
IV.
THE ALLEGATIONS OF SHARBUTT'S PRIOR EMPLOYER: "The Sharbutt Problem" and the Kroll Report
At the time that the PFMC Board offered Sharbutt the CFO position at PGW, Sharbutt was under investigation by his prior employer, Pacific Enterprises ("PE"), to determine whether he had misappropriated funds.
We learned the following.
Prior to his employment at PGW, Sharbutt was employed at PE for 13 years, as CFO, treasurer, and controller, among other positions.
He resigned in September, 1995, and began working at PGW in January, 1996.
In late March, 1996, PE filed a lawsuit against Sharbutt and other unnamed persons.
In the Complaint, PE alleged that, in August, 1995, during an internal investigation of an unrelated matter, the company had discovered that, between 1991 and 1994, Sharbutt used his corporate credit card and submitted expense reports for personal expenses and expenses never incurred.
In sum, PE alleged that Sharbutt, "by means of false and fraudulent representations and entries on business records ... misappro10 priated ... $31,198.45 ...."
In late March, 1996, on the same day that PE filed its Complaint, David Viehman and Stephen Coulter of Deloitte 
Viehman and Coulter informed Hayllar that Deloitte would be unable to accept any financial information provided by Sharbutt; however, they gave no explanation, insisting that they were precluded from doing so by their ethical obligations under the AICPA ethical Code of Professional Conduct.
Hayllar and Rotan Lee met with Sharbutt and asked him about Deloitte's refusal to accept financial information from him.
Sharbutt offered his version of the matter.
As Hayllar recalled in his grand jury testimony: Ray [Sharbutt] said he wasn't surprised.
He said that he had a dreadful relationship, this is the second time he said it but with more detail, with his boss at Pacific Enterprises and as much as they wanted to get rid of him, with all the old management, they were unable to do that and that they had made allegations concerning him and held his back pay and also held his deferred compensation ....
*** Pacific Enterprises Inc. and Pacific Energy (A Subsidiary of Pacific Enterprises) v. Ramon N. Sharbutt and Does One Through 25, No. BC146825.
10
25
Ray then listed the allegations they made about him and this is the first time we heard about them.
One was that he exceeded his expense account for decorating his office.
Second, he had taken first class airline tickets, paid for by the company, and converted them to coach and pocketed the cash difference.
Third, that he had seen to the destruction of documents that were necessary by the Federal Energy Regu11 latory Commission, FERC. ...[ ] Hayllar spoke again with Deloitte, who acknowledged that it was the outside auditor for PE. Hayllar testified: My feeling at the time was that Deloitte had ... a huge client in California and they have a not so big client in Philadelphia and to appease the client in California who was clearly making a lot of changes, they had taken this position where they became an instrument of retaliation ... 12 against Ramon Sharbutt.[ ]
Thereafter, when PE would not respond to its inquiries, PGW hired Kroll Associates, a private investigations firm, to look into the allegations against Sharbutt.
PGW paid Kroll $18,529 for its work.
In May, 1996, PE withdrew its suit against Sharbutt, but without prejudice to refile it.
In June, 1996, Kroll Associates provided its report to Hayllar.
The Kroll report and follow-up letter The Kroll report set forth Sharbutt's account of events at PE and "the reasons he believes certain [PE] executives are trying to unfairly smear him...," as well as Sharbutt's understanding of the nature of the allegations against him.
The report then presented summaries of interviews it had conducted with seven different people, some of whom had first-hand knowledge of the situation and some of whom did not, and some of whom spoke well of Sharbutt and one of whom -- "Source B" -- emphatically did not.
The report did not attempt to draw any conclusions about where the truth lay among the conflicting views.
Confidential Source "A" -- Source A was identified as a "very high level source at Pacific Enterprises."
The Kroll We asked Sharbutt why he believed that his former employer would make allegations against him, and he said that his employer was angry that he had quit after they had guaranteed him a job.
("They were really mad because I left.")
12 11
From FY 96 through FY 98, PGW paid Deloitte $521,386.
26
report stated that this source believed that the destruction of the records was "not more than a possible mistake or misunderstanding."
The report further stated that the source believed that Sharbutt was "an upstanding individual" whom he had never found to be dishonest.
The report noted that the source believed that certain matters involving Sharbutt's expense report activities may have been "elevated beyond what they should have been" because "someone [at PE] wanted him out."
Confidential Source "B" -- Kroll noted that "this source is familiar to us, and is considered by us to be extremely reliable, knowledgeable and professional."
The report states in pertinent part: The source made the following statements: The investigation disclosed many unsubstantiated entries in [the company's] books, and other indications that Sharbutt was "playing games with the financial statements."
There were a lot of reserves on the books that could not be substantiated.
Evidence was also discovered that Sharbutt had falsified his expense reports and reversed entries in the subsidiary's books relating to his personal moving expenses, so that he wouldn't have to pay back monies owed to the company.
Other improprieties had to do with running through costs of business travel airline tickets twice ... and cashing in higher priced airline tickets for lower fares and pocketing the difference.
According to the source, there was also evidence that Sharbutt may been falsifying invoices to recover costs associated with his personal interest in collectibles.
... ...
The source believed that Sharbutt may have returned some of the money to avoid criminal prosecution.
Confidential Source C was a "long-time mid-level financial management employee" who said (as paraphrased by Kroll), among other things, that "As far as allegations regarding Sharbutt's expense reports, he may have put through some questionable items of no real monetary significance.
...
These allegations fall into a somewhat 'gray' area."
The Source also stated that he did not feel that Sharbutt would ever be involved in anything with any real significant consequences.
Source D -- John Shatkus John Shatkus was the Pacific Enterprises Manager of Audits.
The Kroll report states in pertinent part: Shatkus stated that P.E. was in the process of evaluating Sharbutt's response to some "questionable items" and that the entire matter "might be cleared up."
He further stated
27
that he was not pre-judging the matter and that it "possibly could be worked out."
Shatkus was very specific in expressing the fact that he was not necessarily accusing Sharbutt 13 of anything fraudulent....[ ] Source E was a woman who had been Sharbutt's secretary for two years.
She stated that she knew nothing about the allegations but said that she felt that Sharbutt was "very straightforward and forthcoming" and could be trusted.
Source F was the former Chief Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) things) that "Sharbutt was always a "unethical is the last word I would of Audit for the Federal who stated (among other straight arrow," and use to characterize him."
Source G was Sharbutt's attorney.
After receiving the Kroll report, Hayllar asked Kroll to reinterview Source B. Kroll did, and sent a letter shortly thereafter; however, this letter, like the Kroll report, did not come to any concrete conclusion about the veracity of the allegations.
These documents contained summaries of allegations, not hard evidence, and we do not know the original evidence underlying these allegations.
We do not know whether the allegations were true.
The issue of concern to us is not whether the allegations made by PE were ultimately proved or disproved -- because, in June, 1996, the Board only knew that the allegations had been made, and not whether they were true -- but rather, whether, after Hayllar received the Kroll report and alerted the Board to its contents, Hayllar and the Board responded in a wise and prudent manner.
That is, knowing what they knew, should they have resolved the matter as they did? Shatkus (along with PE's security officer) went to the Los Angeles County District Attorney's Office in April or May, 1996, to report that Sharbutt had embezzled approximately $31,000.
We obtained the L.A. District Attorney's "Charge Evaluation Worksheet," which summarizes their statements and includes a chart of Sharbutt's "Questionable Charges."
The "Charge Evaluation Worksheet" indicates that prosecution was declined because of insufficient evidence.
The worksheet noted, inter alia, that "many records necessary to substantiate allegations have been destroyed."
Interestingly in light of Shatkus' complaint that Sharbutt had embezzled $31,000, we noted that, in September, 1996, Sharbutt brought Shatkus to Philadelphia.
Sharbutt's PGW expense report includes $2,290 of expenses for this trip for Shatkus and his spouse.
Sharbutt told us that he brought Shatkus here to interview for a position with PGW's Internal Audit department.
13
28
The Board's response to the Kroll report and letter Hayllar told the grand jury that the Kroll report was "summarized to the Board," and the Board discussed what became known as "the Sharbutt problem" in great detail, in executive session (meaning no minutes were taken).
However, he did not know whether any Board member actually read the report.
He said that the Board was in agreement about how to handle the situation, and that the only difference of opinion was that some members felt that the Board should offer a greater level of support to Sharbutt.
When we questioned the Board members, most said that they had little memory of the allegations in the Kroll report.
For example, shown the Kroll report and letter, Rotan Lee (who was Chairman of the Board when the "Sharbutt problem" arose) said that he did not recall ever seeing them.
However, he said that he thought that Hayllar made one or more presentations to the Board about "the Sharbutt problem."
Andre Dennis (then vice-chairman of the PFMC Board) said that he had never seen the Kroll report and follow-up letter, although it was possible that the Board had sent him copies.
Dennis explained that he had been involved in a long trial and so did not attend Board meetings from April through July, 1996.
He said that he had heard "that there was some question about [Sharbutt's] previous employer, but I don't know the details of it."
Kathryn Engebretson, another Board member, said that she did not receive a copy of the Kroll report, but that she was aware that Kroll did an investigation and that, at the end, Hayllar was comfortable with Sharbutt continuing in his current role.
Although she said that, had she seen the report and follow-up letter, she would have been more concerned, she probably would not have raised the issue of buying out Sharbutt's contract.
Reverend Moore testified that he could not recall that Deloitte had refused to work with Sharbutt, or that there were any problems with Sharbutt's previous employer.
He said "I do recall at one point, ...
[Lee] advised me that there was some concerns.
He was not specific about it...."
Reverend Moore said that he did not ask Lee what the problems were.
Helen Pudlin, a member of the Board at the time, stated: ...
I never saw that [Kroll] Report [or]
I saw the question of whether we could rely on Mr. Sharbutt's integrity as being the standard to consider in whether to take action.
At the time, no one knew if the allegations were credible.
...
Ultimately, he was given the benefit of the doubt.
29
William Marrazzo, another Board member, likewise was unfamiliar with the Kroll report and letter.
Asked whether, at some point, he became aware of allegations against Sharbutt, Marrazzo testified: "Indirectly, the Board was advised that those accusations were impacting on PGW's ability to get a clean opinion from our outside auditor."
Marrazzo said that, "The issue of ... doctoring his reimbursement requests ... would have been of concern to me. ...
Had I known that, I would have suggested that the Board have our internal auditor conduct [sic] the expense reimbursement practices of these individuals."
The Board members were not the only ones who testified that they did not have much knowledge or memory of the allegations against Sharbutt.
Although Lee said that Hawes was involved and "doubtlessly he read the report," Hawes' testimony was to the contrary.
Asked why Sharbutt's duties were changed in July, 1996, Hawes answered: A. As best I can remember, there was some discussion ... with [Deloitte] around one of their other clients who Mr. Sharbutt had worked for, and ... that said to them they want to know a little more before we have him approving the audits and records and so forth.
*** Did you ever find out what those issues were? No, I didn't.
I never got really involved with it, but some other people did.
I don't know what they were.
*** Did you understand that the issues that were raised were integrity issues? No, I never knew what they were.
Were you curious? A little.
Hayllar was involved, and he relied upon would rise or fall with [Hayllar]."
Asked in July, 1996, changing Sharbutt's duties, that was what I was told to do."
Q. A. Q. A. Q. A.
Hawes testified that Hayllar; "My concern why he wrote a memo Hawes said "Because
The resolution: the transfer of Sharbutt's duties to PGW's Controller and Chief Accounting Officer, Larry Hoffman Sharbutt's contract contained both a the Board to terminate his employment for cause, and also a provision permitting the employment without cause; however, if the butt without cause, it essentially had to provision permitting just and substantial Board to terminate his Board terminated Sharbuy out his contract.
Hayllar testified that he felt that the Kroll report and follow-up letter did not give him a basis to terminate Sharbutt's
30
employment for cause, and that the alternative -- buying out Sharbutt's contract -- would have been expensive and might have caused Sharbutt to sue them for damage to his reputation.
Additionally, Hayllar testified that he did not terminate Sharbutt because "There is also a level of justice ....
[Y]ou have got to prove the allegation and I expect life to have pretty much the same standard.
...
The same standards the District Attorney uses [i.e., proof beyond a reasonable doubt] are very similar to the standards of justice I think we tried to use."
Thus, to resolve the matter, Hayllar wrote to Viehman at Deloitte and told him that "Because of the enormity of the PGW budget process, Mr. Sharbutt will be responsible for budgeting and rate setting....
At this time, PGW's accounting and audit functions will be the responsibility of our controller, Mr. Hoffman, who will report directly to CEO Jim Hawes."
The following month, this transfer of duties was formalized.
Sharbutt's suit against Pacific Enterprises After his duties had been officially transferred to Hoffman, on 9/12/96, Sharbutt filed suit against PE, Deloitte, two employees at PE and 100 unknown individuals, filing a complaint for wrongful termination, defamation, libel, and slander, among other 14 causes of action.
Sharbutt subsequently amended his complaint to add additional defendants, among them Viehman at Deloitte's Philadelphia office.
He also added allegations of a grand conspiracy, involving dozens of people at PE and Deloitte.
Sharbutt's law suit was settled in February, 1998.
Hayllar testified before the grand jury that he flew to California and testified at the settlement proceeding.
Hayllar said that the [court] master "laid out what the compromise was, what my role would be ... and believe me, ...
it was fully the truth to say that I had lost some confidence in Ray Sharbutt because of this incident."
There are no transcripts from that proceeding, and the settlement is subject to a confidentiality order.
When Sharbutt testified before the grand jury, he said of the settlement proceeding: "[T]here was no testifying.
We just kind of met and just talked, and they said, okay, we're sorry, we were wrong and we'll write a letter or we'll tell you we're wrong."
Sharbutt further said that "There is a written apology from Deloitte which says they're [i.e., PE is] no longer concerned about the issues, so neither are we."
Sharbutt said that Ramon Sharbutt v. Pacific Enterprises, Inc.; Pacific Interstate Company; Pacific Interstate 
BC 157218.
14
31
he did not have a copy of this letter, which was sent to "Hayllar or to the Board or ... somebody."
We subpoenaed this letter from PGW but were informed that "there are no letters in our possession from Deloitte to either PGW or PFMC apologizing for statements Deloitte made concerning Mr. Sharbutt."
PGW did provide a letter, dated 5/28/98, from Viehman to Hayllar, stating: Since 1996, when we addressed, in detail, Mr. Sharbutt's responsibilities, we have received additional information from Pacific Enterprises ("PE") which updates the information available to us in 1996.
In summary, the new information indicates that the matters which came to our attention in 1996 regarding Mr. Sharbutt have been further investigated and are no longer being pursued by PE. ...
Our ability to work with or rely on the representations of Mr. Sharbutt as part of performing an audit of PGW's financial statements are [sic] no longer affected by the matters that we had discussed in 1996.
As we discussed, it remains the responsibility of PGW to consider PGW's control structure and to determine what Mr. Sharbutt's duties will be with respect to financial reporting.
As reflected in the Board minutes for October, 1998, Sharbutt's duties at PGW were officially returned to him.
Although Hayllar testified that he had "lost some confidence" in Sharbutt, the Board kept him on -- and offered to renew his contract.
Conclusion We are amazed that, having received the Kroll report and follow-up letter, the Board did not then immediately request an audit of Sharbutt's moving expense reimbursements and expense reports, including a review of whether he had actually used the airline tickets for which PGW had reimbursed him.
Had the Board expressed any interest in reviewing these items, it would have learned that he had fraudulently obtained reimbursement for an airline ticket which he had canceled, and it would have been alerted to the whole issue of moving expense reimbursement and credit card abuses long before the Daily News had something to write about.
We are surprised that PGW would pay Kroll for its report on the allegations against Sharbutt at PE, but not ask its own Internal Audit department to review Sharbutt's expenses at PGW -- expenses which the Board had a duty to monitor in any event.
We are loathe to be trite, but those who fail to learn from history are destined to repeat it, as happened here.
32
V.
RELOCATION EXPENSES OF HAWES, MARTIN AND SHARBUTT
Introduction The contracts that Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt signed with PGW's Board (PFMC) provided for reimbursement of relocation expenses, subject to certain limits.
Because the federal government treats relocation reimbursement as taxable compensation, the contracts also provided that PFMC would give Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt additional compensation to make up for the tax liability resulting from the reimbursement.
This additional compensation is known as "tax gross up."
Further, the contracts provided that PFMC would reimburse their temporary living expenses in Philadelphia as well as expenses that they and their spouses incurred during house-hunting trips.
However, the contracts set limits on these reimbursements.
Nevertheless, Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt were each reimbursed amounts far in excess of their contract limits.
In total, PGW spent $529,650 to relocate these three men and their families.
Because Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt were employees of PFMC, they should have submitted their relocation expenses to PFMC for approval.
Instead, Hawes and Sharbutt approved each other's expenses, and those of Martin.
Additionally, Sharbutt approved some of his own expenses.
Although the Board made some attempt to monitor the relocation expense reimbursements of Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt, it remained unaware of their excesses until Mayor Rendell received an anonymous letter in May, 1998, stating, among other things, that Hawes had overspent his moving allowance.
The Board responded by hiring an outside auditor in the summer of 1998.
This chapter discusses the reimbursements made to Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt in excess of their contractual limits.
It also discusses their failure to seek any proper authorization for such reimbursements, and the Board's failure to notice.
Hawes' Relocation Expenses Hawes moved to Philadelphia from Omaha, Nebraska in January, 1996.
At PGW's expense, Hawes stayed at the Double Tree Hotel for approximately one week.
He then moved to the Warwick Hotel, where he rented an apartment suite at PGW's expense for more than a year, while his new house was being built.
The Warwick suite had a living room, two bedrooms, a kitchen and a bathroom.
Hawes' wife and children joined him at the Warwick in late summer, 1996.
A friend, Fred Rodriguez, moved in with them that fall.
On 1/22/97, Hawes and his wife made settlement on their
33
newly constructed house in Mount Airy.
In total, PGW spent almost $300,000 for Hawes' house-hunting, temporary housing, moving expenses, settlement costs and tax gross up, as follows.
Moving expenses subject to 6(b) of Hawes' contract By contract, PFMC agreed to reimburse Hawes' moving expenses and closing costs, and to give him additional compensation to cover the tax liability resulting from these reimbursements, up to $90,000.
Specifically, paragraph 6(b) of his contract provided: PFMC shall pay HAWES' expenses related to the relocation of HAWES' personal property to an address within the City of Philadelphia and other expenses incidental to moving such as closing costs on sale and purchase, gross-up of moving expense reimbursements on account of taxes, and transfer tax not to exceed, in the aggregate, $90,000.
(Emphasis added.)
In spite for expenses covered in this $248,975 for these expenses, costs, the moving company's $128,941 was for "tax gross of the contractual limit of $90,000 subsection, however, PGW paid of which $120,034 was for closing bill, and similar charges, and up."
These expenses were as follows:
$ 43,266 -- Closing costs on sale of Omaha property.
This total includes real estate commissions, title insurance, transfer tax and the like.
It also includes $1,538 of interest on a swing loan, an expense not typically reimbursed.
$ 31,795 -- United Van Lines bill for packing/moving the Hawes' household goods from Omaha to Philadelphia.
The original moving bill was $50,826.
However, the Hawes' arranged their move through the law firm in Omaha at which Mrs. Hawes was employed, and United gave a 42% discount to the firm.
With the discount, the bill was $31,480 "if payment postmarked by 11/22/96" but $31,795 "if payment postmarked after 11/22/96."
Because the Hawes apparently did not request that PGW issue a check to United Van Lines until 1/30/97 (the date of Mrs. Hawes' memo to Hawes' secretary, including the United Van Lines bill), PGW paid the late payment penalty of $315.
$ 34,089 -- Closing costs on purchase of Philadelphia residence.
Hawes' closing costs in Philadelphia were high in part because he actually purchased two properties, one with a 6,000 square-foot house, and an adjacent property with a 3,000 square-foot "carriage house" that was still under construction, for $803,000.
Although there are two
34
Indentures (conveyances), one for Lot A and one for Lot B, both of which were conveyed to Hawes on the same day, there is only a single settlement sheet.
The settlement sheet shows different sellers for the two properties.
$ 5,000 -- Broker fee to Quinn 
$ 1,366 -- Rental car for Sheila Hawes.
Hawes charged a rental car, at PGW's expense, for his wife to use during her first two months in Philadelphia.
Although PGW paid to transport Hawes' three vehicles to Philadelphia from Omaha as part of his relocation, Hawes did not have these vehicles delivered until his newly constructed house was substantially complete in October, 1996, after his family had been living with him in Center City for two months.
Hawes told the grand jury that renting a car for his wife at ratepayer expense, prior to having his own vehicles shipped here, was "in my judgment, a very normal relocation expense."
$ 4,518 -- Expenses incurred in moving and unpacking.
As supporting documentation for this expense, Hawes submitted a typed memo dated 6/2/97, to "James Hawes III" from "Freddy Rodriquez."
The memo states: "For services rendered related to moving Hawes household, including unpacking 400+ boxes and crates, hook-up of washer and dryer, moving and assembly of pinball machines, assembly of furniture ..., packing and moving items from Warwick Hotel to new residence, etc. $4,218.50."
The memo bears the handwritten signature "Paid Fred Rodriguez."
Hawes did not submit any canceled check as proof of payment.
He testified that he paid Rodriguez half of this sum in cash and half by check to Rodriguez's mother.
We asked Hawes who Rodriguez was.
Hawes answered that his (Hawes') first wife was a high school guidance counselor in the late 1970s, and Rodriguez was a student of hers.
In 1996, Hawes brought Rodriguez to Philadelphia to sweep up for the contractor who was building his house, because the contractor could not "keep anyone" because he did not pay enough.
Rodriguez stayed with the Hawes at the Warwick for a short time while he worked on Hawes' house, and now (as of Hawes' testimony in 1999) lives in their basement and does odd jobs for them.
Through our own investigation, we determined that Rodriguez is a convicted sexual offender and burglar.
Court records show that Rodriguez pleaded no contest to First Degree Forcible Sexual Assault in Douglas County, Nebraska.
On 12/15/89, he was sentenced to 8 to 12 years imprisonment, with credit for time served from 7/11/89.
He was released from custody in January, 1996.
A criminal record check on
35
Rodriguez reflects other arrests, in Nebraska and Texas, for burglary and theft, and indicates that he used the alias "James Hawes" on at least one occasion.
When we asked Hawes about this, he said that he did not know exactly to what crime Rodriguez had pleaded guilty.
He said that one of the reasons that he had brought Rodriguez to Philadelphia was because "people like that" (i.e., convicted felons) have trouble getting a job "and so we were trying to help him get started and get out on his own.
I mean, that 15 was essentially what we were trying to do."
$319 -- Miscellaneous Hawes submitted for reimbursement of the $129 that it cost to ship his dog from Omaha, and for $190 to "install telephone lines/PGW use 
Although Hawes requested no reimbursement of moving expenses until January, 1997, between 1/22/97 and 2/6/97, he submitted three requests -- for reimbursement of his closing costs in Omaha and Philadelphia, and the United Van Lines bill -- totaling about $109,000.
Thus, with his very first set of reimbursement requests, he already was over his contract limit.
Hawes did not submit these requests for reimbursement to the Board, but instead submitted them to Sharbutt, who approved payment.
$128,941 -- Tax gross up PGW gave Hawes $128,941 in tax gross up, grossing up not only his closing costs, but also his temporary living and house-hunting expenses -- expenses to which the gross up Hawes testified that he knew that Rodriguez had a criminal record and had been sentenced to a lengthy prison term.
We found an invoice, paid by PGW, for a private detective to conduct a criminal record check on Rodriguez in February, 1998.
Shown the invoice and asked why PGW requested this check, Hawes said that Rodriguez told him he wanted a job at PGW, and Hawes said "try it if you want."
Rodriguez was rejected once Martin learned of his record.
Hugh Brydges, PGW's Director of Security, recalled that, when he gave the record check results to Martin: A. Q. A. Q. A. Q. A.
"I think he told me, go give it to Jim, or go show it to Jim."
What did Jim say? He didn't realize that it was still on his record or something.
So Jim already knew about it? Evidently.
Did Jim say anything else? No.
That was it.
15
36
provision in his contract did not apply.
37
Temporary housing expenses subject to 6(c) of Hawes' contract By contract, PFMC also agreed to pay Hawes' "expenses for temporary housing (furnished) for HAWES and his family not to exceed twelve months, commencing on the Effective Date of employment."
( 6(c)) Hawes lived at the Warwick from January, 1996 until February, 1997 -- staying approximately 3 weeks past the 12 month limit in his contract -- and charged a total of $34,741 in lodging, laundry, meals, phone, and "parking/other," all of which PGW paid.
Bruce Flamm, the independent auditor hired by the Board in the summer of 1998, calculated that Hawes incurred (and PGW paid) $2,286 of expenses after the 12-month limit in his contract had expired.
Hawes additionally was reimbursed beyond the limits of this provision of his contract because the contract did not require PGW to pay for Hawes' meals.
Despite that fact, Hawes freely acknowledged before the grand jury that he had charged PGW for virtually every meal that he ate in 1996, and many that his family ate, under his theory that PGW should pay for his meals as part of his relocation.
Asked whether there were any meals that he paid for out of his own pocket in his first year at PGW, Hawes told the grand jury, "Oh, I'm sure there would have been, but, I mean, I don't know."
Asked why he would have paid for a meal out of his own pocket if he believed that PGW was supposed to pay for his meals under his contract, Hawes replied that there may have been instances where he paid for sandwiches himself, as it would not have been worth his time to fill out an expense report for reimbursement.
By PGW's calculation, Hawes' "transition meals" cost $2,447.
By our calculation, Hawes charged PGW $8,684 for meals in Philadelphia from January, 1996 through January, 1997.
Hawes ate some of these meals alone, he ate some with his family during their five months at the Warwick, and he ate some on "business" with "stakeholders."
On his expense reports, he specifically identified only $326 of this as meals eaten with his family.
However, as to numerous meals, Hawes did not indicate on his expense report whether he ate with anyone; thus, he could have eaten those meals alone, with his family, or with stakeholders.
Hawes acknowledged that his contract did not specifically provide that PGW would reimburse him for the cost of meals that he and his family ate during their relocation.
However, he said that such reimbursement was implicitly provided for in the paragraph of his contract that provided for reimbursement of closing costs, transfer taxes, and tax gross up, as these were merely examples of moving costs, and meals were another example.
When Hayllar testified before us, he did not know that Hawes had charged his family's meals to PGW.
When informed of this
38
fact, Hayllar said "We've now moved beyond inappropriate to, I think that was wrong."
House hunting expenses subject to 6(d) of Hawes' contract Hawes' contract additionally provided that burse him for three house-hunting or relocation with his wife, in the first year of his contract was no dollar limit on this provision, pursuant culated that PGW paid more than $14,000.
PFMC would reimtrips per month, (6(d)).
There to which we cal-
Although there was no dollar limit in this provision of the contract, Hawes nonetheless violated the contract terms in three ways.
First, Hawes (who was relocating from Omaha) charged PGW for airline tickets to fly to Atlanta, to take care of matters after his father died there, and characterized these as "relocation expenses" although they clearly were not.
Additionally, Hawes charged airline tickets for his children to fly from Omaha to Philadelphia, although his contract provided for reimbursement only for relocation trips taken by Hawes and his wife.
Finally, in October, 1996, Hawes also charged two sets of roundtrip tickets to fly to Atlanta with his wife and children, and characterized these as relocation expenses -- even though his wife and children already had moved to Philadelphia and they already had sold their house in Omaha.
Although Hawes purchased these tickets in his "relocation year," Hawes and his family used the tickets over President's weekend and Easter week in 1997.
As to his Atlanta trips, in total, PGW spent more than $2,000 for airline tickets and car rental fees for Hawes, his wife, and his children to fly roundtrip to Atlanta on several occasions from February, 1996 through March, 1997.
(The balance of the $14,231 of airline ticket charges were for trips for Hawes and his family to and from Omaha.)
In a November, 1998 memo to Hayllar concerning some of his expense reports, Hawes wrote, "As you know, the provisions of my contract allowed three visits per month to Omaha, as part of the allowable relocation expense.
As you may recall, and as approved by Rotan Lee, on several occasions these trips were made to Atlanta (at a much lower cost to [PGW]) instead of Omaha to enable me to address matters related to the death of my father who passed on January 11, 1996 -- my first day with PGW."
Asked whether Hawes had ever asked him if he could charge his trips to Atlanta to take care of the funeral arrangements and other matters, in lieu of house hunting trips, Lee answered, "No, no."
Asked whether he had any discussion about paying for trips to Atlanta for the funeral, Lee said, "No, no, although ... having a senior executive whose father died and needs to go to Atlanta on the company dole, ...
I think that is perfectly an appropriate expense."
39
We do not know whose recollection (Hawes' or Lee's) is more accurate.
We do know, however, that the contract that Hawes and Lee signed provided that any amendments must be in writing; therefore, even if Lee actually did tell Hawes that he could "swap" flights to Atlanta for flights to Omaha, such an agreement was not binding on PGW.
Therefore, Hawes should reimburse all of these charges; if he does not, PGW should pursue civil remedies.
Martin's Relocation Expenses Martin's contract provided for reimbursement of moving expenses, closing costs and tax gross up "not to exceed in the aggregate $50,000."
The contract further provided for reimbursement of up to $1,000 per month in temporary housing expenses for twelve months, and for reimbursement of two house-hunting trips per month for him and his spouse, for six months.
Martin moved to Philadelphia in January, 1996 and stayed at the Double Tree Hotel, the Marriott and Embassy Suites, until 8/30/96, when he and his wife made settlement on a house in Chestnut Hill.
As of October, 1999 (approximately one month before he was fired), Martin had not yet sold his house in Pittsburgh; however, he testified before the grand jury then, as he told City Council in 1998, that when he does sell his Pittsburgh property, he expects PGW to reimburse his closing costs.
Despite the limits in his contract, PGW reimbursed Martin (or paid directly on his behalf) as follows: $ 20,676 $14,179 $ 625 $ 5,872 $ 11,620 $11,620 $ 36,716 $ 4,576 $32,139 $ 59,102 $59,102 Temporary housing Housing Meals Other Househunting trips Moving and closing costs Allegheny Allied Van Lines 16 Philadelphia closing costs and transfer taxes[ ] Tax gross up (39.6% federal withholding rate) This figure includes $30,498 of gross up for Martin's closing costs, and $28,604 of gross up
Martin's costs actually were $31,739.50; however, he made an arithmetic error ($400 in his favor) when he added the costs, which no one at PGW noted.
16
40
for Martin's temporary living and househunting expenses, which PGW had reimbursed.
As it had for Hawes, PGW not only gave Martin gross up in excess of his contract limits, but it also gave him gross up on expenses for which his contract did not provide gross up. $128,114 Total
Flamm concluded that Martin had exceeded his $50,000 moving allowance (because of the excess tax gross up that he had been given); that he had exceeded his temporary living allowance by $7,267; and that he had exceeded his house-hunting allowance by $2,261, of which $949 represented trips taken slightly after the six-month limit.
When he testified before us, Martin responded to Flamm's calculations by referring to a letter that he had sent Flamm on 7/10/98 in response to Flamm's preliminary findings, which Martin said were similar to his final findings.
In that letter, Martin stated that he had negotiated to have PFMC reimburse his reasonable relocation expenses up to $50,000, to be grossed up for taxes (i.e., that he had negotiated to have gross up outside the $50,000 cap).
Martin further stated in his letter that Flamm had erroneously included $4,176 of business travel expenses in his calculation of house-hunting and relocation trips, and that while a small amount of the remainder was incurred in relocation trips after the six-month period had expired, he found it unreasonable that PGW would expect him to complete all of his relocation efforts within six months, given the press of PGW business to which he was attending.
Martin also explained in his letter why he felt the entire amount was legitimate and should be reimbursed, and noted that in reviewing his moving expenses and closing costs, he felt that PGW actually owed him an additional $1,733 plus gross up.
In Flamm's final report to the Board, Flamm agreed that Martin had not been reimbursed for $1,343 of closing costs, but he found that Martin already had been reimbursed in excess of the limits of his contract.
Sharbutt's Relocation Expenses PFMC's contract with Sharbutt provided for reimbursement of moving expenses and tax gross up "not to exceed in the aggregate, $50,000," and for reimbursement of temporary housing and househunting expenses, subject to certain limits.
In our review of Sharbutt's relocation expenses, we discovered that not only did Sharbutt receive reimbursement in excess of his $50,000 limit,
41
but he also committed several relocation reimbursements to cuss these in Chapter VI, and him or on his behalf for his
crimes so as to obtain and keep which he was not entitled.
We dishere simply note what PGW paid to relocation.
Sharbutt owned two houses in California: a primary residence in Valencia, California and a rental property in Big Bear Lake, California.
He sold the Valencia property in December, 1995 and moved to Philadelphia in January, 1996.
From January until April, 1996, Sharbutt and his wife rented an apartment in Chestnut Hill Village.
They then purchased a house in East Falls.
In November, 1996, Sharbutt sold his Big Bear Lake rental property.
In 1996, PGW reimbursed Sharbutt for the closing costs on his sale of the Valencia property and on his purchase of the Philadelphia property.
In the fall of 1998, after the Board's auditor advised Sharbutt that he had been improperly reimbursed for certain expenses, and shortly before Hawes left PGW, Sharbutt requested and received additional reimbursement for costs associated with the purchase of his Philadelphia residence, the transport of two vehicles from California, and his closing costs on the sale of his California rental property (all costs incurred in 1996).
In total, Sharbutt requested and received the following reimbursements: $10,036 Househunting/relocation trips and temporary housing Sharbutt's contract provided for reimbursement of up to $1,000 per month for temporary housing for 12 months, and reimbursement for two house-hunting/relocation trips per month, for six months, for him and his wife.
PGW paid: $ 5,588 Travel expenses $ 4,142 Lodging $ 221 Meals $ 85 Parking $40,872 $14,483 $19,700 $ 5,790 $ 829 $ 70 $ $ 850 850 Closing and moving -- total submitted by 6/96 Closing costs on Valencia, California property Closing costs on Philadelphia property Professional movers Transport of 1987 Mercedes Benz U-haul -- household goods Moving expense incurred 12/12/96 Ozark Auto Transport Additional moving expenses reimbursed in 11/98 U-Haul -- transport of 1993 Jeep and 1995 Dodge Storage and transport of 1966 MG Closing costs on Big Bear Lake property
$10,959 $ 2,298 $ 2,514 $ 6,146
42
$40,872 $103,589
Tax gross up Total
The explanations given by Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt as to why they exceeded their contract limits Hawes testified that before he signed his contract, the Board assured him that the reimbursement limits in his contract were not absolute, and that all legitimate, reasonable expenses would be reimbursed.
Thus, he said, there was no need for him to seek the Board's approval for reimbursement of his expenditures that exceeded the cap.
Further, Hawes said, he understood from the newspaper that the Board had agreed that the cap was only a 17 "target" or a "trigger."
And, Hawes said, "I would also go further to say that we worked very hard to make sure that the expenses stayed as low as possible."
Hawes acknowledged that the words "reasonable" or "target" do not appear in his contract, and he also acknowledged that both he and his wife (a corporate lawyer) reviewed the contract before he signed it.
Nonetheless, he insisted that "our verbal agreement ... with the Board members, was that ... if it exceeded it and if it was reasonable, then it would be permitted."
When we then pointed that oral agreements were (after conferring with his I can assure you that the stood.
It just wasn't an out that his contract explicitly stated not binding, Hawes simply replied lawyer), "Well, I'm not a lawyer, but parties involved in that all underissue."
Hawes' wife, Sheila Hawes, also testified, and told the grand jury that her husband was told that reasonable expenses would be reimbursed, notwithstanding the $90,000 limit.
She conceded that her husband never asked to have his contract amended once it was clear that their expenses were exceeding $90,000, but said that her husband was submitting these expenses for reimbursement, and she assumed that Hayllar and Lee, and the entire Board, were reviewing the expenses on a monthly basis.
Hawes may have been referring to a Daily News article that stated "[Board Chairman] Driscoll recently called Hawes' contracted amount a 'moving target.'
And Hayllar said he would have voted to change the target if anyone had asked the board to do so."
The article also quoted Driscoll as saying "I don't really see anything that's inappropriate"; and "I'm not disposed to ask for money back on matters of judgment."
("474G 
17
43
Hawes said that it was Hayllar and City Solicitor Joseph Dworetzky who had assured him that, even if he exceeded his contract limits, he nonetheless would be kept whole.
We asked Dworetzky whether he ever told Hawes that if the $90,000 was insufficient, he nonetheless would be kept whole.
Dworetzky replied, "I never said anything to him which could be interpreted that the numbers that were in the contract were not real.
I mean, they were real.
You can amend contracts, but the numbers in there were numbers that were intended to be -- to apply unless the contract were amended."
Hayllar likewise testified that he never told Hawes that the $90,000 cap was not a firm limit or that he would be "kept whole" even if he exceeded it.
Like Hawes, Martin contended that Hayllar had told him that all of his expenses would be reimbursed.
Martin further claimed that the $50,000 cap was not meant to include gross up, and said that the provision of his contract governing relocation and gross up (paragraph 6(b)) was "ambiguous."
We do not find the paragraph ambiguous and, more importantly, we find that Martin's own recollection of the facts does not support his position.
That is, Martin recalled that he negotiated his contract with Hayllar.
They agreed on his salary and bonus, and they agreed that PGW would pay for relocation of his personal property, transitional living expenses, and closing costs.
Martin said, "That's the nature of the conversation that I had. ... and we had a handshake on that."
Subsequently, Dworetzky sent him a contract.
Martin called Hayllar, who assured him that the contract reflected the terms that they had agreed to.
Martin said that "I briefly went through it and it appeared that it reflected it."
Hayllar asked him to get some estimates on moving expenses and closing costs on the sale of his house in Pittsburgh and the purchase of a house in Philadelphia.
Martin concluded that the total would be about $50,000, and that figure was put in his contract.
When we asked Martin whether he ever told Hayllar or Dworetzky that $50,000 would not keep him "whole," he replied: A.
I did not. ...
As I said, this [contract] was sent to me.
It's a very lengthy document.
It was prepared by a very considered attorney and you are referring to the one phrase in a paragraph here that never jumped off the page to me.
And when ... anyone tries to say that this is interpreted to mean that all of my expenses including the so-called tax gross-up would come to $50,000.00, I think [that] fails to give me the benefit of the bargain that I arrived at in my employment agreement.
44
*** As I said before, that phrase, ... in this 16 page document, just doesn't catch my attention, to be frank with you.
And more apparently, when I look somebody in the eye, and I shake their hand and I say this is a deal that we're having, then that is what I expect on the piece of paper and Hayllar never gave me any indication that I should not trust him.
Q.
So then, is it your testimony that had you read this document more closely, you would have called Mr. Dworetzky or Mr. Hayllar and said that you could not sign it given the way it was drafted? That is correct.
That is my testimony.
A.
Martin noted that he had filed his expenses timely, that Hawes (his immediate supervisor) had approved them, and that no one had questioned them until the summer of 1998.
Additionally, he noted that because he, Hawes and Sharbutt were employees of PFMC, he assumed that PFMC's audit committee (consisting of Hayllar, Engebretson, Marrazzo, and Sharbutt) also had reviewed his relocation expenses, "And if they didn't ... then shame on them because I would have some questions about whether or not they were doing their job."
Sharbutt, of course, did not need to explain why he failed to seek Board approval for reimbursement in excess of the limits provided by his contract -- because he forged his contract so as to remove tax gross up from the $50,000 limit.
Nonetheless, when asked whether anyone was monitoring whether Hawes' reimbursements were within his contractual limits, Sharbutt answered, "No, I don't think so, because we were told that that was not a cap and that was a guideline."
Sharbutt said that it was Lee, and later Driscoll, who said this when the issue came up in February of 1998.
What the Board knew and what it should have known Essentially, the Board did not monitor the relocation expenses.
Hayllar testified that, at his request, Sydney Avent (who was then PGW's General Counsel, and PFMC's secretary) gave him reports on Hawes', Martin's and Sharbutt's expenditures every two or three months, starting in January, 1996.
These reports showed virtually no relocation expenses.
Hayllar said that "it turns out, I was not getting relocation expenses.
I was getting credit card expenses."
He said that he did not realize this until May of 1998, when he received a copy of the first anonymous letter to Rendell.
45
Hayllar also said that he thought that then Lee was monitoring relocation expenses.
Hayllar was very "hands on" and "it became confusing as doing, what other people were doing, but it was he was looking at these as well and perhaps had tion."
Chairman Rotan said that Lee to what he was my understanding better informa-
However, Lee said that he assumed that Hayllar was monitoring Hawes' expenses, and that Hawes was monitoring Martin and Sharbutt's expenses.
In Lee's view, "theoretically, it's the Board's responsibility" to monitor their expenses, but "practically speaking" they were responsible for monitoring themselves: A.
I think it really needs to be understood that when you hire people to run something and they know what they're doing, you waste your time if you spend that money -- if you look over every --if you look over the shoulder of every decision they make, then you have to ask yourself the question why did I hire them.
So this -- these were people who came with, again, through a deep background with the full -- with a full clean slate of integrity.
So in many ways they managed themselves.
But I don't know any corporation in the United States of America where that doesn't occur.
*** Did the Board review Jim Hawes' moving expenses or tax gross up? I can't answer that question because ... a lot of this 18 occurred after I was gone.
....[ ] ...
During the time that you were there, did it ever come up or was any of it ever reviewed, any of his expenses reviewed? We have a Finance Committee of the Board, which at that time was chaired by Ben Hayllar, again, who is now the acting CEO.
To the extent that Ben had interaction with Sharbutt and Hawes and Martin, I cannot say.
But Ben is a very, very fiscally minded and very sharp pencil guy.
So it wouldn't surprise me at least if he had been given some information.
*** ...
Jim Hawes is responsible for Martin and Sharbutt on
Q. A. Q. A.
Lee resigned from the Board in April, 1997.
However, by February, 1997, Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt already had received reimbursements and gross up far in excess of what their contracts provided.
18
46
down the line as supervisors their people, but we [PFMC] Hawes, and that discharge of the first line -- would have tee.
who are responsible for are responsible for Jim that duty would have been been the Finance Commit-
Marrazzo, who was a member of the Board's audit committee, testified that the Board was not supposed to review Hawes', Martin's or Sharbutt's relocation expenses.
Marrazzo said that his "underlying assumption was that the control systems were in place between the CEO and the COO and the CFO and the internal auditing team that would have secured the interests of the ratepayers from any misuse of that privilege."
As CFO, Sharbutt was responsible for ensuring PGW's fiscal integrity, and so might have been expected to monitor the contracts as well.
Indeed, Hawes was submitting his requisitions for reimbursement to Sharbutt for approval, and Sharbutt was signing off on them.
However, it is not clear whether Sharbutt even knew what Hawes' contractual limits were.
That is, Hawes claimed that he gave Sharbutt a copy of his contract before he gave him his requisitions for payment in January, 1997 ("I gave him my contract and I said, I'm going to send these [moving bills] down.
You make sure that everything in here is consistent with the contract.").
However, Sharbutt testified that he never saw Hawes' contract until City Council requested documents in October, 1998.
No one else at PGW was monitoring compliance with the contracts -- or even had a copy of the contracts, for that matter, other than the Legal Department.
Joseph Sink, the Manager of Accounting and Budget, told the grand jury that, "when your boss sends something through to sign and says pay it, you pay it. ...
I don't know that any of these were inappropriate.
We didn't have copies of the contracts with any of these individuals."
Likewise, Joseph Golden, PGW's Treasurer, testified that, to this 19 day, he has never seen anyone's employment contract at PGW.
He said that his Department kept a running tally of each employee's relocation expenses, but only for the purpose of adding the yearend total to the employee's W-2 as compensation.
To the best of his recollection, the Board did not ask him for this information until 1998.
Thus, the Board remained ignorant of the relocation excesses of its employees until an anonymous letter writer informed Mayor Thus, it was news to him that some (if not all) of the executive contracts provide that the executive will be paid monthly -- not weekly, as is presently the practice.
19
47
Rendell about them in May, 1998.
The among other things that "Mr. Hawes has expense by more than $20k and is trying The Mayor's office informed Hayllar of
20
anonymous letter alleged overspent on his moving to hide the expense."
the allegations.
In a letter to Rendell's chief of staff, Hayllar wrote in response: I have not seen any expenses and have only been given information orally by Hawes and Sharbutt.
As I understand it, both executives exceeded their overall limits by approximately $19,000 each.
There has been no effort to my knowledge to hide this.
The expenses were reviewed by the then Chairman, but apparently only on an intermittent basis.
...
Hawes also charged his meals during the period prior to his family moving to Philadelphia.
I do not know if this is normal business procedure in such circumstances, but at the time the contracts were drawn up, it did not occur to me that personal expenses including meals would be charged to PGW unless they were PGW related meals.
I have not seen nor know the details of Martin's expenditure, but am told that they are predominantly in the temporary housing expenses which had a clear $1,000 a month limit.
I am also told that Martin charged daily meals to PGW. Sharbutt did not charge any meals to PGW. Sharbutt was also under his allocations.
What is not known is what the then Chairman told them was appropriate concerning their expenses.
...
I have asked Chairman Greg Driscoll to ask Board Members Marrazzo and Pudlin to examine the expenses and determine the severity of the problem and what the Board's position should be.
The Board should have a written response prepared by the time Mark McDonald makes any inquiries.
Ultimately, the Board hired Flamm, the to examine the relocation expenses.
Flamm to the Board in September, 1998.
The Board action; since then, however, several Board that they probably would have authorized at expenditures had Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt 20
independent auditor, submitted his report took no immediate members have suggested least some of these only asked.
Reverend Moore testified that he learned of the matter through the media.
Similarly, Dennis (vice chairman of the Board) testified that prior to the time when it became public knowledge that Hawes had exceeded the relocation provisions of his contract, no one had brought this fact to his attention.
48
For example, Hayllar said, "The irony is, had [Hawes] brought it to our attention, we probably would have agreed to exceed the cap ....
But he never did ...."
Likewise, Engebretson said, "On the one hand, I would expect that if there are contracts in place, that they should be abided by, and at the same time ....
I guess I generally do believe that the intention was that the cost of their move[s] would be absorbed by PGW and I was somewhat surprised at the limits that were put in the contract."
Possibly taking a different view from other Board members, Dennis testified that after questions were raised about the propriety of gross up and other expenses, he met with Hawes "to say to him that he had to rethink his position on some of the items in question."
Dennis said "my own personal view is, there should not have been any oral understanding about Mr. Hawes' contract or anybody else's contract ....
We had written contracts here that were negotiated and ... every obligation and benefit should have been in those written contracts, as far as I'm concerned."
Conclusions about the relocation expenses of Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt Whatever Hayllar or Dworetzky did or did not say to Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt about being "kept whole," the contracts that Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt signed did not use those words, nor did they say anything about reimbursement of expenses so long as they were "reasonable" or "legitimate."
Instead, the contracts provided for reimbursement subject to precise limits.
Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt are all literate adults with significant prior experience in matters of business, capable of reading a contract and understanding what it says.
(Indeed, the contract terms are so explicit that Sharbutt committed forgery to make the contract read the way he and Martin want it to.)
Moreover, Hawes had the assistance of his wife, a corporate lawyer with some 17 years experience, in negotiating the contract, and said that he read it before he signed it.
It is nothing short of appalling that Hawes and Martin would argue "verbal assurances" and "ambiguity" as justifications for keeping money to which they were not contractually entitled.
And, of course, it is nothing short of criminal for Sharbutt to forge his contract in an effort to keep money to which he had no lawful right.
Because the contracts were unambiguous, provided explicit caps, and, by their terms, provided that they could not be orally modified, we find that there was no valid authorization from the Board for Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt to exceed their contracts.
Accordingly, the Board should obtain reimbursement for these excesses from Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt -- pursuing civil remedies if necessary.
49
We also note the significant confusion here as to whose responsibility it is to review the expenses of the CEO, the COO, and the CFO: Is it the responsibility of the Board, whose employees they are? Or is it the responsibility of the CFO, who is ultimately accountable for every penny spent by PGW? We think that all of the expenses of the CEO, COO, and CFO should be submitted to the Board for its review and approval, and that PGW's policies should explicitly so provide.
50
Double payments of tax gross up We learned that PGW erroneously paid tax gross up money directly to Hawes, Martin, Sharbutt, and other employees, by issuing them checks.
To correct its error, it then paid this money directly to the federal government, and asked Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt to reimburse PGW for the original checks.
To date, Martin and Sharbutt have not completely reimbursed PGW. PGW had never given tax gross up to any employee before 1996.
Starting in 1996, however, it began to include gross up provisions in some employment contracts, including those of Hawes, Martin, Sharbutt, and Deborah Estrin, the Vice President and Director of Human Resources, who was hired in October, 1996.
After these executives were hired, PGW's Treasurer, Joseph Golden, obtained an opinion from an attorney at Obermayer, Rebmann, Maxwell 
The Treasury Department then prepared W-2s (statements of income) for its employees.
It included on these W-2s the amounts that PGW had reimbursed, or paid directly, for temporary housing, house hunting, and relocation expenses.
Then, using a tax gross up formula found in American Payroll Association publications, the Treasury Department issued payroll checks for "tax gross up" to the individual employees in January, 1997.
That is, on 1/3/97, PGW issued checks to Hawes totaling $19,342 (the after-tax net of $29,959) to off-set the tax liability arising from PGW's payment of his temporary housing costs and other relocation expenses incurred in 1996.
Likewise, PGW issued checks totaling $30,425 to Martin (the after-tax net of $47,126); $23,864 to Sharbutt (net of $36,963), and $21,141 to Estrin (net).
In the spring of 1997, Estrin's accountant told her that PGW had incorrectly computed her tax gross up, and that PGW should not have issued checks to her but should have sent the money directly to the IRS on her behalf.
In December, 1997, Sharbutt, Golden, and Diane Lashley, the Accounts Payable supervisor, met with Estrin's accountant.
The accountant advised them that the "cleanest" way to correct the problem was to reverse the amounts that had been issued in January, 1997, and to issue amended W-2s (known as W-2(c) forms); as the accountant explained, in issuing the checks in January, 1997, PGW had awarded compensation in 1997 that was intended to be a tax payment for 1996.
Sharbutt, Golden, and Lashley concluded that the accountant's methodology was correct.
Additionally, they decided to use his formulas, which included a rate of 39.6%.
Lashley then reversed the tax gross-up payments made in
51
January, 1997, and prepared amended 1996 W-2 forms for Hawes, Martin, Sharbutt, and Estrin, and PGW (eventually) paid the tax liability directly to the government.
Then, in January, 1998, Lashley and Golden met personally with Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt and gave them each their 1996 W-2(c) and 1997 W-2.
Lashley and Golden explained that each of them needed to return the tax gross up that they had been given in January, 1997, and that they also needed to file an amended tax return for 1996.
Subsequently, Lashley and Golden reminded Sharbutt a number of times to remind Hawes and Martin to file the amended returns and to return the money.
(Estrin had returned her checks to PGW when her accountant advised her that PGW should not have given the gross up directly to her.)
Hawes did not repay the money until 10/9/98, approximately three weeks before he left PGW, when he issued PGW a check for $19,913.
Martin made a lump sum payment of $20,000 in January, 1999, and thereafter, starting in April, paid $1,000 a month.
When he was fired in November, 1999, he still owed $4,425, an amount unpaid as of October, 2000.
When Sharbutt was fired in January, 1999, he still owed $2,198, an amount that likewise is still unpaid as of October, 2000.
In addition to these ses paid or reimbursed in Sharbutt, and Estrin, or relocation expenses paid initial payments of gross up on expen1996, PGW either gave Hawes, Martin, paid on their behalf, further sums for or reimbursed thereafter.
Other employees' relocation reimbursements and tax gross up PGW gave many employees "relocation assistance."
One pointed example of PGW's unending relocation generosity is the financial assistance provided to Badruddin Karachiwala, whom PGW hired as vice president of gas management in November, 1996.
PGW's offer letter to Karachiwala stated that PGW would pay "the usual and customary costs associated with purchase of a primary residence in Philadelphia City and the sale of the primary residence in Sioux City, Iowa."
The offer letter also provided that PGW would pay "house hunting" expenses for Karachiwala and his family, for up to two trips per month for six months.
Finally, the offer letter also provided that PGW would pay "temporary living expenses" up to $1,500 per month for twelve months.
Several months later, Karachiwala advised Martin that he had not been able to sell his Iowa home, and asked for additional financial assistance.
After discussions with Hawes, in January, 1998, Karachiwala and Estrin signed an agreement obligating PGW (1) to pay interest on a bridge loan for six months; (2) to "pay a set dollar amount to offset the cost of the lower of two mortgage payments ... not to exceed $2,000 per month" for six months; and (3) to "consider offering a limited guarantee against [the] loss on the sale of [his Iowa]
52
other provisions.
Ultimately, PGW paid Karachiwala $86,342 in relocation assistance.
This sum included $7,074 for eleven months' apartment rental, $8,561 for furniture rental, $4,327 in interest on the bridge loan, $6,180 for the mortgage offset, $19,727 for the moving van, $14,244 for closing costs for the purchase of his Chestnut Hill home, and $13,962 for closing costs on the sale of his Iowa home.
PGW also paid $40,376 in tax gross up to the government on Karachiwala's behalf, despite the fact that "gross up" is not mentioned in Karachiwala's offer letter.
PGW not only gave many employees relocation assistance, but, eventually, PGW also began to offer many employees tax gross up.
However, unlike the precisely worded contracts drafted by Dworetzky for Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt, the offer letters that PGW sent to these employees included imprecise language, such as "We have also agreed to reimburse you for up to $20,000.00 (grossed up for tax purposes) to offset the costs of relocation ...."
Whether gross up was to be included in the $20,000 or was to be given in addition to the $20,000 was debatable -- but PGW appears to have given it in addition to the $20,000 in at least several instances.
Not every employment offer letter included an offer of gross up.
When, having accepted PGW's employment offer, some employees later complained that it was not "fair" that other employees (earning different salaries in different positions) had been given tax gross up while they had not, Hawes agreed to give tax gross up even to those employees whose offers (contracts) included no such provision.
Hawes' decision to give these additional employees gross up cost PGW approximately $116,000.
Asked how much time she had spent calculating gross up on every eligible expense for these dozens of employees, Lashley answered, "Day, nights, weekends, a lot of time."
In the end, PGW paid more than $1.4 million in relocation assistance and tax gross up to 26 people, from the CEO to an intern.
Many of these 26 employees already have either resigned or been fired.
Hayllar testified that the Board did not know that PGW was paying these "lavish" amounts to employees other than Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt, until after it received the anonymous letter in the spring of 1998.
PGW's new relocation policy In February, 1999, a few months after the Daily News had published the relocation sums paid to date to these employees, PGW adopted a new relocation policy.
The policy provides in pertinent part that:
53
3.
A lump sum amount may be provided to certain employees.
This is generally done at the time he/she is hired.
...
The lump sum amount must be specified in the original contract, employment agreement or offer letter.
Any related tax consequences are the responsibility of the employee.
No adjustments will be made to the negotiated amounts.
All lump sums in excess of $5,000 must be approved in advance by the President and Chief Executive Officer.
All lump sum amounts in excess of $15,000 must be approved in advance by the Chairperson or ViceChairperson of the Board of Directors (PFMC).
***
4.
5.
7.
In the event the newly hired employee should ... voluntarily terminate employment with PGW within two (2) years of his/her date of hire ... the entire lump sum amount provided by PGW for relocation must be repaid to PGW. ....
Hayllar testified in September, 1999, that, since November, 1998, PGW has paid relocation expenses for only one new hire, an attorney moving into Philadelphia from the suburbs, who was given "a few thousand dollars."
Hayllar said that if PGW could not find a person in the City with "a specific skill set that absolutely was required," then it would negotiate a relocation benefit for a candidate living outside of the City.
Conclusion Having paid $1.4 million to move 26 people to Philadelphia, PGW now has a new relocation expense policy.
We are concerned, however, that PGW's new policy merely relieves it of its bookkeeping nightmare with respect to calculating tax gross up, but does nothing to protect the interests of the ratepayers.
First, even under the new policy, there is no limit on the amount of relocation money that PGW can give to any one person.
Second, even under the new policy, relocation benefits can be paid to any person with a "special skill set."
What prospective employee does not have "a special skill set"? Third, PGW's new policy is actually looser than the previous practice.
Now, new employees are just given money, no questions asked, no receipts required; previously, they had to justify at least some of what they took with receipts.
Thus, for all practical purposes, while PGW's new policy will make the bookkeeping easier for PGW, it
54
will do little to prevent the abuses and excesses discussed in this Chapter.
PGW's generous relocation policy and practice stands in sharp contrast to that of other City departments, which rarely pay any relocation expenses.
For example, the Police Department not only does not provide relocation assistance to police recruits, but it also requires applicants to live in the City for one year before they can be hired.
Similarly, the School District does not provide relocation assistance to prospective teachers, although it has discussed the possibility, as it needs to fill a large number of teacher vacancies.
There is no reason for PGW to be so generous with relocation benefits, when City departments are not and cannot afford to be.
Finally, that PGW could pay $1.4 million in relocation benefits to 26 people, and the PFMC Board have no knowledge of that fact until an anonymous letter writer alerted them to the general issue, highlights the questionable efficacy of PFMC, and whether PGW is too "insulated" from meaningful oversight.
55
VI.
SHARBUTT'S FORGERY OF RELOCATION DOCUMENTS AND RELATED THEFTS
Introduction In our review of Sharbutt's relocation reimbursements, we found that, not only did Sharbutt, like Hawes and Martin, receive relocation reimbursement (including gross up) in excess of the limits in his contract, but he also committed several crimes so as to keep this excess reimbursement and obtain other monies to which he was not entitled.
Specifically, in the course of our investigation, we discovered that: (1) Sharbutt forged a copy of his contract so as to remove tax gross up from the $50,000 cap on moving expenses (i.e., he reworded his contract so that it provided for unlimited tax gross up compensation).
Then, in an attempt to keep the excessive reimbursements that had been paid to him, Sharbutt gave this forged document to PFMC's independent auditor, to City Council, to PGW's internal auditor, and finally, to the grand jury.
(2) When the Board began questioning ments, Sharbutt forged a black-lined which he gave to the Board's auditor had negotiated with PGW for the terms forged contract.
relocation reimbursedraft of his contract, as "evidence" that he that appeared in the
(3) In 1996, Sharbutt approved his own requisition for PGW to wire a $19,700 advance from PGW funds to cover his closing costs.
After he went to settlement, however, Sharbutt failed to refund to PGW the balance remaining from the advance.
Some two years later, when PGW's internal auditor asked for a copy of his real estate settlement sheet, Sharbutt forged a copy of the settlement sheet, falsely inflating the closing costs, so as to justify a greater reimbursement than he was owed under the relocation provisions of his contract.
(4) Sharbutt requested and received a $1,345 reimbursement for an airline ticket which, unknown to PGW, he had canceled and for which he had received a refund.
(5) over was sold Sharbutt charged PGW for a $588 ticket to California Thanksgiving weekend in 1996, claiming that the trip related to the sale of his house.
However, Sharbutt had his house almost a year earlier, in December, 1995.
56
Sharbutt's forgery of his contract In the course of our investigation, we forged his contract, altering the paragraph bursement of his relocation expenses, in an justify -- and keep -- the monies that PGW him beyond his contract limits.
found that Sharbutt that governed reimapparent attempt to had improperly paid
For all practical purposes, neither the Board nor anyone at PGW monitored Hawes', Martin's, and Sharbutt's relocation expenses in 1996 and 1997.
In the summer of 1998, however, in the wake of anonymous letters to Rendell and the Daily News articles, the Board hired Bruce Flamm, an independent auditor, to review executive management's relocation expenses.
As part of his audit, Flamm asked Sharbutt for several documents, including a copy of his contract, which Sharbutt gave him in September, 1998.
Shortly thereafter, in October, 1998, City Council scheduled hearings into spending practices at PGW and requested copies of PGW executives' contracts, among other documents.
Gathering documents in response to that request, Josephine Hayes, PGW's manager of Regulatory Affairs, asked Sharbutt for a copy of his contract, which he gave her in October, 1998.
At the same time, PGW's internal auditors were reviewing the American Express corporate cards and cash expense reports.
As part of that review, Robert Lucas, one the internal auditors, asked Sharbutt for a copy of his contract, which Sharbutt gave him in November, 1998.
We determined that Sharbutt gave each of these persons a forged version of his contract.
Finally, Sharbutt also gave this forged document to the grand jury in March, 1999, in response to our subpoena for, among other documents, "any and all documents, in your possession or subject to your control, from or pertaining to your employment at PGW."
Our investigation of this matter revealed the following.
After PFMC decided to hire Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt, the City Solicitor, Joseph Dworetzky, negotiated and drafted the contracts on the City's behalf.
Dworetzky testified that, in drafting these contracts, he was cognizant of the financial limitations set forth in the Management Agreement Act, within which he had to work.
As to Sharbutt's contract in particular, Dworetzky testified that he wrote two drafts of the contract on 12/21/95, and sent them to Hayllar that day.
Hayllar forwarded the second of these drafts to Sharbutt.
Under cover of letter dated 12/24/95, Sharbutt sent back proposed changes to Dworetzky, which the Law Department (i.e, the City Solicitor's Office) received on 12/29/95.
Dworetzky then produced a final version of the contract on 1/11/96 for Sharbutt's signature.
Dworetzky sent several duplicate copies of this final version to Sharbutt, along
57
with a "black-lined" copy of the former (12/21/95) version of the contract, to show Sharbutt what changes he had made to produce 21 the final version.
Sharbutt signed the duplicate contracts and sent them back, and Dworetzky gave them to Rotan Lee to sign on behalf of PFMC.
When Lee returned the fully executed contracts, Dworetzky kept at least one in the Law Department's files, and sent copies to Sharbutt for his files and to Sydney Avent, PGW's General Counsel, for her files.
As noted in Chapter V, PFMC's contracts with Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt capped relocation expenses and tax gross up at amounts "not to exceed, in the aggregate" $90,000, $50,000 and $50,000 for each of the three contracts respectively.
Specifically, Sharbutt's contract provided on page 6, paragraph 6(b): b. PFMC shall pay SHARBUTT' expenses related to the relocation of SHARBUTT' personal property to an address within the City of Philadelphia and other expenses incidental to moving such as closing costs on sale of SHARBUTT's current residence and purchase of a residence within the City of Philadelphia, gross-up of moving expense reimbursements on account of taxes, and transfer tax, not to exceed in the aggregate $50,000.
(Emphasis added.)
We discovered that Sharbutt forged this document to read as follows: b. PFMC shall pay SHARBUTT expenses related to the relocation all of SHARBUTT's personal property to an address within the City of Philadelphia and all other expenses incidental to moving such as closing costs on sale of SHARBUTT's current residence and purchase of a residence within the City of Philadelphia, not to exceed in the aggregate $50,000, plus transfer tax and gross up of all expense reimbursements on account of taxes.
(Emphasis added.)
That bursement from the bursement $50,000, 21
is, Sharbutt altered the paragraph that governed reimof his relocation expenses by removing tax gross up $50,000 cap, so that the contract provided for reimof moving expenses "not to exceed in the aggregate plus transfer tax and gross up of all expense reimburse-
"Black-lining" is a word-processing function whereby editorial changes can be superimposed on a document.
58
ments on account of taxes" (emphasis added).
Sharbutt then gave this altered document to several different people, as follows.
Flamm explained to the grand jury that he had asked Sharbutt to assemble certain documents for him.
In response, Sharbutt gave him various documents, including what purported to be a copy of his contract.
From his workpapers, Flamm brought the grand jury a copy of what Sharbutt had given him.
That document includes the altered language in paragraph 6(b) (i.e., it provides for reimbursement of moving expenses "not to exceed in the aggregate $50,000, plus transfer tax and gross up of all expense reimbursements on account of taxes").
Significantly, this document bears Sharbutt's signature, but has no signature on behalf of the City.
Josephine Hayes, PGW's manager of Regulatory Affairs, acts as a liaison between PGW and the Gas Commission and City Council.
Hayes testified that City Council had asked PGW to provide certain documents, including some employee contracts, as part of its inquiry into executive spending by PGW officials.
It was her job to collect all of these documents and compile them into a set.
Sharbutt collected the employee contracts for Hayes and gave them to her, including a copy of his own contract.
Hayes xeroxed these documents, a set of which was then given to City Councilwoman Verna's office and to various people at PGW.
We obtained one of these sets from PGW.
Our examination of Sharbutt's contract in this set showed that it contains the altered language in paragraph 6(b).
The signature page of this document has handwritten signatures "Rotan Lee" and "Ramon Sharbutt."
Robert Lucas told the grand jury that, during his review of employee expenses, he asked Sharbutt for a copy of his contract.
Sharbutt pulled his contract from a binder, walked to a copy machine, copied the contract and handed it to Lucas.
Lucas brought to the grand jury a copy of what Sharbutt gave him.
This copy likewise has the altered language in paragraph 6(b), and the signature page of this document has handwritten signatures "Rotan Lee" and "Ramon Sharbutt."
When he appeared before the grand jury, Sharbutt testified that he did not remember whether he gave Flamm a copy of his contract, but he did not think that he had.
He said that he did not give Hayes a copy of his contract, because he did not have one; he thought that she obtained a copy from Hawes or Flamm, and then gave it to him.
Finally, he said that he could not recall whether he gave Lucas a copy.
Sharbutt testified that he did not have a copy of his contract in his possession; "I did not know where it was. ...
It's not an important document to me. ...
You know, it's just papers."
Our investigator spoke with Dworetzky, and showed him a copy
59
of the contract with the altered language.
Dworetzky compared this copy with the "original signatures" contract in the Law Department's files and with the copy stored in the files on the hard drive of the computer he had used in the Law Department when he wrote the contracts.
(At the time that Dworetzky made the comparison, this computer was used by City Solicitor Stephanie Franklin-Suber.)
Dworetzky then appeared before the grand jury, and testified that he had concluded that the altered version was not what he had drafted and Rotan Lee had signed.
Dworetzky offered eight reasons in support of his conclusion: 1.
The copy of Sharbutt's contract that we showed Dworetzky (a copy identical to what Sharbutt gave to Flamm, Hayes and Lucas) is different from the "original signatures" copy in the Law Department files.
Specifically, in paragraph 6 of the document that we showed Dworetzky, gross up has been removed from the $50,000 cap; in the "original signatures" copy in the Law Department's files, gross up is subject to the $50,000 cap.
The copy of Sharbutt's contract that we showed Dworetzky (a copy identical to what Sharbutt gave to Flamm, Hayes and Lucas) is different from the copies stored in the hard drive of the computer which Dworetzky had used when he was City Solicitor.
In the hard drive are three drafts of Sharbutt's contract: the two drafts that Dworetzky wrote on 12/21/95, and the third draft that he prepared on 1/11/96.
None of these drafts has the language in paragraph 6 of the contract circulated by Sharbutt.
Dworetzky said that he was very conscious of the limits set down by City Council in the Management Agreement Act, and carefully drafted all three contracts to stay within the limits.
He said that he would not have placed gross up reimbursement outside of the cap, because it would be very difficult to estimate what that gross up figure would be.
When Dworetzky compared the contracts in the Solicitor's files and PGW's files with the contract circulated by Sharbutt, he observed that not only was there a difference in the wording of paragraph 6, but the actual spacing and width of the lines on that page was different in the two versions -- highly unlikely if the entire contract had been amended on the original word processor.
Dworetzky said that, of the three executives, Sharbutt was the least important from the City's perspective, and had the least leverage in the negotiations; thus,
2.
3.
4.
5.
60
it was unlikely that Sharbutt would have been able to negotiate something more favorable than Hawes and Martin had gotten.
6.
Dworetzky reviewed the "term sheets" he had prepared for these contracts.
The term sheets both reflect that Sharbutt's reimbursement will be capped, with the second term sheet explicitly capping reimbursement at $50,000.
On 1/12/96, Dworetzky prepared an analysis of the salaries that the City was paying Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt.
This analysis indicates for Sharbutt's moving expenses "50(cap)."
Immediately next to this is another category, Travel Expenses" which was not capped in the contract, and is reflected on the analysis as "6(est)" to indicate that it was an estimate.
Thus, Dworetzky was quite aware of which expenses were capped and which were not.
Dworetzky said that he would not have agreed to reimbursement of these expenses outside of a cap.
7.
8.
Sharbutt's forgery of a draft contract We determined that, in addition to forging his contract, Sharbutt also forged a black-lined draft of his contract that he supplied to Flamm as further "evidence" that he (unlike Hawes and Martin) had negotiated a contract that did not cap his gross up.
Specifically, Sharbutt gave Flamm what purported to be a copy of a letter dated 12/24/95 that he had written to Dworetzky, signed "Ramon N. Sharbutt."
Attached to the letter are pages 1, 2, 6, and 7 of a draft of his contract.
These pages are "black-lined," that is, they have underlining and strikeouts superimposed on the document to indicate proposed additions and deletions.
Additionally, certain changes are handwritten in; among them, there is an annotation moving gross up outside of the $50,000 cap.
We obtained the version of Sharbutt's 12/24/95 letter and attachments that he had given to Flamm.
We provided this to Dworetzky, who compared it with the original in the Law Department's files.
Although the typewritten body of the letter that Sharbutt gave Flamm is identical to the letter in the Law Department's files, the copy that Sharbutt gave Flamm is signed "Ramon N. Sharbutt," while the letter in the Law Department's file is signed "Ramon Sharbutt" with no middle initial.
More significantly, the contract pages attached to the 12/24/95 letter in the Law Department files are substantially different from the contract pages attached to the 12/24/95 letter that Sharbutt provided to Flamm.
61
Specifically, the attached contract pages in the Law Department's files are from the contract that Dworetzky drafted 12/21/95 and Hayllar sent to Sharbutt on or about 12/22/95.
Sharbutt annotated these pages and sent them back to Dworetzky; however, his annotations do not remove the gross up from the cap, but merely increase the cap to $60,000 (a change Dworetzky never made).
By contrast, the contract pages attached to the 12/24/95 letter that Sharbutt gave Flamm are from the 1/11/96 version of the contract -- a version that did not yet exist as of 12/24/95.
Sharbutt's handwritten annotations on these pages remove the gross up from the cap, consistent with what he was trying to persuade Flamm he had successfully negotiated.
As Dworetzky explained: What appears to have happened is that the December 24th cover memo was reprinted at a later date from the computer where it was stored, and then signed again.
Then a marked up version of a blacklined document that was created no earlier than January 10, 1996 was attached to the December 24 memo.
For these reasons, Dworetzky concluded that the pages that Sharbutt gave Flamm were not genuine.
When Sharbutt testified before the grand jury, he supplied multiple documents in response to our subpoena for "any and all documents in your possession or subject to your control, from or pertaining to your employment at PGW."
Included among these were both the forged contract and the forged 12/24/95 letter and attachments.
We then showed him Hawes' contract, Martin's contract, and his own (forged) contract, and pointed out that Hawes' contract provided for reimbursement of moving expenses and tax gross up "not to exceed, in the aggregate, $90,000"; Martin's contract provided for reimbursement of moving expenses and tax gross up "not to exceed in the aggregate $50,000", but his own (forged) contract provided for reimbursement of moving expenses "not to exceed in the aggregate $50,000, plus transfer tax and gross up of all expense reimbursements on account of taxes."
We asked Sharbutt how he was able to obtain a contract more generous than Hawes had, in that his gross up was not subject to a cap.
Sharbutt answered that the City originally had sent him a contract that did include gross up within a cap, and he had sent back a letter and proposed revisions to his contract.
Sharbutt said that: We were faxing things back and forth.
I don't think there was any renegotiation or anything.
But the way the -- I sent back the changes that I had wanted made,
62
and then when I got here ... somebody, I don't recall who, brought these in ... and said, here, sign them.
Asked whether he ever negotiated and signed a second version after the first version had been "signed, sealed and delivered," Sharbutt answered that he might have, if someone put two different versions in the stack of contracts that he was given to sign: A. Q. A. Q. A.
I may have signed a different version if I was given five in a stack, I don't know.
I think there were five or six.
Well, wait a minute.
No.
Somebody gives you a stack of five of these and says they're all the same thing.
Right.
You're not going to read them all.
You're going to flip through -- or I'm not.
I would flip over and sign it.
The County Investigating Grand Jury of November 17, 1997 heard this testimony and found Dworetzky, Flamm, Hayes, and Lucas to be very credible witnesses.
The grand jury did not find Sharbutt to be credible.
From Dworetzky's testimony and the documents he produced from the Law Department's files (both the "hard copies" and computer file copies), the grand jury was convinced that Sharbutt forged the copy of the contract that he gave to Flamm, to Hayes, to Lucas and, finally, to the grand jury.
Likewise, the grand jury was convinced that he forged the set of documents (the letter of 12/24/95 and attachments) that he provided to Flamm and to the grand jury.
Accordingly, the grand jury recommended that Sharbutt be charged criminally for these acts.
Sharbutt's forgery of his Philadelphia real estate settlement sheet Sharbutt and his wife purchased a house in East Falls in April, 1996.
On 4/10/96, Sharbutt approved his own requisition for PGW to wire a $19,700 advance from PGW funds to E
At settlement five days later, his actual closing costs were only $15,316.
No one at PGW asked Sharbutt for a copy of his settlement sheet, and Sharbutt pocketed the balance from the advance from PGW.
In the course of his audit of executive relocation expenses, Flamm concluded, among other things, that PGW had improperly reimbursed Sharbutt approximately $6,466 for closing costs not typically reimbursed, in connection with Sharbutt's purchase of his Philadelphia residence.
Included in this amount was the balance due back to PGW from the $19,700 that PGW had advanced
63
Sharbutt on his closing costs in 1996.
(In making these calculations, Flamm was working from a true, unaltered copy of the settlement sheet.)
When Flamm told Sharbutt of his preliminary conclusions -- specifically, that Sharbutt owed PGW $6,466 -Sharbutt responded to Flamm by stating that he had additional costs that he had not submitted for reimbursement that more than offset the $6,466.
Flamm gave his final report to the Board in September, 1998, noting these findings.
The Board took no immediate action.
On 1/12/99, Lucas, one of PGW's internal auditors, asked Sharbutt for a copy of the settlement sheet for his Philadelphia property, so that Lucas could establish the validity of payments made on Sharbutt's behalf by PGW. Sharbutt gave Lucas what purported to be a copy of his Philadelphia settlement sheet.
Lucas then asked Sharbutt about Flamm's conclusion that Sharbutt owed approximately $6,400 for items not typically reimbursed in connection with the purchase of his Philadelphia property, and Sharbutt told Lucas that the actual amount was closer to $1,000, and that he could provide a reconciliation to support this amount.
Sharbutt told Lucas that Flamm had derived the $6,466 figure from an estimate of closing costs, and not the actual settlement sheet.
The following morning, Lucas made copies of the Philadelphia settlement statement that Sharbutt had given him and other documents related to Sharbutt's relocation.
Lucas put the documents in his desk, and took the copies to PGW's General Counsel.
When Lucas returned to his office 15 minutes later, he noticed that the settlement sheet for the Philadelphia property was missing, although the other documents were still there.
Lucas' secretary said that Sharbutt had been by.
We obtained a copy of the settlement sheet that Sharbutt had provided to Lucas.
This settlement sheet, dated 4/30/96, lists $18,858.05 as the total "Paid from Borrower's Funds," and $18,130.00 as the total "Paid from Seller's Funds."
We also obtained a copy of the original settlement sheet from E
This settlement sheet, dated 4/15/96, shows $15,316.09 as the total "Paid from Borrower's Funds," and $18,640.50 as the total "Paid from Seller's Funds."
A comparison of the two sheets shows that several costs listed under "Paid from Borrower's Funds" have been significantly increased, resulting in falsely inflated closing costs.
The difference between the altered charges ($18,858) and the true charges ($15,316) is $3,542.
Because Sharbutt's actual closing costs were only $15,316.09, by forging the settlement sheet he was able to justify keeping an additional $3,541.96 of the $19,700 advance that he had authorized PGW to wire on his behalf.
Having heard this evidence, the Grand Jury of November 17,
64
1997 recommended that Sharbutt be charged with forgery and theft.
Sharbutt's request and receipt of reimbursement for an airline ticket that was never used Sharbutt testified before the grand jury, and said that he and his wife, Diana Sharbutt, came to Philadelphia in January, 1996.
He said that his wife then flew back to California.
A few weeks later, she drove back to Philadelphia with a friend, Sharon Haddox.
Some time around February, 1996, Sharbutt submitted a cash expense report to PGW, requesting reimbursement of several items, among them "househunting (spouse)" for a transportation charge of $1,345 for "Los Angeles to Phila."
Sharbutt attached a photocopy of a US Air roundtrip ticket for his wife to fly from Los Angeles to Philadelphia on 1/17/96, and then to return to Los Angeles on 1/27/96.
Sharbutt had charged this $1,345 ticket to his personal American Express credit card, and was seeking reimbursement.
PGW reimbursed him.
We reviewed Sharbutt's personal American Express credit card statements.
Sharbutt's February, 1996 statement reflects a charge on 1/16/96 for $1,345 for US Air ticket #0372102521795.
Sharbutt's March, 1996 statement shows a $1,345 credit on 2/22/96 for a US Air ticket #0303721025217959.
US Air informed us that Diana Sharbutt was a "no show" for the ticket, which was refunded to Sharbutt.
US Air also explained that the extra "03" at the beginning of the ticket, and the extra "9" at the end, are insignificant.
The actual ticket number begins with the "037" (which is the US Air code) and also consists of the next 10 digits.
Any number prior to the "037" indicates how the ticket was issued -- i.e., by a travel agent or the airline carrier.
The last number changes with each piece of paper (copy) generated for the issuance of each single ticket purchase.
Here, the number "9" is added by American Express when it refunds the ticket purchase price.
Having heard this evidence, the Grand Jury of November 17, 1997 recommended that Sharbutt be charged with one count of theft of $1,345.
Sharbutt's theft of $588 to fly to California for Thanksgiving weekend, allegedly to sell his house In November, 1996, Sharbutt charged a $588 roundtrip airline ticket to California.
On his November, 1996 expense report, Sharbutt wrote "Continental Airlines Ticket HSale Meeting."
In response to a memo from Hayllar in October, 1998, requesting further information about this and other charges, Sharbutt wrote "Relocation related expense trip for sale of home."
However, Sharbutt had sold his primary residence in California in Decem-
65
ber, 1995.
(He had sold his California rental property in midNovember, 1996, but was not entitled to any reimbursement from PGW for costs connected to the sale of his rental property.)
We learned that Sharbutt used this ticket to fly to California on Thanksgiving weekend, leaving Wednesday, 11/27/96 and returning Sunday, 12/1/96.
Having heard this evidence, we, the Grand Jury of September 9, 1999, have recommended that Sharbutt be charged with theft.
Sharbutt's manufacture of the Haddox invoice One of the moving expenses for which PGW reimbursed Sharbutt in 1998 was the cost, incurred in January, 1996, of transporting his Dodge and his Jeep Grand Cherokee from Valencia, California to Philadelphia.
In October, 1998, Sharbutt sought reimbursement from PGW for this expense (among others, including the closing costs on his Big Bear Lake property, discussed below).
As back up documentation for the vehicle transport expenses, Sharbutt submitted "Invoice No. 1001," dated 1/31/96, from "HADDOX" to Ramon and Diana Sharbutt for $1,894 for the transport of the vehicles in January, 1996.
Printed on the bottom of the invoice is the inscription "Thank you for your order!" Sharbutt's expense report which includes this charge appears to have been signed by Hawes on the "approved by" line.
PGW issued a check reimbursing Sharbutt for this (and the other expenses for which he was seeking reimbursement) in November, 1998.
We learned that "Haddox" is not a company but Sharon Haddox, a friend of Sharbutt's wife, Diana Sharbutt.
Sharon Haddox and Diana Sharbutt rented a U-Haul auto transport, which allowed one car to tow the other, and the women then drove from California to Philadelphia together.
Sharbutt paid for the lodging expenses of his wife and Haddox to travel across country, transporting the two vehicles, and also paid Haddox $500 cash, and paid for her airline ticket back to Texas.
Almost three years later, after having been told by Flamm that he owed PGW money, Sharbutt then manufactured this phony $1,894 invoice purporting to be from Haddox, and submitted it to PGW for reimbursement, which PGW paid.
Our investigator called Haddox in Texas.
She said that she did transport the vehicles with Diane, but that she did not submit any invoice to Sharbutt, and that she had not ever seen the "invoice."
She also said that she is not in the auto transport business.
In his grand jury testimony, Sharbutt acknowledged submitting the Haddox invoice to PGW for reimbursement.
Although Sharbutt first said that he did not remember whether he created
66
the invoice, and then said that he did not think that he created the invoice, and later said that he thought that it was his wife who created it, he eventually admitted that it was he who created the invoice.
He said that he "probably" showed it to Haddox, "but I don't know."
Asked whether Haddox could have submitted something to PGW, e.g., a written statement that "I did this for them and this is what they're paying me," Sharbutt answered: A.
I think if she had just written it out on a piece of paper, somebody would have said, well, that doesn't look very neat, and if she had typed it out or I had typed it out for her, it would have been the same thing.
It's a legitimate cost, and you know that the person who got it did what they said they did.
Do you think it's more legitimate for a person who really did some work to write, I did this work, and sign it; do you think that is more legitimate than somebody else creating an invoice in that person's name, maybe showing it to her, maybe not, and then submitting it as though she had submitted it? For example, this invoice says at the bottom, thank you for your order, which I guess you were writing to yourself.
That is in the program, the computer program, yes.
*** Did you create any other invoices purporting to be from other vendors and submit them to PGW? No, never had a need to do any other.
....
Q.
A. Q. A.
This evidence establishes that Sharbutt blatantly created a phony invoice, purporting to be from a legitimate third-party business, to conceal the fact that PGW was paying for a road trip for his wife and her friend.
Sharbutt was contractually entitled to reimbursement of relocation expenses, and he really did pay to have the vehicles transported across country.
Thus, PGW was not necessarily defrauded -- although, most likely, PGW would have paid less than $1,894, had Sharbutt used a commercial transport company, rather than paying his wife's friend to accompany her.
Consequently, it is not a warranted use of prosecutorial resources to arrest Sharbutt for his conduct in this matter.
Regardless of whether PGW lost any money on this transaction, however, we are appalled by the deceit exhibited by Sharbutt, PGW's CFO, in this transaction.
PGW's reimbursement of closing costs on Sharbutt's rental property in Big Bear Lake, California Sharbutt sold his second California residence, a rental property in Big Bear Lake, in November, 1996.
In October, 1998,
67
he submitted requests for reimbursement of his closing costs on that sale (along with expense reports seeking reimbursement of the Haddox invoice and other miscellaneous expenses).
These expense reports bear what appears to be Hawes' signature as approving reimbursement.
In November, 1998, Sharbutt gave these documents to Linda Baker, an employee in PGW's Treasury Department.
In January, 1999, Baker realized that these documents were missing, although it was not possible to determine at what point they had been taken, or by whom.
In January, 1999, PGW's internal auditors and in-house counsel questioned Sharbutt about his submission of closing costs on properties at two different addresses, i.e., Valencia and Big Bear Lake.
Sharbutt initially stated that one property was at the top of the mountain and the other property was at the bottom of the mountain.
This was a lie; in reality, the two properties are 130 miles apart.
Thereafter, he offered to reimburse PGW for the closing costs associated with the sale of his rental property at Big Bear Lake, and he wrote PGW a check for $6,146.
Sharbutt was then fired.
We asked Hawes if he in fact approved Sharbutt's request for reimbursement of closing costs on the Big Bear Lake property.
Hawes said that he had not had any discussion with Sharbutt about a second residence and that he did not know there was a second residence until he read it in the paper (i.e., after Sharbutt was fired).
We asked Hawes if the signature "Jim Hawes" on the approval line was in fact his signature.
Hawes initially said that it did not look like his, but then said that it was hard to say.
68
VII.
THE $59,000 "SECURITY SYSTEMS": HAWES' AND MARTIN'S PURCHASE OF GAS LANTERNS AND HOME SECURITY SYSTEMS AT THE RATEPAYERS' EXPENSE
Introduction We learned that Hawes and Martin arranged, as part of their so-called "executive protection plan," to purchase and install security systems, electric lighting and gas lanterns at their private homes at PGW's expense.
In doing this, they were assisted by Hugh Brydges, whom Martin had newly promoted to the position of Manager of Security.
Brydges testified about these matters before the grand jury under a grant of immunity.
These home improvements ("executive protection" components) cost PGW more than $59,000.
That is, at PGW's expense, Hawes had a $13,250 Vector alarm system installed at his house in October, 1996, and Martin had two separate alarm systems installed at his house: in November, 1996, he had an $8,882 Protection Bureau system installed, and then, just two months later, he had a $7,935 Vector system installed in its place, when he decided that the Protection Bureau system did not have all of the features that he wanted.
Additionally, Hawes and Martin had electric floodlights installed, at a cost to PGW of $7,700, and Martin also had electrical work done in the interior of his house (e.g., installing recessed lighting in his library and hallways), at a cost to PGW of approximately $2,000.
Further, Hawes and Martin had ornamental gas lanterns, costing more than $10,970, installed at their homes.
Hawes claimed that these were necessary to illuminate "dark spots" around his house where electric lighting would have been "unsightly."
PGW paid for the lanterns, but did not have to pay for their installation; rather, a PGW contractor did this work at no charge, hoping to be "remembered" at bid time, as he explained to us.
Hawes and Martin purchased these security systems and lighting without the knowledge or approval of PFMC.
Because all of the invoices were paid through a third-party vendor, who in turn generally sent PGW invoices noting simply "purchased services," the existence of these security systems and lighting remained secret from almost everyone at PGW.
Not until the Board suspended Martin in October, 1999, and Brydges advised Hayllar of the security systems' existence, did the Board learn about these expenditures.
We discuss our findings below.
69
The decision to have "executive protection" In July, 1996, Martin solicited a security consultant to write a letter recommending an "executive protection plan."
Then, in August, 1996, a few days before he purchased his Chestnut Hill home, Martin sent Hawes a memo, requesting approval to spend $5,000 on a home security system, at PGW's expense.
Martin appended the consultant's letter as justification for his request: ...
I am seeking your approval to go forward with the recommendation relating to home protection for Sharbutt, you and me.
The cost for hardware installation is about fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00), for all three residences and annual monitoring costs approximately one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200.00) for three residences.
....
Despite the fact that there had not been a single threat or act of violence against any of the three executives, Hawes decided that it would be appropriate for PGW to pay for the installation of security systems in the homes of its top three executive officers.
(Coincidentally, Hawes' house was then under construction, and his construction contract did not include installation of a security alarm system.)
Hawes signed Martin's memorandum on a line marked "Approved: James Hawes, III."
Reactivation of the Vector security system in Martin's house, and installation of a Vector security system in Hawes' house Timothy Begley, a Vector Security sales representative, testified before the grand jury that, when Martin purchased his house in Chestnut Hill, there already was a "Westec 2000" security system in place.
Begley described this system, which had been sold by Vector, as "pretty much standard in the industry."
The Martins reactivated this system; Mrs. Martin signed a personal check, dated 9/16/96, for $230, for Vector's reinspection cost and six months' monitoring service.
Begley further testified that, in October, 1996, Hawes arranged with Vector for the installation of a "Westec 5000" security system in his house, for which PGW paid $13,250, plus $552 for 12 months monitoring.
PGW paid an additional $552 for 12 months of long-range radio monitoring (a fee it paid again the following year.)
Subsequently, in November, 1997, Hawes signed an additional contract for Vector to install sensors in his garage, for $1,035 -- again, paid for by PGW. Sharbutt declined to have any system installed in his house.
Brydges testified that "Mr. Hawes instructed me to ask Mr. Sharbutt about [having a system installed].
I asked Mr. Sharbutt and he felt as though he didn't need a system, is what he told me."
70
Installation of The Protection Bureau security system at Martin's house A few weeks after Martin's wife paid Vector the six-month monitoring fee for the existing "Westec 2000" security system in their home, Martin decided that he wanted a new security system.
Brydges made some calls and, in mid-November, 1996, Martin signed a contract with The Protection Bureau for the installation of a new alarm system.
The contract price was $8,882, plus $97/month for monitoring and cellular backup, all paid by PGW.
One month later, in December, 1996, Martin wanted to upgrade his new system, and so ordered various components from The Protection Bureau.
However, in January, 1997, he canceled the contract, having decided to have a new Vector system installed instead.
The Protection Bureau delivered at least some of the components and billed for "parts" only.
Asked why Martin canceled his contract with The Protection Bureau and decided to have a new system installed by Vector in its place, Brydges testified: ...
The system didn't do exactly what Mr. Martin wanted it to do. ...
In other words, when you opened the door, it didn't tell you the door was open, but the system was the system that was supposed to be put in.
The system that was in there was the system that was agreed upon by Mr. Martin.
Installation of a new Vector system in Martin's house At Martin's instruction, Brydges contacted Begley, the Vector sales representative, to install the new Vector security system at Martin's residence.
Begley said that the "Westec 2000" was no longer manufactured at that time, so he could not return to that system.
Instead, Vector installed a "Westec 5000" system at Martin's house, the same Westec model that Vector had installed at Hawes' house.
In January, 1997, Martin signed the agreement with Vector for installation of the "Westec 5000" system.
The cost of the system was $8,125.
In February, 1997, Martin purchased additional Vector components for another $1,020, and several months later, he purchased another $1,005 of components.
PGW paid all of the bills.
The following year, PGW paid another $552 for monitoring.
71
Installation of electric perimeter lighting at Hawes' and Martin's houses, and interior electrical improvements at Martin's house In addition to paying for the purchase and installation of security systems at Hawes' and Martin's private residences, PGW also paid for the purchase and installation of electric floodlights at their residences.
Moreover, PGW also paid for interior electrical work done at Martin's house, such as installing recessed lighting in his library.
We learned the following.
Brydges testified that either subject of perimeter lighting with John J. McGettigan, an electrical that he walked around the outside gan, and that McGettigan may have house with Mrs. Martin.
Hawes or Martin brought up the him.
Brydges then contacted contractor.
Brydges recalled of Martin's house with McGettigone through the inside of the
Subsequently, McGettigan submitted three separate proposals: (1) a proposal dated 4/1/97, addressed to Mr. and Mrs. Gregory D. Martin at their home address, for $1,376 to $1,553 of interior electrical work (e.g., installing a hanging fixture in the foyer, installing recessed lighting in the library and in certain hallways, and adding a second switch to divide the existing fan and light unit in the son's bathroom); (2) a proposal dated 4/1/97 and addressed to "Huey Bridges" at PGW, to install exterior floodlights at Martin's residence for $3,866; and (3) a proposal dated 4/21/97 and addressed to "Huey Bridges" at PGW, to furnish and install 10 floodlight locations at Hawes' residence for $3,495.
Ultimately, McGettigan installed 11 floodlight locations at Martin's house and 11 floodlight locations at Hawes' house.
He then sent two separate invoices to PGW, the first for $5,921, for the work at Martin's house, and the second for $3,835, for the work at Hawes' house.
Nothing on McGettigan's invoice for his work at Martin's house indicates that it includes any interior work.
However, McGettigan's wife (and bookkeeper) told our investigator that the $5,921 included $3,866 of exterior work and $1,553 of interior work performed at Martin's house, as well as another $352 of additional interior work performed pursuant to a verbal agreement after McGettigan had started the work.
Additionally, there was a $150 charge for permit and inspection fees.
Explaining why she billed this way, McGettigan's wife said that she spoke with Brydges, who told her to charge the total amount due for both the interior and exterior work on a single invoice, but to only note the exterior lighting on the invoice.
Brydges testified that Martin handed him McGettigan's pro-
72
posal for the interior work and said, "You are going to take care of this, right?" Brydges said that he replied, "I'm going to pay it under the executive protection," and Martin said "Okay."
Brydges then called Mrs. McGettigan and told her to bill all of the work on a single invoice, but not to show the interior work on the invoice.
Purchase of the gas lanterns for Hawes' and Martin's homes In addition to the security systems and electric perimeter lighting, Hawes and Martin also had large, decorative gas lanterns installed around their homes at PGW's expense.
Hawes initially ordered two small pier lanterns "To provide lighting when you come down my driveway, down in the courtyard."
However, after paying $1,000 of his own money to have these (and a small garage heater) installed, and upon learning that the installation costs for additional, larger gas lanterns would be quite high, Hawes then had PGW pay for the purchase and installation of the larger lanterns, ostensibly as part of his "executive protection."
Brydges testified that Hawes informed him that he wanted to install gas lanterns at his house, at PGW's expense.
Brydges recalled: A.
I was up in Mr. Hawes' office and I believe I was up there about the alarm system, and he mentioned that he wanted to put gas lighting in his perimeter lighting for executive protection.
And I thought it was kind of odd and I made a face or something.
He said, as the CEO of a gas company, I should have gas lighting out there, especially if we are going to market it.
*** After I had the conversation, I went in to Mr. Martin's office, that is who I was reporting to, and I explained and I told him what Mr. Hawes said and he kind of made a face and said I'll talk to Jim, is what he said.
...
How would you describe that face that he made? Like a surprised face.
Q. A.
A short time later, Brydges asked Martin about Hawes' statements: A. Q. A.
A few days later, I asked him, did he talk to gas lighting.
And he said, yeah.
As a matter we're going to put them in both houses, Jim's Did he explain why? He said -- he pretty much said the same thing.
are going to market this stuff, we should show example.
Jim about of fact, and mine.
If we by
73
After Martin approved proceeding, "I believe I went back to Jim Hawes ... and he gave me a pamphlet [to show me] exactly what he wanted, what kind of lighting he already had so he knew exactly what he wanted already."
Brydges then contacted John Conti at Continent Supply, the dealer from whom Hawes had ordered the small pier lights, and ordered six larger, matching lanterns for Hawes' residence.
Several weeks later, on 6/27/97, Brydges placed an additional order for five more gas lanterns.
On 6/11/97, Conti sent Hawes and his wife an invoice for $432.28 for the garage heater and the two pier lamps (and sales tax).
Conti was not paid until late July, when he received a personal check signed by Sheila Hawes for only $203, dated 7/23/97.
He applied the $203 toward the heater.
Thus, as of July, 1997, Hawes still owed Continent Supply for the two pier lights, and the balance on the heater.
Conti said that he was concerned that Continent Supply had not been paid for any of the lanterns, and so spoke with Brydges.
Brydges told him to submit a bill, and to put on the invoice: "Invoice for gas security lighting for executive protection."
Conti said that this was the first time that Brydges or anyone had ever said anything to him about security.
Asked whether he had any reaction to Brydges' instruction, Conti replied: Not really.
I think at that point, I guess I wanted to get paid.
So there it is.
A JUROR: That is the reaction: Pay me.
THE WITNESS: Whatever it took to get paid.
Conti sent the invoice, dated 8/4/97, for $10,970 for the 11 gas lanterns and the two pier lights, and was paid promptly.
Asked about the inclusion of the two pier lights on the invoice, Brydges testified that he never would have told Conti to put them on the invoice had he not first spoken with Hawes.
Conti testified that, in all of his other dealings with PGW, he always received a purchase order for whatever he sold them, either before the sale or, in an emergency, after the sale.
In this instance, he never received a purchase order from PGW.
Installation of the gas lanterns at Hawes' and Martin's houses Discussing the installation of the suggested to Hawes "Mr. Hawes said no matter with Hawes, Brydges arranged for the gas lanterns.
Brydges testified that he that PGW employees install the lights, but way.
We don't want our employees doing that."
Brydges then contacted Austin Meehan, III, a vice-president at General Asphalt Paving Company, a PGW contractor that handles
74
gas main installation and roadway paving.
Hawes had told Brydges to ask Meehan to lend them the equipment.
(Brydges recalled, "Hawes would be doing the work.
I think he was waiting for me to volunteer, but it was a Saturday.")
Meehan said that he did not want to lend his equipment out unmanned, and so offered to do the work himself.
Meehan and his friends installed the lanterns at Hawes' and Martin's houses.
As a result of a discussion between Hawes and his wife, Hawes told Meehan to put in only four of the six lanterns at his house.
Meehan then installed six lanterns at Martin's house.
As of the date that he testified before the grand jury (February, 2000), Meehan still had one lantern in his warehouse.
Meehan estimated that, had Hawes and Martin paid for the installation of the lanterns, it would have cost them about $1,800 (union-scale wages) each.
However, Meehan never sent a bill, even though Hawes said to make sure that he got a bill, and Brydges later asked for one.
Asked why he did not charge Hawes or Martin for installing the lanterns, Meehan said: Basically, PR.
You know, these guys are the big shots of the company that our company works for.
You know, you charge somebody and even if you undercharge somebody and they feel you're overcharging them, even if you're right and they're wrong, they could get mad at you. ...
It's basically PR.
[W]hen it comes time, when the work comes out, they remember you [at]
You're on the bid list.
You ... do favors for a lot of people, not just big shots.
Asked whether General Asphalt got any contracts because of the favor that it did for Hawes and Martin, Meehan said "No is the answer.
As a matter of fact, I think we got less."
A 
Meehan's other work at Hawes' house Meehan told the grand jury that, while he was installing the gas lanterns, Hawes took him around his property.
Meehan inquired about an in-law suite that Hawes was building in the back, and how it would be accessed.
Hawes said he had to put in a driveway, and Meehan told him that he would "give him a hand."
Thus, in September, 1997, Meehan had $1,037 of crushed stone delivered to Hawes' house, and he put in the driveway.
Meehan
75
did not bill Hawes for the crushed stone.
Additionally, even before he installed the lanterns, Meehan dropped off some cobblestone at Hawes' house for the front of Hawes' driveway.
Meehan explained that when his company digs up roads to install water and sewer lines, if they come across cobblestone, they store it at their yard and sell it.
Meehan did not count how many cobblestones he delivered, but estimated, as a ball park figure, that he delivered to Hawes $400 worth of cobblestone.
However, he never billed Hawes for this.
Payment of invoices for security systems and gas lanterns through a third-party vendor The bills for the security systems, floodlights, and gas lanterns were all passed to Protection Technology, Incorporated (PTI), an approved PGW security vendor that supplies unarmed security guards for PGW's district offices.
PTI paid the bills for PGW, and then billed PGW for reimbursement.
Because of this arrangement, almost no one at PGW knew about Hawes' and Martin's expenditures.
Brydges explained that when Hawes gave him the first bill (from Vector), he asked Hawes how he was going to pay it.
Hawes told him to see Sharbutt.
Sharbutt told him to pass the bills through PTI.
When Brydges passed the bills to PTI, he instructed PTI what to write on its ensuing invoice to PGW.
We found that these notations were often vague or misleading.
For example, Continent Supply's bill for $10,970 for Hawes' and Martin's gas lanterns was billed by PTI to PGW as "Purchase Services."
Similarly, Vector's bill for $1,020 for installation of the additional security items ordered by Martin was billed as "Training/Billable."
Testifying about these billing arrangements, Eric Follman, an assistant vice president for PTI, testified that Brydges told him that PGW did not want the union to see what it was doing in preparation for the upcoming labor negotiations.
Follman also said that PTI is able to pay vendors more promptly than PGW can, and some vendors insist on prompt payment.
The Board's discovery of the "executive protection program" Brydges testified that, when Hawes resigned in October, 1998, he (Brydges) asked Sharbutt what he should do about Hawes' home security system.
Sharbutt said that he would get back to him.
A day or so later, Sharbutt told him to "abandon the system" -- to leave the system in place because it would be costly to remove it.
Brydges said that he discussed this with Martin and Martin agreed.
76
When Martin was put on administrative leave in October, 1999, Brydges asked Hayllar what he wanted done about Martin's home security system.
Hayllar replied that he did not know that the executives had security systems at PGW's expense.
Thereafter, PGW advised the District Attorney's Office of this matter.
Absence of threats or acts of violence against executive management In his 8/96 memo to Hawes requesting approval for a $5,000 home security system, Martin sought to justify PGW's payment of this expense by appending the letter that he had solicited from the security consultant.
The consultant's letter stated that "there have been incidences wherein threats and acts of intimidation have been made toward senior management personnel by employees and the general public."
The consultant's letter further stated that customer complaints had become more numerous and hostile.
Additionally, the consultant observed that members of President Clinton's cabinet had been targets of implied threats.
We learned, however, that there were never any threats 22 against PGW's top management.
We subpoenaed and reviewed all memoranda, reports, files and any and all other documents maintained for the period 1988-1998 that record threats, assaults, or other serious incidents of violence or potential violence against or involving any PGW employee, executive, property or location.
Of these, none record any threat or incident involving executive management employees; instead, the relatively small number of documented threats or incidents were all directed against meter readers and other field employees.
Notably, Hawes did not approve any home security for any employee below himself, Martin and Sharbutt.
Nor was any threat to executive 1998 contract negotiations (1 years submitted his memo to Hawes in 1996).
Chairman of PFMC when Hawes approved grand jury that "[T]he union had done would have given rise to any concern 22
security presented by the in the future when Martin Rotan Lee, who was the these expenditures, told the nothing in my view that at any level about physical
At Martin's request, PGW gave him one of the 68 guns that it has left over from the days when it had its own armed security officers.
According to Brydges, Martin asked for the gun merely so that he could practice at the shooting range so as to qualify for "235 certification" (the certification necessary to be a guard at PGW).
Asked whether Martin gave any indication that he needed the gun because of any threats, Brydges replied, "No, no, strictly for the training and the certification."
When Martin was terminated, Brydges asked him to return the gun.
Martin told Brydges that he lost it.
77
safety."
Similarly, Brydges testified that he was not aware of any threat to the top executives.
Moreover, the contract negotiations went smoothly when they eventually were held: Management and the union began negotiations in March, 1998, and reached a three-year labor agreement on 6/5/98, without any incidents.
Whether gas lanterns can be used as security Clearly, the gas lanterns installed at Hawes' and Martin's properties were simply aesthetic home improvements and had nothing to do with security.
Philip Deming, the security consultant, explained to the grand jury that, for security purposes, exterior lighting should consist of a "floodlight type of a device" that faces away from the house at whomever might be coming toward the house.
This lighting blinds the intruder, and gives the advantage to the person on the interior of the house.
Asked what role gas lanterns would play in a security system, Deming replied: I don't have a single recollection where I've ever had an executive install gas lantern lighting for a number of reasons.
One is ...
it doesn't give off the lightness that you need.
Secondly, the way it's going to be positioned on the property, and again I don't know much about gas lighting, but I can't imagine a flood fixture being gas feed [sic].
Maybe there is something out there, but I've never seen it, and I have seen the lighting at the [Hawes'] residence just a couple of weeks ago out of curiosity and it's not the type of lighting that you would desire if you are trying to protect that residence.
Significantly, Conti testified that Hawes asked Conti's wife to make a recommendation about which style of lantern he should choose based solely on her artistic sense, not based on any security concerns.
Thereafter, Hawes decided where to place the lanterns based on his wife's opinion, not based on the recommendation of any security expert.
Hawes explained, "I think that security people that anything that makes you more secure is part of Plainly, however, calling these lanterns "security" nothing more than a lame attempt to justify the use for personal expenses.
will tell you security."
components is of PGW money
Absence of authority to approve the installation of security systems, electric lighting and gas lanterns at PGW's expense Neither Hawes nor Martin had authority or permission to
78
spend any of PGW's money, let alone $59,000, on security systems and lighting for their private homes.
As discussed below, neither Hawes nor Martin could authorize these expenditures, because the expenditures were not reasonable, necessary or customary business expenses.
Instead, the $59,000 worth of security systems, floodlights, interior lighting and decorative gas lanterns installed at Hawes' and Martin's homes were clearly just expensive, aesthetic capital improvements to the private residences of two executives, who will personally profit from these improvements whenever they sell their homes.
As such, these expenditures were a form of "compensation," and so required prior Board approval -- which Hawes and Martin neither sought nor obtained.
These expenditures were not reasonable business expenses.
First, no company would pay almost $60,000 to install security systems in just two homes, absent some extraordinary circumstances.
At almost $30,000 per house, Hawes' and Martin's spending was wildly out of line with what would be offered even by the private-sector companies that do offer some version of this benefit.
Second, Martin had an $8,882 security system installed in his house and then, two months later, having decided that he would like different features, he had a $8,125 security system installed in its place.
No responsibly-managed company would cater that kind of capriciousness, or reimburse for that kind of extravagant spending; no responsibly-managed company would view that as a reasonable business expense.
Nor were any of these expenditures customary business expenses.
That is, corporations do not customarily pay $59,000 for home security systems for two executives, corporations never pay for interior electrical work or for decorative gas lighting as "security," and the City never pays for home security systems or decorative home lighting for anyone.
In any event, whatever private utilities do, upon vote and approval of their boards, is irrelevant to what a quasi-public employee may do with ratepayer money.
Finally, these were not necessary business expenses, as there had never been any threat or violence directed against executive management.
Clearly, Hawes and Martin were just improving their new homes at PGW's expense.
As such, their use of PGW funds to purchase security systems and lighting was a form of compensation.
Hawes' and Martin's contracts required prior Board approval for such "items of compensation."
However, neither Hawes nor Martin sought Board approval, and the Board knew nothing of these purchases until 1999.
79
Conclusion Based on this evidence, we recommend that Hawes and Martin be charged with Theft by Unlawful Taking or Disposition, Theft by Deception, Receiving Stolen Property, and Theft by Failure to Make Required Disposition of Funds Received (18 Pa.C.S.A.
3921, 3922, 3925 and 3927), and Conspiracy (18 Pa.C.S.A.
902).
80
VIII.
HAWES' USE OF PGW'S SALES TAX EXEMPTION FOR PERSONAL PURCHASES
During this investigation, we discovered that Hawes used PGW's state sales tax exemption number to avoid paying sales tax when he purchased $20,000 worth of lawn equipment for his personal use.
Although he paid for this equipment with a personal check, his use of PGW's tax-exemption number and a PGW purchase order form enabled him to save more than $1,200 of state sales tax that he otherwise would have owed.
In 1997, Hawes made three purchases from Paul W. Histand Co., Inc., a lawn and garden equipment dealer in Doylestown: In April, 1997, he purchased a Kubota tractor for $19,023; in September, 1997, he purchased a platform carrier and boom for $323; and in November, 1997, he purchased two leaf blowers and accessories for $1,163.
We obtained documents concerning these three sales from Histand Company.
In addition to the Histand Company purchase order forms for the three sales, the documents provided by Histand's included a PGW purchase order form for the purchase of the tractor.
These documents show that, although Hawes paid the $22 of sales tax on the platform carrier and boom, he avoided $1,141 of sales tax on the Kubota tractor and $69 of tax on the leaf blowers by using PGW's tax exemption number.
Significantly, the Histand purchase order form for the $19,023 Kubota tractor lists "Philadelphia Gas Works" at 800 W. Montgomery Avenue as the buyer.
Under Sales Tax is the handwritten entry "Exempt."
There is an accompanying PGW purchase order for this sale.
The PGW purchase order lists as the "Ship to" address "Philadelphia Gas Works, 800 W. Montgomery Avenue, Philadelphia."
Typed in the "Purchase Order No." block is "971," indicating that this was the first purchase order of FY 1997 (which began 9/1/96 -- i.e., approximately eight months earlier).
At the bottom of the purchase order is PGW's sales tax exemption number.
Although there is a signature line at the bottom of the form, no signature appears on the form.
At the top of the purchase order form appears a line of type, imprinted by Histand Company's fax machine, that reads: "FR PGW EXEC OFFICE" with the fax numbers that it was sent from and to, and the date and time.
Hawes paid for this purchase with a personal check.
A copy of this purchase order is appended to this Report as Exhibit D. Histand Company's purchase order for the second purchase -the platform carrier and boom -- shows that the items cost $323.00, plus $22.61 sales tax, for a total of $345.61.
The Buyer is listed as James Hawes III at Hawes' residential address.
Hawes paid for this purchase with a personal check.
Finally, Histand Company's purchase order for the leaf
81
blowers and accessories, totaling $1,163, lists "Phila.
Gas Works" at 800 West Montgomery Avenue as the Buyer, and bears the signatures "J. Hawes."
Under "Sales Tax" is the handwritten entry "Exempt."
Hawes' bank records show that he paid Histands $1,163.00 by personal check.
Through our investigator, we contacted Wendell Histand, the sales manager of Histand Company.
Histand stated that he was unaware of any business relationship between PGW and Histand's prior to his sale to Hawes, and that he first met Hawes when Hawes inquired about buying a Kubota tractor.
Histand stated that the invoice listed PGW as the buyer because that is who Hawes told him was the purchaser.
(Hawes had previously told him that he was the CEO of PGW.)
Because PGW was the purchaser, there was no need to compute state sales tax.
Histand stated that he did recall that Hawes paid with his personal check, and he did not recall seeing the PGW requisition form; however, he said that no one at Histand Company would have inserted PGW's sales tax exemption number on the requisition form, because they would not have known what it was.
Histand stated that he personally delivered the tractor to Hawes' residence and gave Hawes an abbreviated lesson on its operation.
As to the third purchase (identified by Histand as a large 8 HP leaf blower and a smaller hand held blower, and a vacuum kit for the larger blower), Histand stated that Hawes said that the blower would be purchased by PGW, so no tax was computed.
Once again, Histand did not recall that Hawes paid by personal check.
Hawes, or someone on his behalf, picked up the items; they were not delivered by Histand Company.
Our investigator asked Nancy Power, Hawes' secretary, whether she typed or faxed the purchase order.
She recalled typing a list for Hawes that outlined the specifics for a tractor and attachments, but said that she did not recall typing any purchase order or requisition.
She said that the fax machine in her office is strictly for the use of the CEO and his secretary, and that only when there was a problem with a fax machine in the other departments near her did anyone else use that machine.
She said that she cannot recall anyone from Materials Management Department using her fax, and that that department has several of its own fax machines.
She was familiar with PGW's tax-exempt number, but did not recall ever writing it on a document.
We showed Hawes the PGW purchase order and asked him who typed it.
Hawes replied that he did not have "the slightest idea" and said that he did not know why the purchase order was on a PGW form.
However, Hawes eventually testified that "maybe" he had faxed the form to Histand's: Q.
Did you give that PGW purchase order to Histand's?
82
A. Q. A. Q. A.
Q. A. Q. A. Q. A.
Q. A. Q. A. Q. A. Q. A. Q A. Q. A. Q. A. Q. A.
I'm not sure why I would have.
Did you? I don't remember.
You're under oath.
Did you give it to them? I don't know.
*** I don't remember sending it to them.
There would be no reason for me to send it to them because I paid for it.
Where might it come from if you didn't send it to them? I really don't know.
*** It says sales tax exempt; correct? Right, right.
Why is it sales tax exempt? I'm not sure, but what I remember was I negotiated a price with them.
I didn't look at how they allocated the dollars between exempt and non-exempt.
I never paid any attention to -- until I just saw that there [now].
So I don't know if in allocating -- I suspect maybe that with that purchase order, it suggested to them that it was for PGW.
I don't know.
But that certainly wasn't the case, and they knew it wasn't the case.
I negotiated a price.
How they allocate that price, I have no idea and at that point didn't really care.
But they knew because they delivered it to my house and I paid for it.
*** [Histand's] would not have had that tax exemption number had not somebody faxed this [PGW Purchase Order form]
So you think Histand might have had the tax exemption number all on their own and just stuck it in there? They could have, I don't know.
They could have.
Where would they have gotten it from? They could have gotten it from PGW, I don't know.
*** Let me ask you, you don't know how this purchase order got up there [or] you don't remember? Maybe we sent it, but I don't know why.
Maybe we, meaning you? Maybe.
Maybe you sent it.
Maybe did you put this tax exemption [number] on the bottom? Absolutely not; absolutely not.
Maybe did somebody else put it there at your direction? I would not have directed anybody to put it there.
*** Did you ever use PGW paper purchase orders or any other PGW paper for any other personal purchases? Not that I know of.
83
Q. A. Q. A. Q. A.
Q. A. Q. A. Q. A. Q. A.
*** You don't remember typing this, is that correct, or you didn't type it? I know I didn't type it. *** ...
Do you remember asking anybody to type this? No, I do not.
*** I don't recall at this point asking anybody to type it.
But you might have? I don't think so.
*** The only thing I can think of -- Shane [Creamer, Hawes' attorney] and I were just having some discussion back and forth, and the only thing I can think of, and I probably should have been more on top of this, was when I -- when we moved in the house, with all of the things that needed to be done, I kind of like tractors and I like to do a lot of my own work.
So what I did, not knowing Philadelphia, as I remember, I asked the people in our Purchasing Department, who normally would deal with things like this, to ask, and, you know, I probably said, where do we buy tractors, and that is why I wasn't sure whether we buy tractors from there or not.
*** But I asked them [in PGW's Purchasing Department] to tell me, you know, just as casually where I maybe could get the best price on a tractor.
Now, I don't know if in calling around, the estimates included the sales tax or didn't include sales tax.
I just had a number and I chose them based on the fact that they was [sic] slightly lower than anybody else.
Now, what happened after that relative to the tax, I'm just not sure.
I don't know if -You're not saying that you think this purchase order was written out and faxed up by somebody in your Purchasing Department, are you? No, I'm not saying -- I'm not -- you mean who -whether they typed it or not? I don't know if this was typed in our Purchasing Department or not.
You don't know where this came from? I'm not sure at this point.
It may have come from our Purchasing Department.
Might it [have] come from you? I would doubt it.
You would doubt it, but you don't know, it might have? I don't know.
It might have.
I don't know.
But the only thing I'm saying is that the information on there is the same estimated information that I think I got back from them.
So it could have been that given that,
84
Q. A.
they could have called and asked for an ID number and somebody sent it to them.
I'm not sure.
*** So ... who in purchasing did you ask to do all this work for you? I would have to check, but it was one of the purchasing people.
I can check and we can tell you.
Months later, Hawes identified the person in the Purchasing Department who allegedly made the phone calls for him as Ken Williams.
Williams appeared before the grand jury.
He testified that Hawes had called him and said that he was interested in buying a tractor and asked him to identify vendors in the area.
Williams gave Hawes the name of vendors who sold PGW back hoes and digger loaders, thinking that those vendors might also sell tractors.
Williams also gave Hawes the names of tractor dealers from the Yellow Pages, including Histand's.
Shown the PGW purchase order form for the Kubota tractor, Williams testified that he did not type the purchase order, did not fax it, and had never seen it until we showed it to him.
Williams further testified that the purchase order number, 97-1, is not a PGW purchase order number, because PGW numbers are five digits.
Additionally, he said, PGW purchase orders do not include the year ("97") but are numbered sequentially by the vendor information system.
Williams also testified that in his 19 years at PGW he had never seen PGW's sales tax exemption number handwritten on a purchase order form; typically, the Purchasing Department sends the vendor a separate tax form.
Further, Williams said that, although there is a typewriter in the Purchasing Department, PGW uses a computer to generate its purchase orders, except in emergency situations.
Finally, Williams noted the absence of a signature on this form and said that he had never seen a purchase order without a signature.
Williams also explained that purchase order forms are kept in the Purchasing Department.
Once executed, duplicate copies of a purchase order are sent to other departments within PGW.
At our request, after he testified, Williams searched PGW's files, but found no duplicate copies of this purchase order.
The grand jury found Williams' testimony credible.
Clearly, there was no reason for anyone to prepare a PGW purchase order or to list the buyer as PGW for this personal purchase -- no reason, that is, other than to avoid sales tax.
Moreover, we do not believe that anyone other than Hawes, or someone acting at his direction, would have faxed this from the Executive Offices at PGW.
We are concerned that Hawes used PGW's sales tax exemption number to avoid paying sales tax on these
85
personal purchases, and we therefore recommend that this matter be referred to the state Attorney General's Tax Investigations section.
86
IX.
PGW'S SEARCH FOR A DIRECTOR OF HUMAN RESOURCES
In October, 1996, Hawes hired Deborah Perry Estrin as PGW's new Vice President and Director of Human Resources, at a yearly salary of $175,000, plus annual incentive compensation "[t]he maximum amount of [which]
In December, 1998, upon evidence that Estrin had charged thousands of dollars of personal expenses on her PGW credit card, Hayllar fired her.
As with Hawes, Martin, and Sharbutt, we are appalled at how this executive search was conducted, including the failure to perform any reasonable background investigation on Estrin before hiring her.
This chapter discusses how Estrin was hired and why she was fired, and briefly notes the collateral damage.
PGW hired Cole-Warren 
("CWL") -- the same firm that conducted the executive search for Hawes, Martin, and Sharbutt -- to conduct this executive search.
There was no bidding and no formal contract; instead, Hawes simply spoke about the matter with Ronald Cole, the president of CWL.
The day after this conversation, Cole sent Hawes a letter proposing how his firm would conduct the search.
In his letter, dated 5/1/96, Cole said that CWL would bill PGW $150 per hour, and estimated that a maximum of 250-275 hours would be needed (i.e., that CWL's services would cost $37,500 to $41,250).
Ultimately, CWL billed PGW $41,250 plus expenses for this search.
During the course of Hawes' and Cole's conversation on 4/30/96, Hawes told Cole what qualities he was looking for in a Human Resources Director.
In our review of CWL's files, we found two sheets of yellow legal paper with Cole's handwritten notes from that conversation, listing the qualities that Hawes wanted in candidates for the position.
These included: Bell Atlantic type energy -- high change coming -- redefine jobs taking $ away union exp 
23
87
not black When he appeared before the grand jury, we asked Cole about his notes, and he said that, when he wrote "white woman preferred, not black," he was writing down Hawes' words "exactly."
Ironically, on May 10, 1996, a little more than a week after telling Cole that he would prefer a white woman, "not black," as Director of Human Resources, Hawes went to New York to accept the NAACP Fair Share Award for Diversity on behalf of PGW, an award given to "those U.S. companies ... whose policies have demonstrated opportunities for Blacks at every level of their corporate structure...."
An article about this event in the Philadelphia Tribune quotes Hawes as saying, "My experience, and this is well documented, has taught me that decisions where the group is diverse, the quality will be consistently much better."
(Philadelphia Tribune, 6/4/96, pg. 1-B.) is to did he When he appeared to testify African-American) whether he have a white female for this not think he would have done did, it was not something of Q. A. Q. A. Q. A. Q. A. Q. A. before us, we asked Hawes (who had told Cole that he preferred position.
Hawes answered that he that, but he could have, and if which he would be ashamed:
Did you specify to Cole, Warren that you wanted whites or blacks or Hispanics or females or males? No.
Did you -No, I say no, I don't remember doing it for this job.
I would not have had that as a major concern.
But you might have for another position? I don't know.
I don't know.
I don't think so, but I don't know.
*** Did you ever tell Cole, Warren that you wanted a white female for the position of Human Resources Director? I don't think I would have done that, no.
Why wouldn't you have done that? Because I don't know that it would have been a priority.
I think -- I do believe, and I believe strongly, that when you have decision makers that reflect your customer base in terms of race and gender and other issues, that your decisions will usually be better decisions more appropriate for the marketplace.
I do believe that, and I believe fairly strongly that, but we already had a fairly good mix, and so in the case of -- in Deborah's case, I don't think that would have been an issue, and it would never have been an issue as the first priority, but certainly something that we thought was important.
88
Q. A. Q. A.
Q. A.
Q. A. Q. A. Q. A. Q. A.
See, we already had at that point a mix that was relatively reflective of our customers, relatively so.
*** None of whom [on your senior team] is a white female; correct? Right.
So is it possible that you told Mr. Cole that you wanted and that you would prefer a white female? I don't know.
I could have, but it would never be the determining factor.
If we, in fact, did not have on the team a white female, then it would make some sense because, you know, there are laws that govern makeups, and them being reflective of the population base and so forth.
But I could have.
And if I did, that is not something I would be ashamed of.
Okay, so if Ron Cole's notes indicate that you said white woman preferred, quality of decisions, that might, in fact, have been something that you said? It would be hard for me to say.
I guess what I'm telling you is, outside of that, what I would say is that on the team at that point, we had everything except a white female.
We had a Jewish person.
We had three African-Americans.
We had white males.
We had [a] black female, and so, I mean, it would be logical.
But that would not have been the basis upon which the decision would have been made to hire somebody.
The qualifications would have been first.
So it might have played a role, but not the role? Right, right.
Would you have possibly told him that you didn't want a black woman? No.
You would not have said that? I don't think I would have said that.
Might you have said it? I doubt it.
But, again, if we at that point were trying to get a profile reflective of our customers, it would have made sense, to the best of our abilities, to not have a black female or black anything.
But I don't -- I would not see myself limiting the field for that reason.
In other words, if they brought me the best candidate and it was a black female, then that is what we would have hired.
On June 27, 1996, Cole sent Hawes a confidential "Interview Summary Report" presenting two interview summaries, in order of recommendation, for candidates for the Human Resources director.
The first of these summarizes CWL's interview of Deborah Estrin, who was then Vice President of Human Resources at New York Power
89
Authority, and who previously had been employed at USPCI (a subsidiary of Union Pacific Corporation), Ciba-Geigy and Hunt Wesson.
The interview summary begins: GENERAL IMPRESSION The overall impression of the candidate is outstanding.
She is a highly polished and sophisticated professional executive who has her act "totally put together".
She is 5'4" tall, has long blond24hair and makes an excellent first and lasting impression.[ ] She came to the interview in a tailored business suit and has executive presence and image.
Her height and weight seem appropriate and she appears to be in excellent health.
She is an intense listener who directly answers questions with facts, figures and examples, keeping everything focused and "to the point".
She quickly understands and can shift conversational gears with little difficulty and has excellent clarity of ideas.
The candidate has a soft and pleasant Virginia accented voice.
While she appears to be soft and pleasant, there is little doubt that she is one "tough lady" who has had lots of scar tissue.
....
Under "Experience Summary," CWL's report includes a paragraph (perhaps to show that Estrin is "one tough lady," able to negotiate with unions) describing her involvement in an FBI sting while she was the Personnel Manager for Hunt-Wesson Foods in Savannah, Georgia from 1978 to 1982.
According to the report, Estrin fired a male plant worker who had assaulted a female employee.
The male went to a local bar and made a number of statements threatening to pay for a "hit" on Estrin, threats which he later repeated.
Estrin then transferred to a plant in Valparaiso, Indiana, for a month, where "she worked putting labels on potato chip packages," according to the interview summary.
The paragraph continues: The inclusion of a physical description at the outset of the interview summary was not unique to Estrin's interview.
Rather, this appeared in many of the summaries in CWL's files that we reviewed.
For example, the interview summary for one candidate for the COO position notes: "The candidate is 5'9" tall, weighs 250 lbs, is short and stocky, and appeared in the interview in a blue suit, white shirt and appropriate tie.
While heavy, he appears to be in good health."
Cole -- who testified that he did not interview Estrin, did not write the summary, and did not think that Estrin's physical description should have been included -nonetheless explained that, "we sometimes will try to show the candidate to the client in words, how that person showed up for the interview."
24
90
After one month, she returned to Savannah as the "hit noise" had died down.
Once she returned to Savannah, the "hit noise" started again.
Because of the danger, she was assigned a female FBI agent who moved in with her and accompanied her (with weapon) every place the candidate went.
She even roomed with the candidate.
This protection lasted for six months.
The FBI set up a sting operation where the worker came to a hotel room and paid an FBI agent "hit" money.
It was recorded on film and audio.
The worker was arrested, convicted and sent to prison.
This interesting vignette seems somewhat far-fetched.
There being no apparent federal crime involved, it is difficult to understand why the FBI would be involved at all, let alone why it would commit such tremendous resources to a case of terroristic threats (a misdemeanor in Pennsylvania).
Of course, once the worker allegedly paid the FBI agent the "hit money," there would be solicitation and conspiracy to murder, but according to Cole's summary of Estrin's story, an FBI agent was assigned to live with her solely because the worker allegedly had made public threats.
It is amusing, but somewhat incredible, to imagine a corporate personnel manager putting labels on potato chip packages for a month.
(Actually, it is difficult to imagine that any person performs such a function, which could be done faster and more cheaply by a machine.)
Although we found her story somewhat farfetched, apparently no one at CWL or PGW was so skeptical.
Indeed, Hawes testified that "[I]f ... she was moved to put labels on potato chips, I might find that strange.
But if in [CWL's] judgment she was the best candidate ... then I probably would go along with that decision."
Hawes testified that he did not remember whether he asked Estrin about the potato chips or the threats or about living with the FBI agent.
Because we were somewhat more skeptical of this story than was Hawes, we attempted to substantiate it.
However, given the passage of time, and without any more specific information, it was impossible to do so.
CWL's background check on Estrin was limited to contacting the three references whom Estrin supplied.
Cole explained that, unless instructed otherwise by a client, his firm would not check whether an applicant had a criminal history, nor would his firm seek to verify an applicant's educational credentials or investigate the applicant's credit history or driving record.
Although PFMC had requested that such a check be done when it hired Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt, Cole did not recall PGW asking him to do any such check on Estrin, and we found no such records in his files.
Thus, it appears that no background check was performed beyond checking the references that she provided.
91
In August, 1996, PGW offered Estrin the Human Resources position.
Her contract provided that she was to be paid a yearly salary of $175,000 with the opportunity to earn incentive compensation, "[t]he maximum amount of [which]
The contract also provided for possible merit increases in her salary (as determined by the CEO) in the beginning of the third year of her contract.
Additionally, her contract required that she be given a leased car and four weeks vacation annually.
Finally, her contract provided for reimbursement of her moving expenses, and tax gross up, up to $30,000; reimbursement of temporary housing expenses up to $1,500 per month for three months; and reimbursement of weekly house-hunting and relocation trips between Stamford, Connecticut and Philadelphia for three months.
(Despite these limits, PGW ultimately paid a total of $57,202 to relocate Estrin: $30,208 for moving expenses; $21,724 for tax gross up; $4,194 for temporary housing; and $1,074 for house-hunting expenses.)
And, of course, PGW gave her an American Express corporate credit card.
In December, 1998, a little more than two years after Hawes had hired Estrin, Hayllar fired her, in the wake of front-page Daily News articles dubbing her "the limo lady" and the "credit card queen" for her use of PGW's credit card for lavish personal expenses, such as cosmetics and limousine service.
When we asked Hayllar why he fired Estrin, he gave three reasons: She had used her corporate credit card for completely personal charges and had not reimbursed PGW "until she was caught" more than a year later; she had given the Board misinformation about a pension plan "either by error or by design;" and he had found her "to be very deceitful."
We are disturbed by the hiring process that resulted in the selection of Estrin.
First, we are concerned by Hawes' stated preference for a white woman, "not black."
We have no knowledge of whether any African American person applied for this position, but even taking Hawes at his word -- that race would only be "a" factor but not "the" factor, and that qualifications still would have come "first" -- we are appalled that the CEO of a major public utility could be so misinformed about lawful hiring practices.
Absent a formal affirmative action plan based on evidence of prior discrimination, race cannot be "a" factor or "the" factor.
Qualifications cannot come "first" because race cannot come "second" -- race cannot be considered at all.
Federal law prohibits race-based hiring decisions: Title VII of the 1964 Civil Rights Act explicitly provides that "It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employer ... to fail or refuse to hire ... any individual ... because of such individual's ... race [or] sex...."
(42 U.S.C. 2000e-2(a)(1).)
We are also disturbed that PGW had so little interest in
92
knowing anything about Estrin before it bound itself in a highly expensive, three-year contract with her.
(Even without any incentive compensation, Estrin's salary was higher than that paid to any City employee, including the Mayor, the Medical Examiner, and the President Judge of the Court of Common Pleas.)
Had PGW even bothered to simply request a credit report before hiring her and handing her its own credit card, it would have learned a lot.
We obtained Estrin's credit report, which includes the following notations about her credit account activity before she was hired: Capital 1 Bk Profit and Loss writeoff Closed 3/96.
Past due: $4537 Status as of 3/96: charged off as bad debt Harris Chg Profit and Loss writeoff Closed 11/93.
Past due: $2630 Status as of 11/93: charged off as bad debt BellAtlC Settled -- less than full bal Closed 10/95 Status as of 10/95: collection account HH Bank Canceled by credit grantor Verif'd 5/96 Balance: $2286 Closed 4/96 Past due: $51 Her credit report also listed several other cards on which she had been late in making payments.
(Additionally, Estrin's credit report shows 21 cards, lines of credit or mortgages with "no adverse information" reported.)
Had Hawes been aware of Estrin's handling of her own credit cards, he might not have hired her or, if he did hire her nonetheless, he might have paid closer attention to her use of PGW's corporate credit card, since he, as her direct supervisor, was responsible for reviewing her monthly expense reports.
As discussed in detail in Chapter X, once employed at PGW, Estrin charged more than $27,000 on her PGW corporate American Express card, ultimately reimbursing PGW for more than $4,000 of this total as personal expenses and/or business expenses lacking sufficient documentation.
The personal expenses included, among other items, limousine service, a $1,070 charge for art, expensive meals for her husband, and charges at Bloomingdale's.
Although Estrin incurred these charges over the course of two
93
years, she did not reimburse PGW until the fall of 1998, shortly before she was fired.
Estrin may have used PGW's card for her personal expenses because her personal credit card debt was so high (she owed $67,957 in October, 1996 and $72,972 in October, 1998, including amounts charged off as bad debts), and her own credit cards were being canceled by her creditors for non-payment.
Her credit report shows the following activity during her employ at PGW (10/96 to 12/98): Nieman Marcu[s] Account closed by consumer 8/97 Updated 10/98 Balance: $985 Status as of 8/97: charged off as bad debt AT
Citibank Gold Profit and Loss writeoff Updated 8/98 Balance: $7124 Closed 3/97 Past due: $1350 Status as of 3/97: Charged off as bad debt Unvl Bk NA Profit Updated Closed Status Natbkcard Profit Updated Closed Status and Loss writeoff 11/97 Balance: $4986 11/96 Past due: $520 as of 11/96: Charged off as bad debt and Loss writeoff 7/97 Balance: $6691 7/97 Past due: $777 as of 7/97: Charged off as bad debt
94
Sears Updated 10/98 Balance: $1709 Past due: $219 Status as of 10/98: 120 days past due
95
Macye/FDSNB Canceled by credit grantor Updated 10/98 Balance: $1104 Closed 7/97 Past due: $289 Status as of 7/97: 120 days past due Bloomd/FDSNB Closed Updated 9/98 Balance: $1639 Past due: $440 Status as of 9/98: 120 days past due MBNA America Canceled by credit grantor Updated 9/98 Balance: $9199 Closed 7/98 Past due: $1029 Status as of 7/98: 120 days past due BankBoston Updated 8/98 Balance: $2594 Past due: $367 Status as of 8/98: 120 days past due
Chase NA Canceled by credit grantor Updated 9/98 Balance: $10,519 Closed 5/98 Past due: $788 Status as of 5/98: 90 days past due Marine MD Bk Account Updated Closed Status closed by consumer 8/98 Balance: $4924 3/98 Past due: $299 as of 3/98: 90 days past due
First Card Canceled by credit grantor Updated 10/98 Balance: $6187 Closed 10/98 Past due: $362 Status as of 10/98: 60 days past due Saks Account Updated Closed Status closed 6/98 Balance: $6186 6/98 Past due: $601 as of 6/98: 30 days past due
We note that, when these balances were being written off as bad debts, Estrin was earning $175,000 yearly at PGW, was eligible for an unlimited bonus, and had free use of a leased car (and gas card), among other benefits.
96
To deal with the legal problems arising from her non-payment of credit card debt in one instance, Estrin made use of a PGW employee benefit: free legal services.
As noted in Chapter XV, PGW's employees and retirees are entitled to certain legal services, at no cost, through a contract that PGW has with a law firm, Obermayer, Rebmann, Maxwell 
Thus, in November, 1998, when Saks Fifth Avenue sued Estrin for failing to pay for $6,304 of merchandise charged on her credit card, Estrin had Obermayer answer Saks' 25 complaint on her behalf, at no cost to her.
A review of Estrin's credit history before she was hired might have been predictive of other events as well.
Notably, after she was fired by PGW, her husband (in whose name the gas service on their residence was billed) ceased paying their gas bill, accumulating an arrearage of approximately $1,000 by the time they left Philadelphia.
Hayllar told the grand jury that PGW "sent it immediately to a collection agency and they can ... find her in Texas and get ... the money."
Finally, not only was no credit history obtained, but no real background investigation of any kind was performed before hiring Estrin, who was one of the highest paid public or quasipublic employees in Philadelphia.
Instead, CWL merely called three references given by Estrin.
Conducting a background investigation that is limited to calling the references supplied by the candidate is likely to prove of limited value; candidates only give the names of references who will speak well of them.
Here, Estrin gave three references: a subordinate, a peer, The case went to arbitration, concluding with a finding for Saks and against Estrin in the amount of $6,304.19, on 8/27/99.
Saks Fifth Avenue v. Deborah Estrin, CP 98-11-01146.
While at PGW, Estrin also used Obermayer's legal services to have her neighbor, who was mentally ill, removed from his residence.
Estrin then used Obermayer to sue her Philadelphia landlords and their agent for (among other claims) allegedly misrepresenting to her that the neighbor was not a problem.
In her suit, Estrin asked for more than $50,000 in damages, including $15,798 of legal fees and costs to remove the neighbor.
She later stipulated that the legal fees were entirely covered by her legal benefits plan at PGW, and that she, her husband, and their counsel had no written documentation of any obligation to pay back any money to PGW for the legal services rendered in that matter.
The landlords filed a counterclaim for damage to their property.
Estrin v. Richards and Bojanowski v. Matkowski, CP 98-09-1465.
The case settled in September, 1999.
25
97
and a "functional superior."
These three spoke very highly of her.
Indeed, CWL's summary of its interview with the former subordinate noted that the subordinate said that Estrin "operates under the highest of moral and ethical standards."
However, when we subpoenaed her employment records from previous employers, we noted that, while her supervisors had given her high praise for her professional competence, on a few occasions, they questioned her expenses (once for failing to submit an expense report for 5-6 months, which the CEO termed "an embarrassment during corp audit" on her annual employee evaluation, and once for charging $2,000 in expenses -- including limousine rentals -- during a four-day conference, according to handwritten notes in her personnel file).
No one at CWL or PGW insisted on any attempt to speak directly with Estrin's former supervisors, other than the "functional superior" she listed as a reference, before offering her the position at PGW.
We think that a more thorough background check was warranted.
Estrin's Tenure at PGW Estrin worked at PGW from October, 1996 to December, 1998, during which time she was given one $30,000 bonus.
At the City Council hearings in November, 1998, during which she was called upon to explain her use of PGW's corporate credit card for limousine service and the like, she testified that she expected to receive another bonus for that year.
However, two weeks later she was fired by Hayllar, who had just been named acting CEO in the wake of Hawes' resignation.
Recently, in March, 2000, Estrin filed a demand for arbitration against PGW, seeking $378,595 on claims of breach of contract and violation of the Wage Payment and Collection Law.
PGW has filed affirmative defenses and a counterclaim for $29,476, and arbitration is scheduled for January, 2001.
98
X.
MANAGEMENT'S ABUSE OF PGW'S CORPORATE CREDIT CARDS
Introduction Among the most publicized of PGW's spending abuses was management's use of PGW's corporate credit cards.
As revealed in a series of Daily News articles in 1998, PGW executives charged expensive personal purchases, lavish business meals, and firstclass travel, among other questionable charges.
PGW eventually calculated that its executives and employees charged a total of $488,000 from January, 1996 through August, 1998.
When PGW's management charged these expenditures, PGW already had in place a policy that explicitly prohibited the use of PGW's credit cards for personal purchases.
The policy was ignored.
Moreover, because PGW paid its monthly American Express bill in full, and relied on the honesty and integrity of employees to identify and reimburse any personal expenses, there was no incentive for employees to make timely reimbursement -- or any reimbursement at all -- for personal purchases.
PGW's executives not only charged personal expenses, but they also charged lavish, and questionable, "business" expenses.
While PGW's policy specified that the credit cards were to be used for "business expenses only," the policy did not define what constituted a business expense.
Thus, Hawes, Martin, Sharbutt and Estrin -- and many if not all of the other 55 PGW executives and employees who had corporate American Express cards -- charged breakfasts, lunches, dinners and drinks to PGW's ratepayers as business expenses, even though they ate many of these meals, at Philadelphia restaurants, alone or exclusively with each other.
For example, one employee -- a salaried manager earning $83,000 annually -- charged a $125 dinner at Susanna Foo's on New Year's Eve and noted "dinner for late work" on his expense report, which his supervisor approved.
No policy prohibited PFMC and PGW employees from charging PGW for meals eaten alone ("working late") or eaten exclusively with other PGW employees.
PGW executives and employees also charged meals that they ate "on business" in Philadelphia with non-employees.
For example, Hawes, Martin, Sharbutt, Estrin and other PGW executives frequently charged meals with vendors, consultants, lawyers, City Council members, Gas Commission members, School Board employees, PFMC Board members, union representatives, a state senator, deputy mayor, business contacts, customers, prospective customers, prospective vendors, and prospective consultants, among other persons.
No policy prohibited these expenditures, and PGW managers routinely approved these expenses when incurred by their subordinates.
99
Moreover, PGW's policy included no per diem limits on dining and travel expenses.
Only one meal -- Martin's $600 dinner with his wife and child at Le Bec Fin -- was ever rejected as unreasonably expensive, and PGW initially approved payment of that expense, only requesting reimbursement after the Daily News began criticizing PGW spending.
In total, from January, 1996 through August, 1998, PGW executives and employees spent more than $137,000 for food and drink, most of it in Philadelphia restaurants.
This sum is especially astounding in light of the fact that PGW has an onsite employee cafeteria that is run by Aramark -- and subsidized by PGW's ratepayers.
Notably, many of these charges for meals were accompanied by parking charges (often $10 or more, which, for hundreds or thousands of meals, adds up).
Moreover, virtually every one of these charges represents time spent traveling from PGW to a restaurant, time spent at a leisurely meal (the Four Seasons is hardly "fast food"), and time spent travelling back to PGW.
Certainly, business could be conducted more efficiently, and less expensively, on-site at PGW.
In addition to these questionable "business meals," PGW executives also charged, as business expenses, office supplies for working at home, clothing for work (e.g., boots for a field trip, a shirt for a television appearance), and gifts for PGW and City employees, among other expenditures.
Well before the Daily News began its barrage of articles, PGW's internal auditor alerted PGW's management to the abusive credit card spending.
In fact, from at least December, 1997, management's abuse of the corporate credit cards was well known at PGW and was repeatedly discussed -- by PGW's internal auditor, PGW's external auditor, PGW's executive staff, and PGW's Board -even as it was occurring.
Nonetheless, despite this knowledge, and despite the unfolding expos in the Daily News, PGW took no remedial action until late in 1998.
In August, 1999, PGW finally issued a new "Employee Travel 
However, this new policy will not necessarily prevent the kind of abusive spending described in this Chapter.
PGW's credit card policy in 1996 In 1996, when Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt PGW employees had corporate American Express their management, however, the number of card grew.
Ultimately, between January, 1996 and employees had corporate credit cards; at any were hired, only 11 credit cards.
Under holders steadily October, 1998, 59 one time from Janu-
100
ary, 1997 until Hawes' mately 25 employees had $40 membership fee per charges to PGW just in
resignation in credit cards.
card, resulting annual fees for
September, 1998, approxiAmerican Express charged a in thousands of dollars of these cards.
In January, 1996, PGW already had in place Procedure #778.01, "Expense Account."
This Procedure (still in effect) applies to all employees who incur expenses on business trips and in "activities related to their position or assignment within [PGW]."
The Procedure explicitly provides, on page one, that "PGW American Express Cards are to be used for BUSINESS EXPENSES ONLY" (emphasis in original).
The Procedure also states that PGW employees who are issued a credit card must submit a PGW credit card expense report for the month the card is used.
On page eight, the Procedure further provides that, when another person's expenses are paid (e.g., when a PGW employee pays for a consultant's lunch), the employee must record on the expense report, the name of the person, his occupation, firm or association, and the business relationship.
The PGW employee must then attach copies of all receipts, submit the expense report to an approving authority for signature, and forward the approved original expense report to PGW's Treasury Department "as soon as possible, but no later than the THIRD WORKING DAY of the following month."
(Emphasis in original.)
The Procedure provides that the employee's approving authority must "verify that expenses conform with PGW policies."
The Treasury Department must verify that the report is complete, that the expenditures have been approved, and that the computations are correct.
It is not the Treasury Department's responsibility to review the expenses to determine whether they are permissible or proper.
Until 1999, PGW paid the American Express bill in full and on time; thus, the Procedure dictated that the employee was to "Include check (made payable to PGW) or cash when personal expenses were charged on a PGW Credit Card" with his expense report.
Although the Procedure prohibited the use of PGW's credit card for personal purchases, this reimbursement provision was necessary because occasionally personal expenses, such as in-room movies or dry cleaning, would become "embedded" in a hotel bill that otherwise consisted of legitimate business travel expenses.
In their testimony before the grand jury, Hawes denied ever seeing the Expense Account procedure until we showed it to him, and Sharbutt similarly testified that "I don't know that I looked at this when I first came here.
I probably have seen it recently."
Only Martin admitted reading the Expense Account procedure early in his tenure at PGW. Estrin testified (before City Council) that she did not receive a copy of PGW's Expense Account
101
procedure and never asked what the policy was.
However, Estrin's secretary told us that there were copies of PGW's policies in their department.
PGW's Treasurer, Joseph Golden, testified that, at the end of each fiscal year, his department sent "reminders" (delinquency notices) to all employees who had used their corporate credit cards but had failed to submit expense reports.
Additionally, if an employee had particularly high expenses and had not turned in an expense report, or if an employee was especially late in turning in an expense report, regardless of the amounts involved, Golden or his subordinates would call that employee to remind him or her.
At some point, Treasury would send copies of these "reminders" to the employee's supervisor.
Despite these "reminders," some PGW employees still failed to submit timely expense reports.
If a PGW executive or employee used his own funds to pay for business expenses, he could obtain reimbursement by submitting a cash expense report to the Treasury department.
Golden testified that, while employees were often delinquent in submitting credit card expense reports (with their accompanying reimbursement for personal purchases), employees were quite prompt in submitting cash expense reports, so that they could obtain reimbursement from PGW.
We found that PGW's corporate credit cards were wildly abused, and that PGW's Expense Account procedure was widely ignored: PFMC and PGW employees used the cards for personal purchases, failed to submit expense reports on a timely basis (in some instances, the reports were more than a year late), failed to properly document expenses, and failed to keep receipts.
Criminal charges Most of the credit card expenditures that we reviewed were abusive -- but not criminal, because they were business related, and no policy prohibited them.
Nonetheless, we determined that criminal charges were warranted against those executives who charged personal items in violation of the policy, and whose intent not to reimburse PGW (unless caught) can be proved beyond a reasonable doubt.
Using these criteria, by separately issued presentments, the Grand Jury has recommended the prosecution of Sharbutt and Estrin for theft, as discussed below.
Examples of credit card use We reviewed PGW's American Express responding employee credit card expense 1996 through September, 1998.
Many of poorly documented, making it impossible statements, reports, for these expense to determine and the corJanuary, reports were the precise
102
nature of all of the spending.
However, from the records that were available, we noted the following spending among executive 26 management.
Estrin From the beginning of her employment at PGW in October, 1996, through September, 1998, Estrin charged $27,239 on her PGW corporate American Express card.
She ultimately (and, for the most part, belatedly) reimbursed PGW for more than $4,000 of this total as personal expenses.
"Business" meals Estrin charged 61 meals, totaling $6,397, including: 16 meals, totaling $1,692, which Estrin identified as interviews with prospective employees.
Of these, three were with Erwin Wood, who had previously worked with Estrin at Union Pacific, and who was living in The Woodlands, Texas, where Estrin lived prior to coming to PGW. Estrin's three "interview" meals with Wood included a $250 dinner with Wood and his family at Cafe Nola.
Also included in these 16 interview meals was a $464 meal at the Four Seasons with a job candidate and Estrin's husband.
Estrin repaid PGW $155 for her husband's portion of that meal a year later, in September, 1998.
9 meals, totaling $980, with consultants or vendors, including two additional meals with Wood (totaling $155); one with Wood and another consultant and his wife at the Saloon ($268); two meals with Sheila Hansen (at the Saloon for $317, and at Fork for $84).
In September, 1998, Estrin repaid $105 of the $317 Saloon bill, noting that the $105 was the expense of a "non-business" third party.
8 meals with PGW employees, totaling $1,212, including two at Dave 
4 meals that Estrin identified as related to relocation, totaling $696, including a meal with her husband at Girafe restaurant in New York City for $262.
1 meal associated with travel to the ENS Chacan Foundation for Global Management Studies in New York.
PGW identified In this these executives executive in his corroborate this 26
section, the identities of persons dining with are based solely on information provided by the or her expense reports.
We did not independently information with these persons.
103
this foundation as a French was a trustee.
Estrin also the Waldorf Astoria and her $433, when she attended this Other business charges
organization charged PGW parking, for foundation
for which Estrin for her lodging at total expenses of meeting.
Among Estrin's other business charges was a $278 "membership" in the "Who's Who" directory.
PGW deemed this an appropriate expense, and has not requested reimbursement.
Additionally, Estrin charged a $65 charge at Pierre 
Limousine charges Estrin charged $2,651 for limousine service while at PGW.
Asked to explain some of her limousine charges in the City Council hearings, Estrin testified that "I was moving from Stamford [Connecticut] to here and commuting between the two houses.
I would take the train from Philadelphia to New York.
The last train to Stamford would already have been gone [sic], so I would take a car [i.e., limousine service]
Once she had relocated to Philadelphia, Estrin continued to use limousine service to go to and from airports on business trips.
She also charged a $320 limousine trip from her house at Third and Pine to the Academy of Music at Broad and Locust Streets to hear the orchestra (a distance of 12 to 14 city blocks), a trip that, in her 1998 City Council testimony, she conceded was not a business expense.
Other personal charges Estrin charged numerous personal purchases.
For example, in November, 1996, she purchased Borghese cosmetics at Bloomingdale's for $77, and in December, 1996, she purchased a $97 terry robe at Bergdorf Goodman, which she gave to her husband as a Christmas present.
In December, 1997, she charged mens' gifts/ jewelry at Bloomingdale's for $70, and in February, 1998, she purchased a $1,070 limited edition silk screen.
Estrin did not reimburse PGW for any of these purchases until September, 1998.
Additionally, in January, 1998, Estrin incurred a $2,189 hotel charge while at a Human Resources Senior Executive weekend in Boca Raton.
In October, 1998, she reimbursed PGW for $437 of this as personal expenses, including massages, exercise equipment, and two of her husband's meals, among other items.
Estrin's reimbursements In July, 1998, several months after the Daily News had begun
104
its criticism of PGW spending, PGW's Treasurer, Joseph Golden, sent Estrin a letter advising her that she had $12,182 of charges for which she had failed to submit expense reports.
Golden attached the relevant pages from the American Express bill, showing charges going back to November, 1996 (one month after Estrin had begun working at PGW).
In September, 1998, Estrin reimbursed PGW $2,165 for the cosmetics, terry robe, mens' gifts/jewelry, silk screen print, Pierre 
In October, 1998, Estrin reimbursed PGW an additional $623 for limousine travel to the airport, and $113 for her husband's portion of two additional conference meals.
Additionally, one of her subordinates reimbursed PGW almost $300 for a spouse's airline ticket, which had been charged on Estrin's card.
Estrin filed credit card expense reports, but omitted her personal purchases from these reports.
For example, Estrin filed her expense report for November, 1996 on time -- but failed to include the Borghese cosmetics that she had purchased that month until she filed a supplement to the November, 1996 report in August, 1998.
Similarly, Estrin purchased mens' gifts/jewelry in December, 1997, but failed to note this purchase until she filed a supplement to her January, 1998 expense report in August, 1998.
Estrin failed to include her husband's charges at the January, 1998 Human Resources conference in her February, 1998 expense report, until she filed a supplement to that report in August, 1998.
Likewise, Estrin only noted the $1,070 silk screen print that she purchased in February, 1998 on her August, 1998 supplement to her February expense report.
At the time that Estrin made these personal charges, she owed tens of thousands of dollars on more than a dozen of her personal credit cards.
For example, in October, 1996, Estrin owed almost $68,000 on 16 different personal credit cards; in October, 1998, she owed almost $73,000 on her personal credit cards (including some debts that her credit report shows were written off as bad debts).
Notably, Estrin was also paying $3,500 per month in rent, plus utilities, at this time.
Sharbutt From January, 1996 through September, 1998, Sharbutt charged $51,240 on his PGW American Express card.
Of this, Sharbutt has repaid $3,430 as personal expenses.
PGW is still questioning another $1,811 of these charges.
Sharbutt's expenditures included the following.
105
Business meals Like Hawes and Martin, Sharbutt used his PGW credit card to dine.
From January, 1996 through August, 1998, Sharbutt charged 139 meals, costing a total of $9,933.
These included 28 meals in Philadelphia with PGW employees, totaling $2,118; 21 meals in Philadelphia with vendors and consultants, totaling $2,214; 5 meals with Gas Commission member(s), totaling $289; and 3 meals with Hayllar, totaling $204.
Personal expenditures Sharbutt used his corporate American Express card for numerous personal purchases, for which he made no reimbursement until September, 1998, after the Daily News had begun its expos and after Golden had sent him a memo, dated 8/5/98, advising him that he had failed to submit expense reports for thousands of dollars of charges.
Golden attached the relevant pages from the American Express bill, reflecting charges going back to October, 1996.
In his grand jury testimony, Sharbutt admitted that "two or three times" he got letters from PGW's Treasury department about expenses on his American Express card that were not on his expense reports.
Sharbutt's personal charges, for which he had failed to make timely reimbursement, included the following.
In October, 1996, Sharbutt charged $150 for a ticket (or tickets) to the Broadway show "Miss Saigon," but did not reimburse PGW until October, 1998, almost two years later.
On three occasions in September and November, 1997, Sharbutt charged video sales or rentals, for a total of $198; he did not repay PGW for these until approximately a year later, in September, 1998.
In December, 1997, he charged a Sony Discman ($80) and a 1997 Gun Digest ($10), but did not repay PGW until September, 1998.
In January, 1998, he charged $74 of "gift items" at Brightlife, New York, but did not reimburse PGW for these until September, 1998.
Additionally, in August, 1997, Sharbutt charged "jewelry/ gifts" (according to his American Express statement) for $29.40 from Accessory Express in Boston, Massachusetts.
In an August, 1997 expense report that Sharbutt submitted in August, 1998, Sharbutt described this charge as "To ship documents to PGW."
However, the owner of Accessory Express informed us that his company does not sell or ship documents.
Sharbutt never repaid PGW for this charge.
Between October, 1996 and February, 1998, Sharbutt charged four personal hotel bills to PGW, totaling $350, in Cape May, New Jersey; Westport, Connecticut; Las Vegas, Nevada; and Santa Monica, California.
Sharbutt repaid PGW for these charges in September, 1998 and October, 1998.
While in California in
106
February, 1998, Sharbutt also charged a rental car and limousine services, for approximately $271.
He repaid PGW for these charges in September, 1998 and December, 1998.
Sharbutt charged a meal in Philadelphia in October, 1996, which he repaid in April, 1997.
Additionally, between May, 1997 and December, 1997, Sharbutt charged multiple meals for which he did not reimburse PGW until after Golden had sent him the "dunning" memo in August, 1998.
Sharbutt identified these meals as personal when he filed "supplemental" expense reports in August, 1998.
In November, 1996, Sharbutt charged a $588 roundtrip airline ticket to California.
On his November, 1996 expense report, Sharbutt wrote "Continental Airlines Ticket HSale Meeting."
In response to a memo from Hayllar in October, 1998, requesting further information about this and other charges, Sharbutt wrote "Relocation related expense trip for sale of home."
However, Sharbutt had sold his primary residence in California almost a year earlier, in December, 1995.
(He had sold his California rental property in mid-November, 1996, and, in any event, was not entitled to any reimbursement from PGW for costs connected to the sale of his rental property.)
Sharbutt used this ticket to fly to California on Thanksgiving weekend, leaving Wednesday, 11/27/96 and returning Sunday, 12/1/96.
Finally, PGW identified another 15 charges (mostly at restaurants), totaling $1,290, for which Sharbutt provided insufficient explanation or documentation.
Thus, although Sharbutt indicated that these were business expenses, PGW's internal auditor has reasonably taken the position that he should reimburse them.
As noted in Chapter III, at the time that Sharbutt made these personal charges on his PGW credit card, he owed between $58,570 and $132,220 on his dozens of personal credit cards and lines of credit.
With few exceptions, Sharbutt did not include any of his personal purchases on the expense reports that he filed prior to August, 1998.
Instead, he first accounted for them in supplemental expense reports filed after the Daily News had begun criticizing PGW executive spending, and after Golden sent his "reminder" letter.
Sharbutt claimed that he could not have reimbursed PGW for his personal charges any sooner than he did, because the Treasury department did not forward his part of the American Express statement to him on a timely basis.
However, even if this was true, Sharbutt admitted that he could have requested a copy of the statement from Treasury at any time.
Indeed, Sharbutt was
107
the him.
and not his
Chief Financial Officer; the Treasurer reported directly to In any event, Sharbutt knew when he charged personal items, he received receipts when he made those purchases.
He did need to wait for the American Express statement to prepare expense report and timely forward reimbursement to PGW.
As the Chief Financial Officer of PGW, Sharbutt -- more than any other individual at PGW -- should have brought discipline to management's use of PGW's corporate credit cards, insisting that they not be used for personal purchases, insisting that any personal purchases be repaid promptly, and insisting on proper documentation.
However, as noted, Sharbutt used the credit card for personal purchases, repaid his personal purchases months late or not at all, and poorly documented numerous expenditures.
Hawes Hawes charged $60,362 on his PGW credit card, of which $14,068 was for personal purchases.
Of the money that Hawes spent on "business," we noted the following: Meals Hawes spent $15,488 for "business" meals (which, Hawes explained, could be lunch, dinner, a round of drinks, or hor d'oeuvres).
These "business" meals included: 34 meals with consultants, vendors, and professional service providers, totaling $3,557 (i.e., an average of more than $100 per meal).
These included, e.g., a $101 dinner at Zanzibar Blue, and then a $241 meal at Cin Cin one month later, with two persons from MacKay 
These 34 meals also included dinners with consultants and professional service providers who wanted to do business with PGW, but who were never chosen to do any.
For example, Hawes ate six meals, totaling $537, with lawyers from three different firms, none of whom ever obtained a contract with PGW.
As to one of these lawyers, with whom Hawes ate several meals (including a $187 dinner), Hawes explained, "he wanted to do some business with PGW as do many, and a couple of times, maybe more than that, we met to talk about how he might be able to do it, what his strengths were ....
[Q]uite frankly, ... he ended up really being kind of a good advisor to us on community issues, the political structure
108
and things like that."
Additionally, these 34 meals included a $315 dinner at the Saloon that Hawes ate with a representative of Pomerantz, an office furniture vendor.
Hawes explained why PGW, not Pomerantz, paid the bill: [T]he question becomes are you then owing them because of the dinner, so you have to make a choice ... whether you pay for it ... with no obligation or whether you let them pay for it.
And in that case, the way the check fell, I paid for it.
Now, I didn't intend to pay for it, but that is the way the check fell.
...
*** I'm just saying that when I [am] first ... asked to talk to people about business, and that happens all the time ...
I would prefer, where appropriate, to pay.
18 meals with just PGW employees, totaling $1,426, including a $265 dinner with Badruddin Karachiwala and Ellen Moffett at Morton's, and multiple meals with Gregory Martin, including a $117 dinner at Warm Daddy's, a $108 dinner at Zanzibar Blue, and a $89 dinner at Dinardo's 15 meals with PFMC Board members, totaling $878, of which nine were with Rotan Lee, five were with Ben Hayllar, and one was with Helen Pudlin 12 meals with Gas Commission members or staff, totaling $1,225, of which seven were with the Gas Commission Chair, at the Four Seasons, Chart House, Striped Bass, Meiji-En, Arroyo Grille, Ristorante Panorama, and the Regal UN Plaza; and five were with other Commission staff at The Palm, Ruth's Chris Steakhouse, Zanzibar Blue, the Adam's Mark Hotel, and Cin Cin 11 meals with charitable leaders, totaling $749, including a $427 meal with two couples (associated with Safeguard Scientific and Paradigm Consultants) for the Bethesda Auction 11 meals with customers, totaling $480 6 meals, mission's planner), Ross, in totaling $482, with Ross Associates (the Gas Compublic relations consultant and strategic at Ruth's Chris, Zanzibar Blue, and Warm Daddy's.
turn, billed for its time at these meals.
4 meals with ward leaders or other stakeholders for "community relations," totaling $304.
Hawes explained "It's build-
109
ing relationships with key people in the community ... who are influences, politically and otherwise.
It's just a positive image building that companies do ...."
5 meals with City Council members, totaling $408 4 meals with SEPTA personnel for $224 41 meals with miscellaneous persons (or possibly by himself in conjunction with business travel) for $2,180.
These included, among others, meals with job candidates; meals at the US Open golf tournament as a guest of Transco, a pipeline supplier for PGW; meals at AGA Board meetings; meals in 27 conjunction with the Pennsylvania Society gala in New York ; former City Council member Ann Land's retirement from PGW ($12); a $181 meal with the president of Morehouse College (Hawes' alma mater); and a $113 meal with a Georgia state 28 senator and his family.
93 meals totaling $2,714, for which Hawes listed no guest and provided no explanation "Relocation meals."
Hawes also charged, as business expenses, an $18 lunch with his builder and a $54 meal with his realtors.
Additionally, as discussed in Chapter V, Hawes freely acknowledged before the grand jury that PGW paid for virtually every meal that he ate in 1996, and many that his family ate, under his theory that PGW should pay for his meals as part of his relocation.
Although, as a result of the Daily News expos, PGW has questioned some of Hawes' "business" expenditures, it has not questioned most of his charges.
As Hayllar testified before the grand jury: A. ...
The thing about Jim Hawes is he didn't use his credit card very much.
I mean I criticized Jim and told him he should be out and about more and that he should be entertaining more stakeholders, council people and clients and he really wasn't.
Hawes attended a Pennsylvania Society function in New York with his family, reserving a separate hotel room for his children, and charged PGW a total of $1,054 for lodging.
After the Daily News began criticizing PGW's spending, Hawes reimbursed PGW for his children's hotel room.
Asked to explain the business purpose of this expense to the grand jury, Hawes replied, "the vision for PGW, it was to be bigger than just a gas company in Philadelphia."
28
27
110
Q. A.
What other stakeholders did you want him to be entertaining that he wasn't? Just about anyone that had -- that could influence the course of [PGW] and that would be the state officials, state office holders, local office holders, people -particular people who would do business with the Gas Works.
Jim was -- is a very, very charming person.
He's very engaging.
I thought he spent too much time in the office and he should spend more time creating a persona of PGW that he didn't do.
He was uncomfortable with it.
We asked another Board member, Andre Dennis, about Hawes' spending.
Dennis testified: ...
I believe I said to Jim, this may have been after he came on board, that I think he should be concerned with appearances or something to that effect.
And what I had in mind was the Four Seasons, that when Phoenix Management was on board, it was usual for there to be meetings at the Four Seasons, and I personally believe that if I were going to have a lunch, I wouldn't have a lunch at the Four Seasons unless there was a compelling business reason for me to have it at the Four Seasons. *** ...
So I suggested to Jim that maybe he ought not to have lunch at the Four Seasons, that maybe some less expensive locale would be more appropriate, and I do recall that kind of conversation.
We asked Hawes whether he recalled such a conversation with Dennis, and he replied: A. That was an example Andre used and he used it when we came in, in an interview.
We lived at the Four Seasons and Andre told me, after I came here, that you probably want to be careful about being at the Four Seasons and I probably have been to the Four Seasons three times since then, in three years.
Now, when he said that to you, you might want to be careful about being at the Four Seasons, did you understand that to mean, literally, that you should be careful about being at the Four Seasons, or you should be careful about how you are spending money that the ratepayers thinks belongs to them? We were always careful about how we spent money, the ratepayer's money.
Look at the expenses during the period of time we were there.
We were very careful about how we spent the ratepayer's money.
...
Q.
A.
111
Other "business" expenses Hawes charged $1,366 for a rental car for during her first two months in Philadelphia.
grand jury that renting a car for his wife at prior to having his own vehicles shipped here, ment, a very normal relocation expense."
his wife to use Hawes told the ratepayer expense, was "in my judg-
Hawes also charged $1,096 for golf balls inscribed with the Masters logo, and other such items, at various golf courses, including the Augusta National Golf Course in Georgia, where he was watching the Masters tournament as a guest of Transco.
Asked about some of these charges, Hawes told the grand jury: "I bought souvenirs to bring back to customers, stakeholders, and so forth at the pro shop, which is, you know, pretty standard, and you don't get a lot for however much it was, $1200, whatever it was."
Among his other "business" charges, Hawes charged PGW $58 for a white dress shirt while in Washington, D.C.
Hawes told the grand jury that "I went to do a national broadcast on deregulation ... and I didn't have the right color shirt. ... so they made me buy a shirt for the TV."
Hawes said that, if the Board told him to reimburse PGW for the shirt, he would do so.
Personal charges Hawes used his PGW credit card to charge $14,068 of personal purchases.
Unlike some at PGW, Hawes did reimburse PGW for virtually all of his personal charges within six weeks to three months of the date on which he incurred the charge.
Although Hawes did reimburse PGW fairly promptly, during those six weeks to three months, PGW effectively gave him an interest-free loan on the $14,068, which it paid "up front" while it waited for him to settle up.
Martin From January, 1996 through September, 1998, Martin charged $72,795 on his PGW American Express card, of which $1,027 was for personal purchases and $71,768 was for business expenses.
Business expenses -- meals Like Hawes, Martin used his PGW credit card to pay for many meals with PGW employees and "stakeholders."
These 247 meals cost a total of $22,241, and included: 57 meals, almost a Seasons, Daddy's, totaling $6,136, with PGW employees (including dozen with union representatives) at the Four Rose Tatoo, the Marriott, Embassy Suites, Warm Dinardo's, and Moody's on the Pike.
112
32 meals with consultants and vendors, totaling $3,906.
These included a $297 dinner and a $196 lunch at the Four Seasons with representatives from PSE
30 meals, totaling $2,172, which Martin identified as related to his relocation 13 meals with PFMC members, totaling $867, at the Four Seasons, Sfuzzi, Baci Bistro, Zanzibar Blue, Rose Tattoo, and Ruth's Chris Steakhouse 7 meals, totaling $341, with a Philadelphia School Board employee at the Four Seasons 6 meals, totaling $413, with Gas Commission staff members (or a former member) 4 meals with Public Utilities Commission (PUC) members, totaling $424.
According to Hayllar, when PGW paid for a PUC member's meal, the PUC would send a check to reimburse that expense.
4 meals with a deputy mayor, totaling $254, at the Four Seasons 4 meals with Ross Associates, totaling $327, at restaurants such as Ruth's Chris Steakhouse and Marabella's.
Ross Associates, in turn, billed for its time at these meals.
3 meals, totaling $439, with City Council members (with other persons joining them), at Deux Cheminees and the Four Seasons 2 with state representatives, totaling $64, at the Marriott and Holiday Inn Other "business" expenses Among other expenditures, Martin used his PGW credit card to pay for gifts that he gave to other utilities as "tokens of appreciation" for field visits ($385); gifts from the Disney Store for Secretaries' Day ($127); flowers for Hawes' secretary ($30); and work boots for a field outing ($71).
Expenses identified by Martin as personal
113
Martin charged seven items at PGW that he ultimately repaid as personal.
Of these, he charged the first six, totaling $429, in his first four months at PGW, and he repaid each charge within two or three months of incurring the expense.
These six charges included flowers; three meals; and eye wear.
In addition to these six charges, Martin also used his PGW credit card to pay for a $598 dinner at Le Bec Fin, which he ate with his wife and son in September, 1996, after making settlement on his Chestnut Hill home.
When PGW questioned this expense more than two years later, in the wake of the Daily News articles, Martin took the position that this was a relocation expense.
However, Gregory Driscoll, the Chair of PFMC, told Martin to pay it back.
As Driscoll explained to a District Attorney detective, "Family dinners may be covered as a relocation expense, but family dinners at Le Bec Fin were not."
Miscellaneous cash expenditures With his own funds, over three years, Martin bought $12,744 of season tickets to the Philadelphia Eagles and 76'ers games.
PGW reimbursed Martin $2,852 for tickets, which Martin said he gave to employees as rewards for promoting customer service, or used for business entertaining.
Other PGW employees As noted, between January, 1996 and October, 1998, 59 PGW executives and employees had credit cards.
Like Hawes, Martin and Sharbutt, some of these executives and employees used their cards for lavish business meals with all manner of "stakeholders," as well as meals eaten alone or exclusively with other PGW employees.
They also used their cards for personal expenditures.
However, we found that, with few exceptions, abuse of PGW's corporate credit card was concentrated in upper-level management.
We noted that these upper-level executives in turn approved their subordinates' inappropriate spending; indeed, they encouraged some of it.
For example, Marketing Department employees spent large sums of PGW money dining together.
As one Marketing Department employee later explained in a memo to Hayllar, in response to the credit card audit conducted in November, 1998, "Business lunch and dinner meetings were accepted and encouraged in the Marketing Department as team building exercises to show appreciation for jobs well done."
PGW's delay in addressing the credit card abuse We learned that PGW's Internal Auditor alerted executive management to the credit card abuse even as it was occurring, and
114
that he repeatedly attempted to stop the spending.
However, he was thwarted in his efforts by the refusal of PGW executives to act on his findings and recommendations, as discussed below.
In August, 1997, Hawes asked PGW's newly hired Internal Auditor, Thomas Smyth, to audit PGW's American Express credit cards.
Smyth and his staff audited all credit card expense reports and related documentation for June through August, 1997, a period which encompassed many of the abuses noted here.
In early December, 1997, Smyth sent a report to Sharbutt (with copies to Hawes and others) summarizing his findings.
Providing detail, Smyth noted, e.g., that many employees used the cards to charge personal expenses, that most employees were 2 to 13 months late in submitting their expense reports, and that some employees had balances of more than $5,000.
Smyth then made four specific recommendations: (1) PGW should change the billing and payment process, so that American Express would mail the monthly bills directly to the employees, rather than to PGW.
(This is called "direct billing.")
PGW would reimburse the employee for business expenses only when the employee had submitted a properly completed, approved expense report.
(2) PGW's Treasury department should notify all cardholders with delinquent expense reports that their credit card privileges would be terminated if the expense reports were not received within 60 days.
(3) PGW Procedure # 778.01 should be amended to provide, inter alia, that business meals involving only PGW employees are prohibited except in limited circumstances.
(4) Treasury should inform cardholders that use of the cards for personal purchases was prohibited, and that card privileges would be terminated for "continued, unauthorized personal use."
In the memo, Smyth noted that PGW's Treasury department concurred with his recommendations.
Shortly thereafter, Smyth discussed the issue with Sharbutt.
Smyth then prepared a memo to Sharbutt, Hawes, and others.
In the memo, Smyth said that he and Sharbutt had agreed that PGW would switch to a "direct billing" system, and that they had further agreed that the Expense account procedure would be amended to provide that: (1) the Treasury Department would be empowered to reject expense reports that were not in conformity with PGW policy; (2) business meals eaten solely with other PGW employees would be prohibited except in limited circumstances;
115
(3) a minimal amount of incidental personal expenses would be permitted when traveling on PGW business; and (4) the revised Procedure would be signed by Sharbutt and Hawes.
Thereafter, Sharbutt hired a former employee to draft the procedure, and then circulated the draft in February, 1998.
Although Sharbutt's draft is addressed to Smyth (among others), Smyth told the grand jury that "I did not receive this draft, first of all.
I have to go hunt this thing down.
I didn't even know it was in existence."
(Smyth hastened to add that "the fact that I didn't get it, I didn't think it was intentional....")
When Smyth finally obtained a copy of the draft, he concluded that it was not strong enough.
Within a day of obtaining the draft, Smyth edited it and returned it to Sharbutt.
Smyth recalled that this was probably in March, 1998.
Over the next several months, the Daily News printed articles on the spending abuses at PGW; nonetheless, PGW's management took no action on the draft policy.
Notably, at approximately the same time that Smyth sent the edited draft to Sharbutt, Deloitte sent its annual post-audit "letter to management" to the PFMC Audit Committee.
In this letter, Deloitte criticized PGW's credit card "program," and made observations and recommendations that were similar, if not identical, to those offered by Smyth three months earlier.
(Deloitte's audit manager said that as part of Deloitte's audit of PGW, the auditors read reports issued by PGW's Internal Auditor, and sometimes incorporated them.)
Still, neither PFMC nor PGW's management took any action.
In September, 1998, Smyth sent Sharbutt another memo (with copies to Hawes and Golden), in which he both reiterated his past suggestions for revising the credit card policy, and offered new suggestions.
